Corey Barker does a great job of explaining Blend Modes in this DVD. All of the Kelby training videos are great but pricey to buy individually. If you really want bang for your buck just subscribe to Kelby Training online.
While many beginner DVDs try to teach you everything there is to know about Photoshop CS5, this introductory course shows you the critical things you need to know to start feeling confident in your Photoshop skills. Bestselling author and Photoshop trainer, Matt Kloskowski shows you exactly what you need to know about tools, filters, adjustments, palettes, and menu items to hit the ground running in Photoshop. These include: layers and how they're key to mastering Photoshop, selections and the essential tools you really need to worry about, getting started with Camera Raw and which Retouching tools you'll find the most helpful. When you're done with this DVD you'll have a solid grasp of the most important features and be at the next level in no time.
Do not waste your money on this thing it is terrible i boutght this product for my son and when i put in phone numbers for him to remember or the date and  it would always reset then i would have to do it all over again i couldn't do anything about it it was getting very frustrating so we just threw it away DO NOT Absolutely DO NOT SPEND YOUR MONEY ON THIS
It never worked. My daughter worked to earn the money to get this and it never worked for her. I had to buy her a new one to replace it
Some of the functions did not work properly.  My daughter bought this with her own money and was disappointed that it did not function as advertised.
Dog got the old remote and destroyed it.  Didn't feel like explaining to the folks at the Time Warner Cable office what happened.  Saw the price on Amazon for this one and chose the low hassle option.  It works perfectly.  Price was right.
We had an old Time Warner Cable remote that was dropped into a bucket of dirty mop water.  We dried it out and it seemed to work &#34;fine&#34; except for the few times one of the batteries began to sizzle and smoke and became hotter than anything I had ever felt before and literally burned a hole in our couch upholstery.  Needless to say, this remote, the CLIKR-5, is awesome, easily programmed, and works perfectly with our TWC equipment and all the other A/V components.  I love this remote... great product.  (Probably goes without saying, but just in case, you don't get the TWC logo on it.)
This unit works just like the TEC unit only better. I like it and would buy another if needed. OK?
This remote, for whatever reason, was chosen by Time Warner to replace their previous silver remote, the Time Warner Synergy V RC-U62CP-1.12S.  The actual function of this CLIKR-5 is OK, but the ergonomic design sets back remotes by 20 years.  The buttons are all the same, there's no separation of the number buttons, the volume and channel buttons are the same shape as the other buttons on the remote, and it all adds up to a crappy user experience.  Why would TWC accept this as a replacement?  This remote is virtually impossible to pick up and use without staring at it to make sure where your fingers are.  Heck, you have to feel around just to figure out if you've grabbed it by the top or bottom, since there's no articulation in the body of the thing to tell you which end is up.  Horrible, just horrible design.  I'm skipping this and paying double for a refurbished Synergy V.
It is an exact duplicate of my Time warner remote.I bought it so my wife could control the TV from her chair and not ask me to do it every time.It works great.I would reccomend it to anyone.
Works on my t.v. that no other remote works on.  Was hard as heck to find a compatible one.  Even works with my old blu ray player.  Doesn't work with my old VCR but that thing is so old it would be like walking on water if it did.
never was loud enough. trying to get rand to repair it now. had to buy a new set of head phones to find out if the problem was in the speaker or elswhere. hole for audio output is 2.5mm, really a bad idea rand! all external speakers have 3.5mm plugs, mp3 players 3.5. pain in the butt. i loved my tom tom but 53 foot trl. and residential areas dont mix. tom tom has 35? different voices .... rand 2. speed limit for trucks in il. is 65 on interstates except for chi. area but rand says 55 everwhere. needs a seperate clock, not just eta or clock, needs both. loved the announcement ... arrive dest. on right or left when i could hear it.,.......... just got it back from rand fast turnaround 4 days speaker now works but still not loud enough for an old man in a screaming truck with the window opened acrack to let the smoke out, mp3 or xm up loud etc. found a speaker at pilot that fits.....for telephones, has to have a seperate power source.... i wouldnt advise buy this gps ,too many bugs in it.
I bought this product to use primarily for work. I log 3200+ mile a week and thought this would be a good to tool to have. I love the graphics. There were a few times that it routed me thru some residential areas and a couple of times I wondered if a truck was even legal at all. I loved the feature where I could see if there was a truck stop or rest area close by though it does not have them all. My main concern or problem with this device is in the charging port. The unit get to hot at this port. I went thru 3 12vlt chargers and 1 house wall charger. eventually the plug in had got to the point of being brittle and fell apart. I talk to Rand McNally about this they sent me 1 12 volt charger. But I had to pay for the rest and if I wanted them to look at it I would have to pay shipping out of my pocket. I have a problem with that because I paid so much for it to start. I had it about 2 mos. when it started having problems. I had it 10 mos. when it finally became useless and I thrrew it away. I replaced it with the rand Mcnally 510. It's a whole different animal with a whole lot more problems and will be taken back today.
Love it has everything I wanted any problems were quickly resolved
We had the GPS for quite a while with a minimal amount of problems.  The plug in port bent but Rand McNally replaced it.  We puchased the new TND720 and gave the TND700 to our driver.  Well, our ex driver - he was technologically challenged and let the until hang off the dash on a trip from KY to TX. When I told him to secure it to the dash, he threw it in the storage department above the dash, thus the ex employee,I highly recommend the Rand McNally.  Rand McNally provides an excellent product and excellent support.
Not going to write a long review, even thought this unit deserves one. I've driven well over 1-mil miles and done most of my own routing so I pretty know whats the fastest and shortest. Have been using a basic garmin for the past three years and with ANY Gps unit they'll ALL get you in trouble if you let them. I was really excited about this unit, due to the size and the features. Allot of great grafics and on screen info thats usefull. But the most basic item that it was lacking was the gps tracking. I gave this unit allot of leadway on its mistakes due to the fact that it had allot of cool stuff that it did, but its ability to track you and route you was not even close to what the basic garmin could due. Its like the prossesor that they installed in the TND 700 was 10 years old. Example if I needed to make a simple route change I.E. in town down to the next street due to the fact that I couldn't make the turn or the street was blocked off, it would take the TND 700 upwards of 45 seconds to a minute and a half to reroute me. Here I'm sitting at a stop light waiting for directions and waiting that long with cars on my backside didn't make me happy. This is a problem that happened evertime you had to reroute, weather it was a simple street change or a major highway change. Also from the time you turned the unit on it would take twice as long to boot itself up. At least a dozen times with in a week it put me on the wrong roads and when I made a wrong turn it got it self lost....I.E. take left on xyz street, and it was some ones drive way. Or turn left in 800 yards and the turn was less than 10 feet away. You might think in a conjested city situation I might get a little mixed up, but this is out in the country. Twice it put me under 12'6" bridges when I'm 13'6". Of course I made sure all my truck setting where they were supposed to be. I also updated the OS version,via Rand McNally. All in all I expected alot out of this unit and got a unit that should of been field tested with some people that drive allot. It just had to many route mistakes. Going back to the basic garmin. This isn't just my complaints, I have three friends that bought the same unit and have the same complaints. All of us returned the units.
DONT WAIST YOUR MONEY ON THIS PRODUCT MY CELL PHONE GIVES ME BETTER DIRECTIONS AND FASTER ROUTES TO MY DESTINATION EVEN THOUGH ITS MAINLY A CAR ROUTE. RAND MCNALLY TND 700 HAS GOTTEN ME IN SEVERAL TIGHT SPOTS INCLUDING NON TRUCK ROUTES THAT I HAD TO BACK UP MY TRACTOR TRAILER IN THE MIDDLE OF DOWNTOWN CHARLOTTE.THIS PRODUCT ALSO CANNOT READ MAPS CORRECTLY. IT HAS TOLD ME TO MAKE U TURNS AND GO SOUTH FOR 3 MILES TO CATCH A BY PASS ROUTE TO GET ON I 95  WHEN ALL I HAD TO DO WAS CONTINUE STRAIGHT FOR ABOUT 800 FEET AND MAKE A LEFT TO THE I95 ON RAMP.THE LIST GOES ON AND ON. AND IHAVE TRIED TO CONTACT AMAZON SO THAT I CAN RETURN THIS PRODUCT AS IT REALLY SUCKS. NOW ITS FEATURES LIKE MILEAGE TRACKING BY STATE AND DAY TRAVELED ITS GREAT, BUT WHAT GOOD ARE ITS FEATURES WHEN YOU CANT GET TO YOUR DESTINATION ON TIME OR GET LOST BY THE SAME INSTRUMENT THAT IS SUPPOSED TO ELIMINATE JUST THAT.
I've had mine for a year and here's what we got. It tries to route be down non truck routes while telling me the truck route is illegal for me. This is such a bad problem that even Interstate 25 in Denver Colorado is listed (according to this GPS) as a non- truck route and will route you through the city instead. There are several drivers within our company who own one and more than half (of about 50) have crashed to an un-recoverable state. Our company representative said that Rand McNally informed them that the GPS was not designed to say on for a long period of time. Really? it's a truck driver GPS. We have one driver with a $2400 dollar ticket due to this GPS routing him down the wrong road. The companies response was to update the unit. I've had mine for a year, I never noticed one update that corrected functionality, they only seem to keep messing the tools. I want a GPS that routes, if I wanted tools I'd buy software for my computer.My suggestion is to by a nice Garmen. My one rated for cars actually routes me better than this one rated for trucks.Wayne
Twice this item has turned into a useless brickTech support is only 5 days a week during business hours and then you send the unit in for repair, twice in 7 months is not a good signThey tell you it is only a tool and you should preplan the route before trusting its chosen routeMy use of this GPS is to google maps first, pick the best route then use the tnd700 as a guideI do like the features of finding rest stops and scales on route but they are not accurateRecalculating is slow after you miss a turn...They are trying to make it a good product but I feel like they are still in Beta testing of the unit.maybe in in a year or two it will be a decent  productThey also are talking about a new map upgrade that will cost close to $100How about loading it with the right maps before releasing the product?
This unit is a fantastic aide for truckers. Many great features that make it useful. Accuracy does not always seem to be current. At times it takes you many miles out of the way to get to where you are going. Also the graphics are very jerky. They could be a lot smoother. Very informative, but could be a lot smoother. Also, it does not zoom in like it should when exiting or turning.
This is a great truck GPS. I've tried others and nothing seems to come close to the Rand McNally TND-700.Excellent screen size and resolution. The audio is loud enough to be heard over road noise and the purr of my Kenworth/Cat engine. I've used it for the last 8,000 miles or so and it has only glitched once. Just restarted it and it picked up on my route right where it should have. The exit lane screen has been spot on every time and gives me plenty of time to get my rig into the appropriate lane safely. I also love the multi-stop route planning and use it a lot. Updated regularly, it has shown me all the construction zones and has a feature to allow me to detour around them. Creating Groups and storing locations in them is a breeze so I can separate warehouse from store locations, etc.I'm running an HP Pavilion laptop with Windows 7 OS for the dock and update. The USB port DOES charge the GPS, at least with my laptop, despite the warning in a previous review. Even if it didn't, the supplied 12-volt and AC chargers take care of getting the battery up to speed.My complaints are relatively minor:Battery life when it is unplugged isn't great. However, since I use it plugged in in the cab 95% of the time, it doesn't create too much of a problem.The announcement of state borders coming up is nice but it doesn't tell you (or show you on the map display) what state you are in and/or going into. Again, a minor issue because I know where I am but all my other GPS units had this feature. For $500 smackers, I don't expect this kind of slip-up.There is a Micro SD slot on the unit and I bought a card for it. Unfortunately, the manual has absolutely no information on using it. The only reference is on the page showing the physical features of the unit, showing the position of the slot. Annoying.Clean up the minor issues and this unit rates a solid 5.Rand McNally 528881469 7-inch Intelliroute TND 700 Truck GPS
I have owned two Rand McNally GPS devices over the last two years. Buyer beware! They are pieces of junk. The software is great, but the hardware does not last. The first GPS lasted a year. I spent another $400, that one lasted about 14 months. If you don't mind spending $400 a year for a GPS buy one. Otherwise do not buy it it is the worst and most expensive piece of junk I have ever bought. I still use my original GARMIN I purchased in 2006.
EXCELLENT. BEST TRUCK GPS I'VE USED. GOOD GRAPHICS. GREAT VOLUME, OVERCOMES TRUCK BACKGROUND NOISE. EXCELLENT CATALOG OF DESTINATIONS. CAR MODE. NITE MODE MAKES IT EASY ON THE EYES. 99.5% ACCURATE. DIRECT ROUTE TO DESTINATION. DRIVER PTS. OF INTEREST: SCALES, TRUCK STOPS, REST AREAS, BORDERS, WEIGH STATIONS, SCALES, ETC. EASY TO PROGRAM. CONTINUAL FREE UPDATES VIA YOUR COMPUTER. OTHER DRIVER FRIENDLY OPTIONS. COMES FROM THE PEOPLE WHO'VE BEEN GETTING DRIVERS TO THEIR DESTINATION FOR DECADES.
Back in the old days we used to use a phone number and a road atlas.Those days are over now.Just type in the address and go.The Intelliroute will get you there with no worries about low underpasses or any other areas those 4-wheeler GPS systems may not be aware of.If you don't have one,what are waiting on?
I purchased this product not to use in commerical trucking but rather to use when I am traveling with my 5th wheel RV.  So far this product as been very good.  Rand McNally folks seem to be working to continue to improve the software along with prompt updates.  Although designed for the trucking industry it works great for us RV folks as well.  I found for a 2500 HD pickup the unit is a little large for the windshield.  I use the unit with a mount that fits in my cup holder and that has worked out great.  I would recommend this product.
My brother is a trucker and pre-ordered this.  He was out on the road when it arrived, so he asked me to charge it, update it, and play with it.  FUN!  I am not a trucker, but from what I hear from my brother, the tools on this device are awesome.  It looks like it would be very helpful for him.  The thing is huge, a 7" screen!  Overall, this seems to be a great tool.My problem with it is that it cannot update.  I have a brand new computer running Windows 7 64 bit.  It's a Dell Studio XPS 8100 (i5 processor).  After reading on forums and contacting Rand McNally, I have learned that Windows 7 does not send enough power to the USB ports to allow the TND 700 to go into "connected" mode when it's plugged in to a computer.  Supposedly this is a problem that occurs mostly with laptops and some Dell systems ("Dell Latitude or Inspiron PC (it may occur on other models as well)").  Rand McNally send a very helpful email with some solutions to the problem, though it sounds like they are still unsure of all fixes or what causes the problem.  I am disappointed that a brand new device does not work with a brand new operating system, though that seems to be the nature of all things now-a-days.  I am hoping that it will update on my brother's XP laptop. we'll see when he gets back home.
Well as one of the first to get this I figured I'd give a review. The screen is great. It's pretty clear and seems tough enough not to need a screen protector. The plastic that was on the screen out-of-the-box left glue residue which was a pain to remove. It comes with a stylus that works great but navigating around with your finger is easy and works just fine. I usually just have to tap it with the back of my finger. When you get it, charge it for a few hours before you use it at all. I'm not sure if my over sized good laptop even was charging it. So use the wall outlet. It comes with nice cables for both wall outlet and 12 volt, as well as a good usb cable. The supplied mount is excellent and easy to use. No tools required. The screen part snaps into another flat part on the mount and you have to make sure it's clicked in all the way or it will drop out.. AFTER IT IS FULLY CHARGED, plug it in the pc and get your first free lifetime update. The software loads fine and tries to start up each time you use the computer. I stopped that and made a shortcut to start it myself. There are no options I saw to disable it from auto starting... I used ccleaner/tools/startup to disable it. The program DOES use a lot of resources when running, but you only need to update once in a while.My first drive with it was Tampa to El Paso. It saves my height, width, weight and hazmat class. I was hauling hazmat. It gave a killer route that would have saved time but I had to alter it for the company fuel stops and routes. It tells you everything you need to know. Where travel centers are and what they have, scales and weigh stations and much more which can all be symbols on the map if you wish. YAY now i don't have to buy an iphone. Some stuff in the manual says parts are for future use so I'm guessing the updates are going to give even more. You can manually adjust the zoom. The automatic screen zooming works great. One time it was dark and cloudy with a cool looking sky and I looked at my screen and saw the exact same thing as I approached a ramp. You can save all your addresses and stops and put notes in them for phone numbers and gate codes etc. Then make groups (folders) for your addresses so you can find them even quicker. I sat there for 9 hours like a jerk and typed in all the company terminals and drop yards. It was fun. I'm saving each new stop now with notes too.Once the GPS kinda got confused and mixed up my current rout with a completed one. It may have been my fault but I don't think so. I just restarted it real quick and it worked fine again.I also used it in my car. It's easy to switch between truck and car mode. I drive a medium large car and the 7 inch unit was a bit to big and did obstruct my view a little.The voice is fine and easy to adjust. The thing is nice and it works good. The traffic and road updates for life. I don't have to use internet or buy a netbook (with gps) and software... I'm happy I got it. I don't get lost anymore.I like the TND 700. I'd just like to tell Rand Mcnally that since we spent as much on this as for a laptop, please make this the best and keep updates and innovations coming to us for the next few years at least. I'm kinda expecting you to make the software on the unit and on the TND DOCK (pc software) a bit better. I'd also like to be able to set up routes INTERSTATE to INTERSTATE to INTERSTATE to FINAL in order to comply with company route solutions. Sometimes we can't take all those better routes the unit suggests. You can make this worthy of five stars with just a little more effort.  Well, I gotta haul A$$. Joe
I have had this TND700 since October. #1 IT IS VERY VERY VERY VERY SLOW!!! IT TAKES SO LONG TO RECALCULATE A ROUTE WHEN YOU MISS A TURN THAT YOU WILL PROBABLY MISS THE NEXT TURN ALSO!! On 1 regular trip it wants to route me 98 miles further than necessary. It shows truck restricted routes where there are none (Route US2 in Vermont & Route US1 bypass in Portsmouth, NH for 2 examples). Friday 03/11/11 it told me to go South when I knew I should go North. Another very irritating feature is that the "back" buttons are in different places in each screen. Near Waterbury Connecticut it shows the speed as 45 mph on I84 when in reality it i55 mph. The unit stopped working and I thought it was the 12 volt power cord so I got a return authorization and sent it back with the 12 volt cord. Rand McNally sent me a "refurbished" which still does not work because the power cord is bad. I had to pay the return shipping. It tracks state mileage for IFTA reporting but that too is inaccurate. In 500 miles it is off more than 25 miles. In short I would not recommend this to anyone.
I did a lot of comparison shopping and decided to buy the Rand McNally 7" GPS.  Has better graphics than Cobra 7".  It does have lane assist which is important when in large metro areas and need to be in correct lane for exits, etc Atlanta, GA.  I have read some of the negative comments written earlier and I do not have those problems.  Sure, sometimes it does not give the fastest or the simplest route but it has never sent me down a non truck route like all the prior gps i have had in the past.  I am a car carrier so I set truck size at 13' 8" and it has kept me from going down roads with 13'6" bridges.  The only negative comment I have is that it constantly changes map views from city to county to state way to often.  Other than this, I love the fact that:  1) it shows mileage to destination, arrival time (which you can change to time left),  2) shows the city, county and state you are current located (how often we truck drivers pull over at a rest area or truck stop and wonder what city we are located).  3) large 7" color screen for easy viewing and screen changes automatically for night time driving  4) list truck poi and non truck poi (wish Rand McNally had a feature that would let us send them an update for poi, maybe when we get at a Loves that use to be a Pilot, just tap on the screen and edit info, then when I connect gps to computer for weekly update the map will get updated.  5) able to update construction info by linking gps to computer and get updates given to Rand McNally by the states.  Unfortunately like usual  the states are mostly behind on updates given to Rand McNally.  This is where we the consumer should have the ability to tap screen and make corrections and send it to Rand McNally.  Many times I have gone into areas that it said "Construction Ahead" and no construction is being done because it has been completed.  6)  speed limits of highways and Interstates and shows your current speed just below it (also shows truck speed limits in red) Still the states have to report these limits to Rand McNally and as usual they are slow on reporting.  But still most of the time 95% it is correct.  7)  great truckers tools like driving hours left.  It automatically changes to driving when truck has moved for more than 1 mile and changes to off duty if it is idle for 15 minutes.  It lets you know when you have 1 hour left to drive and that driving time has expired. You reset every day manually.  Also have total hours worked for day and hours left to work for the week. You will have to manually override this sometimes because it doesn't distinguish off duty and on duty hours well, you have to manually tell it you are on duty.  I just manually configure at the end of the day.  The important one is driving hours and end of the week hours.  8)  service reminders for your perimeters you set, such as 8000 and 16000 services.  You reset manually when completed.  9)  able to set many multiple stops set and ability to add more stops in route  10) loud enough to hear spoken text to speech street names over engine noise (and believe me my truck is loud)  11) ability to save your own poi (I do it all the time)  12) it tells you when you are 3 miles from approaching a weight station (you can configure it up to 5 miles)  13) it tells you when you are 1 mile from state border and tells you when you cross border and what state you are in.  14) it tells you all mileage you driven that day and mileage by state and mileage by day.  saves info for 1 year.  Overall, this is definitely a truckers friend and I absolutely love this GPS.  A definite must buy.
This GPS ROCKS!! Dont even bother with other questionable units. The extra features alone make this one of the best GPS purchases you will ever make. There is too much to list, but it is one of my daily driving tools that I couldent live without. Sure it's a little spendy, but the updates are free and lifetime. The timers and logs feature alone saves me a lot of time and keeps me infrmed when my driving day is current and legal.
Thought the unit was going to be a good unit, but was I wrong very wrong. The unit has a bad probleum with the 12 volty pulg in. They replaced the unit once in 6 months and the second unit last about 8 months before it started giving me trouble, but would they stand behind it NO NO NO. They said it had been over a year since I had bought the first unit so it was not covered.  The person I talked with at the Tec centered knew very well what I was talking about. If I made something that cost as much and made claims of how great a unit it was I would stand behind it and if I knew of probleums with the 12 plug in I would come up with a fix.  So take your chances if you buy one from Rand McNally hope it last for you but I have my doughts. Have a friend this last week his started have the same probleum so I told him he had better send it in.
Well, what can I say.  I've had this unit in my truck for about four days now.  Prior to that I had a Garmin 755T non-truck GPS.  One of my favorite features in that unit was the ability to plan a route by determining mileage using the stop or via feature.  What I would do is using a map I would route myself several different ways forcing the unit by putting in stops or vias at different locations along the route, otherwise, like most GPS 's, it determines what it thinks is the best route.  I could add up to 10 Via's or stop points for each route and then based on mileage and other factors determine which is the best route to take.  Multiple stops and the ability to route was the most important reason for having the Garmin.  However it was not truck specific.  And considering I am now hauling strictly hazmat I wanted something that would take that into consideration.  After perusing various forums, review sites, and word-of-mouth my choices boiled down to the Garmin 465T or the RAND McNally Intelliroute TND 700.  Even though it was quite a bit more than the Garmin I chose the TND 700 for several reasons.  The main one being the extra screen size, and its ability to coordinate with the RAND McNally truck atlas and also its ease of updating.Now on to my first impression of the TND 700.  It seems to be an aesthetically pleasing and durably built unit.  The first thing I noticed was it's very slow to boot compared to my old Garmin.  Whether this is unique to the TND 700 or is common amongst all truck specific gps units I cannot tell, but it's really not that big of a deal.  The second thing I noticed was the overwhelming wealth of information put forth.  That might explain why the manual (available via the TND dock) is well over 100 pages long.....  There is somewhat of a learning curve with this unit.  The next thing I noticed was the complexity of entering routes.  As previously mentioned I like to force it into my preferred routing by the use of stops or vias.  That was a big no go with this unit.  While you can enter multiple stops or vias it is nowhere near as user-friendly as my old Garmin.  Furthermore there is no way you can determine total mileage on the route that you have chosen, as I could with the Garmin.  Totally flummoxed by what appeared to be an omission of one of the best routing tools a trucker could have I went online and verified through an expert source connected with RAND McNally that no, that feature was a couple updates down the line and was not available at this point.  Unbelievable.  Also forcing the unit to follow a specific route can be very challenging.  For a unit of this price, and feature laden, I find this totally unacceptable.  I am still mulling over selling this unit  and buying the Garmin 465T.  I really do like this GPS, the screen is magnificent, and the volume is awesome.Another thing I've noticed, which I do not think is unique to this unit, is some of the weird routing that it does.  I've never owned a truck specific GPS before but after playing with this one for a couple of days I get the impression that what RAND MacNally (and the others that use Navteq) has done is take a plain old car specific Navteq map and a road atlas with truck restrictions and made notifications on the map.  In most databases there is not a 100% thorough listing of every road in the country.  What I mean is that this unit will route you down roads you don't belong on.  Today while coming home it tried routing me on several  9 ton County roads.  What that means is that a truck is limited to 73280 unless the road is posted at 10 tons.  County roads do not have that restriction listed in the RAND McNally road atlas, so I believe that is why it is not listed.....  Also unacceptable in a unit of this price and sold as truck specific.  However I'd be willing to bet the other truck specific units are the same way as no one has ever done a truck specific version of NavTeq.Another bone I have to pick is the POI's. Not only the truck specific ones but the others all seem to be somewhat outdated.  I think the Garmin, at least the ones that I have used, are more current.  It would also be nice if I could add my own POI'sTo sum it up I will keep this unit a little longer to see if I can make it workable.  If not I will go back to Garmin.  I like the concept and I like the unit but at this point I'll have to say I am somewhat unimpressed.pros:Large screenterrific imagesoutstanding volumecons:inability to determine route mileage by multiple stops and viasa somewhat outdated POI information.Non-truck specific routings.Cost.
Great software; horrible hardware.  Replaced it with a 720.  Best GPS program on the market for truck drivers,IMO, but Rand McNally &#34;has no fix&#34; for the excessive and early death rate on the 700 and 710.  Still...it's a great program and  I bought the 720.  Hope they fixed the morbidity problem.....
I was real psyched when i got it and all the features are what i was looking for in a truck gps. Well that all went away real quick.1.The log feature and milage is inaccurate.2.The speed limits are way off all throughout the country.3.The screen is hard to read on sunny days.4 The  suction cup mount is clunky and comes loose constantly.5.It sent me over ebbers pass while trucking to Lake Tahoe last week.  (14% grade for 15 miles) I won't do that again.6. The power switch has recessed into the unit and will not turn back on.7.Called tech support about returning the unit and the guy barely spoke english.8.I expected better from rand mc'nally.
I'm a professional OTR truck driver, and I bought a TND 700 at a truck stop hoping to make my life easier.  Rand McNally, are you listening?First thing I did after charging it was connect it to my laptop and install the software and then attempt to update it.  The software detected a problem with my update and wanted my home address so I could be sent a patch on an SD card.  Hello?  I don't think I'm all that unusual; my home address is a PO box that a friend checks weekly and that I might get to check every six months or so.  I live in my truck and at truck stops.  If you need to make a patch available on an SD card then you should send the SD cards to the truck stops where the devices are sold.  I ran the update program multiple times until the program said that the TND 700 was completely updated.I programmed in the height (13'6"), the length (53') and the weight (80,000#) of my rig and told it that I preferred highways.  I was parked at a truck stop in the Cincinnati OH area.  My next pickup was about 15 miles down the same freeway but on the other side of it a couple of blocks.  My cell phone GPS (Sprint) said to get on the freeway to get to my pickup.  The TND 700 routed me thru 23 miles of residential streets before finally getting me to my pickup.  Very exciting, especially since every time I refused to turn down a street posted "No Trucks" the TND 700 took almost 5 minutes to figure a re-route, and it happened multiple times on that short trip.I decided to give it another chance.  After my pickup on the north side of Cincinnati just off of I-75 I needed to head to Phoenix AZ via I-71.  Easy route is to just hop on I-75 and drive west and south to the intersection of I-71.  Indeed, that is what my cell phone advised.  The TND 700, however, wanted to route me over surface streets across the city and pick up I-75 on the other side of the city.  I turned it off and the next time I passed a truck stop of the same chain I purchased it at I returned it and got my money back.I then spent $30 on a cheap printer.  Now I take a minute to set up my route on Google and print it out.  Hasn't gotten me lost yet over several cross country trips.
We got this GPS for my husband who is an (OTR) over the road trucker.  Very Impressed with the shipping time, it arrived a few days earlier than expected...  within a week of use however it started freezing up... could of just been a glitch in that unit.  Worked great when it worked!  Will work great for the normal person as well but does have the "trucker" option. (the big truck routes - tells you when a scale is coming up ect...)  Love the bigger screen, the ease of use, the ease of putting addresses into memory.  Nothing really bad to say about the unit with the exception of it freezing which is probably one in a million and that's just my luck.  I contacted the seller and within minutes of my email I received a email back with instructions for an exchange! VERY impressed all the way around!
I've had this for about 6 months now. This is the worst GPS I've owned out of 4. It very seldom picks the best, or shortest route. It will let you put in multiple stops, but you only get info to the NEXT one. If you don't like a route and put in a VIA, guess what you only get info to the new VIA, how am I supposed to know if the new route is better? Routing is unbelievably slow, I've had it take up to 30 minutes, then get it wrong. Adding things to the notes just puts it into one long line. How about putting a return so I can at least organize a little bit. Very cumbersome to use, it's of little or no use for long range trip planning. I wouldn't recommend this to anybody at any price.
Was fast and what was expected. Great condition. Only issue is the lifetime maps...cannot access them or purchase the pack.
Works ok, but I do not like the feel of the ear pieces, they are hard to keep on your ear, would not recommend.
I bought this for my daughter. I'm the writer she's the reader..so it fit. lolThis cover is beautiful, and sturdy. Makes the nook have the look and feel of a real book. And according to my daughter is inconspicuous in class. :)It's synthetic leather but it's very elegant. Also. It's not gender specific. My Son wouldn't feel embarrassed to carry it around. :)
This cover fits very nice, and looks like rich leather, fits my nook to a tea, also has extra pockets in it.
Very happy.with.my nook cover.  I want one with a different quote but this one is fine.  I love the cover.
Sending it back,they had in theirs ad as charger for Nook Color,it is not. The only good thing it came superfast. It is for black and white Nook. They over charge for it. Like twice as much for b&w; Nook,you can get at B&N;store. I now notice they don't  any longer put now it is for Nook Color.
Didn't work, had to send back
I need to buy my third power cord within 1 year.  I refuse to do so.  The Nook power cord is NOT designed to last and causes nothing but problems ... it's either discharging or not charging.  And, I'm dismayed that I cannot buy a Nook external charger to charge my Nook while on a 3 week vacation.  I'm giving up the Nook and going to a Kindle Fire.
Horrible! It doesn't charge my Nook at all! Do not buy this charger for your Nook. I want a refund.
Does not charde the Nook tablet or Nook color as states. Has een in touch with company for feedback and NOTHING...Never again
I received my power cord in a very quick manner and although I haven't opened it because it's for a friends Nook, I'm grateful the seller was able to get it to me so fast and in perfect condition.
It's doesn't charge my nook at all !! I want my money back! It's more like a phone charger & changes a phone so DO NOT BUY THIS !!
just what I needed!
My 11 year-old daughter saved her money for a long time to purchase an eBook reader. She finally selected a NOOK Touch and purchased the eBook (only) without the extended warranty. She selected the NOOK because of the plethora of free books offered for this platform and because of the touch screen display.The touch screen shattered after a week of light use. Unfortunately, this breakage is not covered under the normal NOOK warranty. She was devastated.I gave her the now-ancient Kindle 1 that we acquired in 2007. This Kindle has traveled extensively and seems absolutely bullet-proof.Neither my daughter nor I will purchase another NOOK. The NOOK Simple Touch is a piece of junk.
Just so you know ... you need to put something in front of the reader so the pages don't turn.  I think the &#34;pocket&#34; in front hits the glass and makes the page turn back (sometimes several pages).
Does not effect screen visibility, but a bit tricky to put on. I would recommend starting from the top edge and simultaneously press on to the screen while peeling off the backing.
Very nice.
Works great for my Nook, saves on grand kids ruining the nook. Will be buying more of the product again
Paid less than $5 for these protectors (99 for the product,  around $4 for shipping). Good to protect your nook from scratches on the screen. Cleaned the screen as instructed but still had a few air bubbles. Wished the protector fit the entire front of the nook (doesn't cover the black part of the screen) but again I only paid less than $5 for the protectors and happy to keep my nook clear of scratches.
These screen protectors fit the size of the screen, but I personally find them very hard to clean, and they seem to increase the glare of the screen.  They did arrive on time and as described.
I rated it 4 star because I didnt get the right cord to charge the nook. Was sent the wrong power cord and had to buy the right cord for almost the same price I bought the nook for.
This is my third cover since I've had my nook and this one brings my two-year-old Nook back to life. Sturdy, elegant, and better than the other options in the store or online. Even better than I expected. Love the inside pocket. I got a really great deal for this price.
The product claimed to be new but the outer packaging was extremely beat up so I had to take the product out of its case and gift it that way. The product looked new but the packaging was not presentable at all which in turn made me questions whether or not the product was actually new.
Excellent value for the money. Way nicer than I thought it would be. I am pleasantly surprised. I would recommend.
I already had a Nook Cover just like this one, it has been used regularly for the last 3-4 years and has worn out . I am so glad I found this on line, because they are not sold in stores anymore.I ordered this on a Thursday and received it on the following Monday!! Much sooner than I expected. Very happy with the product and service!
I was amazed at the price of this leather cover.  It is exactly the same as what youpay three times as much in the book store.  Well done Amazon
Recently gave a friend my Nook Color because I upgraded to the Nook HD+ so when I came to find a cover for my case I thought I would look for one for him friend also. Since hes a guy I figured he would want something basic and dark not to flashy and this is what I found. I myself also love this look and wish they had it for the HD+ also. This cover costs way more at Barnes and Noble and you're getting here for a steal who wouldn't love that.
This was an old size for an older Nook that was no longer sold in B&N. did not fit my Nook. There was no way to know this before purchase.
I received my purchase in perfect condition, The packaging was in great shape, and the product is brand new. You can tell that it is new because it is a bit stiff when you open it, as is any new book. Very happy with this product and would definitely buy again at this price.
Exactly as described, very fast shipping, it's perfect! Very happy with my purchase. I love that you can get hard to find items here for a very reasonable price.
The cover is snazzy looking if a bit stiff, probably due to the leather. I wish it had the extra little pockets that the original vinyl one had (from April 2012), made of the same material and color as the cover, with the lining as contrast, but, at least it has one pocket, good for the hand to slip into and hold the tablet with the cover bent backwards. I prefer the leather look one I had to the real leather, because it wasn't as stiff and was slightly less heavy.B&N; has the best covers for devices by far. This may come from their long experience with book publishers. They should make them for all devices. The 3 point holders are perfect, as is the construction of the cover. Whatever it's made of, it's well suited to the purpose.
Received the Nook cover in the time that was suppose to and the cover was in excellent condition. Was glad to be able to find this as it is not available in the stores any longer. Was pleased with the product and timely manner in which it was received.
I bought this nook really cheap, being a little obsolete,  so to find this cover still available was a great surprise! I was looking for a cheap generic one and this one was even cheaper, but is a genuine nook leather cover.  Great protection and looks great too.
I am very happy with my Nook tablet cover. The quality is very high and I really like the protection it offers my tablet.
Love the cover and it works great.  Could not believe the quality of the cover for the price I paid.
I bought this case because I loved the color and quote on it. I was extremely happy when it came due to the great quality of the leather and how durable it feels when you hold it. I have used it for over a year now and it is still in great condition. I would recommend this to anybody.
Received this cover awhile ago and I absolutely love it! It looks exactly like the picture and my nook fits very securely in it. Only thing that would make it better would maybe be a slot to hold a stylus and something to keep the cover closed. All in all I love love love it! This goes everywhere with me
I bought this cover for my girlfriend for Christmas. The only complaint she's had so far is the taking a photo with the case on. You have to kinda hold the flap in order to take it. That sounds pretty minor to me though.
what can i say? it's kate spade... that implies an attention to detail that should say it all... it does
Got a nook for my wife and figured a wall adapter would help her out.  This was a great price and works well.
This is a NOOK product and works as advertised. When I'm travelling without a laptop or don't have a computer around to recharge my Nook, this is great -- just plug it into any  110 outlet and plug in your Nook with it's cable. You can also sit there and continue reading while Nook charges-- very handy if someone else is hogging the computer. It could be my imagination, but Nook seems to charge faster this way rather than by going through computer. There was no color choice and the product I received is white.
I bought this item to replace the original charger that I'd lost. think is pricey and I was disappointed when I noticed the box only had the adapter, as the original box had both the plug and adapter. Don't buy just by the picture displayed, make sure to read the description. I am still missing the USB cable
Perfect for me so that I don't have to take my computer on travel just to charge my nook.  Works with the cord that came with my nook.
I purchased this plug to see if it would work with the Mediabridge Brand USB to Micro USB card that I had purchased, because after getting the cable, my tablet wouldn't charge plugged into just any outlet.  I have a NOOK Color, and that plug worked to charge the tablet.  So I saw this one (at the largest Mass Merchandising store) for half the price here at Amazon and purchased it to try.  And it works.  Charges my Toshiba Excite perfectly through the micro USB port.  Now I can leave my original plug and cable at home and use this Nook Plug and Mediabridge Cable at work.  Perfect!  No more cords in my purse.The Mediabridge cable I purchased:Mediabridge High Speed USB 2.0 - (Coiled) - A-Male to Micro-B CableFor under $20 I have an extra cable and plug to charge my Toshiba Excite.
now i can charge my nook anywhere, no need for pc. a touch pricey at about $10, but i'm happy.
I think the item was a quality item. The problem is that it is the wrong cover for my granddaughter's Nook.  Who knew there were different sizes of Nook?  I certainly didn't.
my third nook, my third lautner cover, nothing beats them. I would definitely purchase this cover for my nook again. Fits my Nook HD 7" perfectly
After reading other reviews and becoming worried about the cap popping off, I'm pleased to say that this has not been an issue with mine.  It's surprisingly handing to have a pen/stylus combo on hand at all times and the stylus part is very responsive.  I haven't had any problems yet with the stylus portion but I am a bit worried that it could pop off as I've had this problem with other styli.  The tip is a bit softer than other styli I've had so I'll be watching.  Otherwise though, I love this thing.
Provides HDMI interface and allows charger to be connected at the same time.  Now I can watch Netflix on my older, non internet ready HDtvs.  The Nook is so much faster than the TV's or my Blu-Ray player, I now us it to watch anywhere in the house.
THIS IS GREAT NOW I CAN WATCH THE MOVIES FROM MY NOOK ON MY TV THATS BADASS THAT IS COOL
You just plug it in and change the source on your display. Boom. Mirrored tablet.I haven't had any troubles with this since I've had it, and it's proven mighty useful. Want to watch some YouTube videos at a friend's place, but don't want to gather around a tiny screen? Just hook it up to the TV, use the YouTube app on your nook, and everyone's happy.
Works perfectly for tv viewing.
Great to be able to hook your nook up to TV and watch netflix, hbo-go, etc on it.  Cord could be a bit longer, but works okay - just have to have nook close to the tv.
It does exactly what is says.  Can't get any better than that!  Nice to be able to watch movies on the big screen as opposed to my little Nook screen!
I am using this with a Nook HD+. It works as described. The HD picture on my Samsung 52&#34; TV is excellent.
This is a must have for the nook.  You can project anything on your display to the tv such as netflix, applications such as games.No other tablet i know of does this at HD quality.  I use it like a DVR.
The cable is very wobbly and sometimes disconnects itself.The price is completely unfair and only works with the Nook HD and HD+
This product really works great but I found the following items you need to keep in mind:- You must have your power adapter connected for it to work...it plugs in the the bottom. It appears it needs power from the nook power adapter to operate.- The plug fits in loosely and you cannot move the Nook around much without holding the adapter in place.- On initial plugin it seems you need to rock it around to get the connection but then it seems solid.- It works with a 25ft high quality HDMI cable so you can put the NOOK across the room with you. Not tested with cheap cables.Warning...I found that my LG SmartTV 3D from a few years back does not work with this adapter but it does not seem to work with many things...bad software. This adapter works fine with other HDMI devices I have used like monitors and I am sure other TVs.Gave it five stars because it really is nice to extend the screen and use your Nook as a streaming server to your TV. Nice they made such a device.
Adapter does not work from the begining.It is absolit.Didl not have time to sent it back.Going to return it sioon.
adapter was so easy to hook up my 72 year old mother did it herself. she loves it. it works great.
This adaptor is real easy to setup and use right out of the box. I had not problem with it at all, it is well worth the purchase. I recommend this adaptor very much for viewing your Nook videos on your HDTV. I just disagree with other reviews on the length of the adaptor, I found it to be fairly adequate as to how and where it is connected to my TV. For me it was just right not too long or too short, I was able to place my Nook right below the connection on the TV stand, it did not fall or anything else, it is fine. Use your own judgement, I'm too busy watching my movies :)
This adapter easily connects my Nook HD 7&#34; to my HDTV through the HDMI cable.  This is good for traveling because it makes any hotel TV a potential smart TV so long as there is an accessible HDMI port.  It is also good for sharing photos from FB on a bigger screen. A bit pricey, but a good accessory to have.  Be sure to note that this is ONLY for the Nook HD and HD+ series.  It will not work with a standard Nook.
Great screen protector! I took it to the store to have them install it and there are no bubbles at all. If I had done it there would have been lots of bubbles. LOL
I barely touched my Tablet until I got screen protectors because I was terrified I would completely wreck the screen since, screens seem to be allergic to me. I bought this type (anti glare) for the same price as non anti glare, & I went to B&N where the nice NOOK staff put mine on for me. So far no scratches & its doing great protecting my screen! My only complaint, why I rate this as 4 stars, is that I have to clean the screen even with the cover fairly frequently because its beyond easy to leave finger smudges all over it even with clean hands. I dont mind though. If im too lazy to clean the screen I just place my hand flat on it & run my hand across evenly so that everything turns into one big smudge that I can see fine through :P. I definitely recommend this product.
These were very easy to apply and they are lasting through my daughters. I am very pleased with the product!
GREAT EARPHONES, CLEAR, AND VERY LITTLE DISTORTION.. I WOULD RECOMMEND THESE TO ANYONE WITH A NOOK OR KINDLE. I RECOMMEND THIS PRODUCT
There was nothing wrong with my original charger, just needed an extra one for travel.  It works just as well as the original.
The power cable came in and worked perfectly. I recommend purchasing from Barnes & Noble and I will probably in the future.
This product is not universal. It only works for nook hd. My recommendation is to not buy this unless you have a nook hd.
Works well, a little pricey I think for a charging cable, but then again, not losing the original would be a lot cheaper than any replacement
This cord helps me have two locations to plug the Nook in to charge.  My only suggestion is that the cord be a little longer.
It didn't take me too long and it was exactly what i wanted in good conditions! I recommend it :)
Proprietary connectors are a pain to deal with.  The could have used a standardized connector, but no, they'd rather gouge you for $50 instead.  This connector itself is cheap, and doesn't really lock-in as well as other 30-pin connectors.  The charging cable alone is reason enough to buy another brand of tablet.  Extremely dis-satisfied with the price to value ratio.
The equipment was in new condition and worked perfectly but it took forever and ever to get it to me.
very good , i like thank.... it work good and so maybe send for a other one yes thank again
Same charger can be bought at Barnes & Noble for half the price. What gives? I understand they are your competition and all, but seriously?
True BN OEM will buy again. You have to get OEM chargers with Nooks, otherwise it's money and time wasted.
it does what I wanted and is a backup to my original one as these are virtually unobtainable with the USB lead in Europe. It was expensive but I could find no alternative.
As expected, power kit was exactly what was needed.  Nice to have an extra power kit for work and home.
Apparently these chargers, for Nook HDs, are not the kind of things that you can just look for the cheapest one. Something to do with needing a lot of power to charge them.The first knock off charger that I bought didn't work. you have to get the Barnes and Noble brand, and amazon has the best price that I could find.So if you have a nook HD, this is the charger that you want.
This is a good beefy 2 amp charger, but it covers two outlets on a power strip. It's ok in a regular wall outlet. The best thing is it uses a standard USB connector so it can charge more than just a Nook (I have a Kindle Fire HD+).
thanks now I can play with my tablet and charger it so it was a great deal and now it works
Works as expected.  The original burn out, how I don't know.  But I needed a new one fast vey fast.
Fast Shipment!!! I would definitely recommend.to friends and family to buy as a back charger so you have something to recharge the Nook HD and HD+.
The charger works perfectly! .my original charger that came with my nook never worked very well it ended up breaking. I ordered this one and got a few days later.
bought for a spare for my 9&#34; Nook HD and it fit perfectly.  Very satisfied with the price much less than on the BN site
It works.
This unit did not fit my Kindle.  However I am keeping it in case I buy another Kindle.  Hard to know what applies
Lost my charger for my Nook.  Purchased this one and it works as good as the one that can with my Nook.Thanks for a Great Product and Great Price.
This item is just as was described in the original description, works without any issues to be seen. Good product
The universal power kit charges my son's Nook HD as well as the original one that came with the Nook. My son's Nook has continued to charge every time it is connected to the charger for the past 2 weeks. Very pleased with product.
Go to Target or Barnes and Noble instead, and pay $25 (which is still a huge markup, considering they make the thing for 50 cents.) This is the worst option if you need one of these. It's price gouging, pure and simple.
My son crewed my HD charger cord so I needed another one, this is exactly like the one my son destroyed.
I lost my B&N original cable.  I looked around for an new one.  I tried  a different, cheaper model but it didn't fit my device properly so back to the drawing board.  I ordered this one.  I am satisfied.  It works exactly as expected and fits perfectly.  I would recommend this product to anyone looking for a spare or in lieu of the original usb cable adapter.
Shipped quickly.  I ordered the incorrect part and will return it, but that was my fault.  I should know the name/specifications of my charging cord.  Too bad, it was an excellent price!
It does 2A and charges a DEAD Nook in a few hours. It does so with a LOT of heat, compared to most wall worts. I have a dual charger where 1 port is 2.1A and the other is 1A for total output of 3.1A that doesn't run as hot as this. And i use that to power a raspberry pi to avoid needing a powered hubIt does the job adequately as it's designed to. Just hot. I would always unplug it if not using (even though it cools off) because of the amount of heat made. The nook hd+ runs hot too right where you hold it on the left side in portrait, but not so much when charging. I guess it's better to have it at the plug.
Lost my charger. Found this one for less than half the price of one from B & N. Having a spare is great.
Perfect...Nook brand so exactly what was needed!  Price OK, but probably can't do much better being a branded product like that...
It works perfect, puppy chewed last one and I can't till any difference at all. The price was great and it came before they said it would.
Very happy to have been able to find a charger for my daughters nook.  It wasn't easy at the store but thanks to you guys having this on here I was able to get her a new one.  Thanks
This was the wrong power kit.  I had to return it.  :(  I am sure if it was the right one I would love it.
Somehow this cord feels better built than the one that originally came with my nook. It is about the same length but if you pair it with a stand of some sort you can charge and watch a movie or read a book at the same time.
Needed a second Nook charger to leave in my travel charger case, so I wouldn't have to keep moving it around.
I looked high and low from Wal-Mart all the way tho Barnes & Noble and could not find a charger for my daughter Nook. Thank god you guys was right on time!not only did you have it I bought a used one and it works just as well as a brand new one.#1satisfiedcustomer
the power power plug works real good. Very satisfied with it. I use it a lot. Glad I got it.
Lost the charger that came whith my nook.  Barns and Noble wanted about $30.00 for this charger. This one worls like a charm.
I like that it does everything that it is suppose to do and the price was much better than with Barnes and Noble.
Nook charger - exactly what I was looking for and reasonably priced - just wish we could find them at the store where Nook was purchased
After going to B&N to pick up a charger and seeing the large price tag I found this charger. Works great!! Haven't had any problems!
Item works exactly as described with no problems so far. The charger is exactly the same as the original that'd you get from Barnes and Noble.
I bought this to protect my Nook HD at work and it is a tough little case. I like that it has the clips instead of soft ridges and it snaps around the shell of the Nook perfectly.
I would suggest this stylus for any nook user.  I love the color. The red is bright and funIlike the fact that it stays in center of the  nook cover
It is perfect. Just the right size. Works good. The tipis soft I thought it would work on my other touch digitals but it didn't.
A very nice functional and lightweight cover for the Nook HD+.  It works very well, and makes a nice accessory to the nook.
Someone showed us an older case that was all leather, which is what I thought this would be. So, this is different but it works.
I'm using this stylus to write this review on my NOOK tablet!  It fits perfectly into my hand, like a pen would onto a page.  It feels soft and just a bit flexible.  It has a clip if you want to secure it on the cover of your tablet.  Granted, it is a bit more expensive,, but I believe you will find the money is well spent.
The case looks as described. (Although for better photos, I would go directly to Barnes and Noble's site.) The main visual disparity is the color. In real life, the case is definitely a classic highlighter yellow, but on the screen, the yellow seems a bit more pale and muted. The sleep/wake function when you open and close the case works as described.The main thing that made this 4 stars instead of 5 for me is how the case doesn't stay shut. Unlike other smart covers (like for iPads), this one doesn't have a magnet to keep the case closed. Otherwise, it's great. It adds a teeny bit of bulk, but it's not offputting. It was also very easy to snap the tablet into the case.
Bought it for my daughter in her Nook.  Worked out perfectly and beautiful design.  Brand and and great shape.  Thanks
Item exactly as described.  There was a bit of a mix up on shipping the initial order, but they went out of their way to make it right.  Would absolutely use again.
Software is not the full program they want to spent another hundred for the full version. Expensive in my thinking.
Got this to use with my old Dell Inspiron 1720 during a long trip with final projects coming due. It worked great and didn't get too hot.
Insane convenience and quality for the price paid. Works precisely as the home power brick works. Stays in the car always.
I used the 68HCS12 microcontroller for school in a Embedded Systems class and I wanted an EVB to play around with. The HCS12 is pretty easy to work with if you can keep the registers in order (in your head) It has many of the features you might need like I/O compare, ADC, Timer, (I use these the most).. The board comes with an bread board attachment which can be handy. When it came it looked brand new straight from Axion. I bought an serial to USB cable from "plugable" which I would recommend if your laptop does not have D9 port. I installed the Serial to USB driver. Hooked up the EVB. Installed HCS12 compiler and loader. Found the Serial Channel and loaded a program in the CD and it was running in about 15 minutes. So I know it works of of basic programs. I am looking into getting Codewarrior for HCS12. They do have code size restriuctions which I think is kind of dirty but there are ways around it. It would help programming the Chip(writing in Assembly is hell). Make sure you read the data sheet of freescale to see if the chip works for your needs. This chip only has 4K EEPROM memory 512K Byte Flash, EEPROM 14K Byte SRAM, which I think is enough for programming a cheap robot to detect landmines. Great buy for 20 bucks. get plugable serial to USB..It works great too.. Happy Engineering
Didn't expect much from an IFSTA published product and wasn't disappointed.  Like all their material it was okay, not great.  I felt I gained more in my prep for promotion test by reviewing my notes rather than using these tests.
Very good material and in test form, this also helps the mind get ready for the real thing. Helps in real world testing.
I had a promotional exam and used this Building Construction software. I am now number 1 on the promotional list and will become the city's newest fire inspector next month. Highly recommend.
excellent  7"  inches  navigation  system , works  great  it's  fast  with  samsung  cpu  chip  and  accurate  , nice  and  lite , it's very  easy  to  use ,it's  made  in  usa  , in  my  oppinium  well  worth  the  price ..so i  recomend  these  to  all  out  there  on  amazon who  want  a  nice  gps .
I bought this GPS because of the 7" display. It's large and easy to see on my semi-tractor dash. The problem is that the antenna couldn't pick up a signal reliably. It would often drop out for 30-45 minutes at a time. I called the supplier in LA repeatedly and he promised to send an external antenna but never delivered.I finally gave it away and bought a Magellan 1475T. It's a bit smaller but it works perfectly!
It is the year 2005. The 21st Century. We've put men on the moon. We've launched space probes to the edges of our solar system. We can even remotely drive little vehicles along the surfaces of other planets.But we can't design a simply on/off button.The on/off button for the Blue Logger is one of the most insanely stupid things I've ever encountered. Some mentally-challenged engineer somewhere decided that you have to hold the button 2-4 seconds to turn it on, and 2-4 seconds to turn it off.It doesn't *sound* that difficult to do, but in practice it is infuriating, especially when you are trying to turn it on but end up turning it off. Right now the Blue Logger is sitting in front of me and I cannot turn it off. It simply will not turn off.Oh, and I've had lots of problems connecting it to my Bluetooth adapter, and have yet to get Street Atlas USA 2005 to recognize it.
The first peron to review this incorrectly stated that it doesn't come with software for handhleds. That person chose to buy it without and save some $$ and then complained about having to pay extra for it because he/she bought the wrong software package.  Delorme did the right thing and offered us options.  I just ordered mine and I have no plans on using with a HH so I'm very happy that I didn't have to buy the HH software.  Just don't be dumb and read what you are buying before you buy it.  Nemerous people have highly recommended this to me, although I have heard that MS Mappoint has better maps and should be used instead when you have it as an option.  Storing 50,000 data points without a connection to a computer is awesome.  I will be able to take the unit with me on a bike ride and analize the workout later hopefully looking at the route, elevation, etc.  Too bad it is only in Yellow...
I agree with all the other feedback saying this product is faulty.  The on/off button is terrible.  It takes 5 tries to turn the unit off.  After 5 months of using this, the unit would no longer "talk" with the satellites.  I sent it back to DeLorme.  It tested bad.  Now I have waited 6 weeks for a replacement that is backordered.  Customer service rep will not refund your purchase after 30 days!  The software claims it will compute driving routes for you...but it will crash your PDA instead.  I had to buy INav IGuidance software (which is outstanding) to get software that will actually compute road routes for me.  I would not recommend this product to anyone.  It has been a complete waste of money for me.
I am very disappointed in this product. I purchased the Blue Logger to use with a new Dell Axim X51v (which I purchased to use with the Blue Logger). I found that I could not make a Blue Tooth Connection between the Blue Logger and the handheld computer. I contacted Delorme & was told "At this time we do not offer any support or updates for Windows Mobile 5.0.  Hopefully in the future we will be able to offer updates for compatibility but currently there is no timeframe." What a ripoff. Delorme has a product that is not even compatible with the present PC Handheld operating system.I have also found that I cannot upload routes created on Street Atlas 2006 to the hand held. Basically I have a little electronic map with no functionality.
I bought the blue logger and both Street atlas 2005 and SA2005 HH for my Dell X50V. No problem with the Blue Logger GPS but my complaints are as follows:1. Delorme did not include the Blue Logger Manager software on the HH. Now they want to sell it separately for additional $39. Very Weird marketing strategy indeed.2. The software for the pocket PC is very difficult to use, not very intuitive. It seems the hand held software was developed as an afterthought from the software for the pc. It is poorly designed, and appeared was not fully tested by normal users prior to releasing to market.3. It is very cumbersome and slow to determine a route. Even with a 620 MHz Axim, it is slow. Worse yet, the route is often wrong. FOr example, this afternoon I use SA2005 to determine a route to a friend's house. Had I followed that route, I would come to a dead end street and have to back track about 10 miles to get to another correct route to my destination. Luckily, I decided to use my paper map. Later, I tried Microsoft Mapping on the internet and it actually gave me the correct routing. Last week for another location, SA2005 found the wrong location for a given address which would take me about 4 miles off. Luckily, I knew where it was and ignored the routing from SA2005 HH.4. Many other mapping softwares for HH will allow one to use it with 1 hand and often with the finger. But not with SA2005 HH. After 2 weeks of using it, I found myself going back to my old paper map. For example, if I had not calculated a route and just simply use the GPS and map to travel, the software only show the street I was on but no name given and no street name shown for upcoming cross streets. It does not help when you are lost.5. SA2005 maps seems to be several years old and not very up to date. I guess that's why Delorme does not want to clearly advertise this issue.I am seriously considering giving up SA2005 and consider this as my $50 learning mistake, and looking at Microsoft Street & Trip 2005 or later in 1Q 2005, IGuidance who is supposed to have the latest map.I am not alone in this as several other users have also complained on delorme user forum. I wish I had read that forum before buying Delorme software. Well, Live and Learn.
I have bought several Blue Loggers along with some other hardware and software, notably GPS PostPro, DeLorme's software that will postprocess GPS data to make more accurate positional measurements.The point of postprocessing is to use data acquired over minutes or hours, for example by the Blue Logger, and do calculations after the fact comparing these data to data logged at fixed GPS observing stations around the USA or world. You can measure a point to a few inches, when things go well.If you spend thousands of dollars you can get a nice GPS receiver and software for doing this, like surveyors do. The Blue Logger and PostPro let you do the same thing, though not quite as precisely, for a few hundred dollars. You can't use just any GPS receiver - it has to record information separately for every GPS satellite.So, the Blue Logger is the only product out there that can do this unless you spend thousands.On the plus side is the fact that this is even possible. And, the Logger feels like a nice solid little device.On the minus side, though, Blue Loggers just barely work. They're probably the most unreliable and difficult electronic product I've ever tried to use. They keep malfunctioning. To make matters worse, I bet other companies that might have tried to put similar products out there would not want to now, because these things are convincing consumers that postprocessing is difficult.I keep using them because I really want the results, but I curse their unreliability every time I do. And this would have been such a perfect product, if they'd made them work right.I gave them a moderate rating because it's great that there is any product out there at all for doing this. If there were competing products I'd have to give Blue Loggers a thumbs down completely.If you want to see bright people struggling bravely with a cursed and evil product, go look at the Blue Logger Receiver forum at delorme.com.
I am trying to get this to work for the last 2 weeks ... unfortunately without success. I bought the bundle #3 (Bluelogger & Street Atlas 2005 & Street Atlas 2005 Handheld). The installation went fine, but I had problems in hooking up to bluetooth. I had to reset my HP iPAQ 2215 several times in this process and my IBM T30 (2.4 GHz and with 1GB RAM) was very slow ... not sure why this was.Once I got the laptop to work, I took the Blue Logger out for a trip and downloaded the trip when I returned. Well, I coudn't make sense out the data the Blue Logger logged - the waypoints were almost all over the map. This was not the route I took.I am still within the 30-day risk-free guarantee and try to return it next week.
I bought this the day it first became available in 2006 and have been using it on and off ever since because I always thought the problem was the bluetooth connection on my computer. Now that I have a newer computer, I see that the problem truly has been with blue logger and not my computer.As a logger, it is fairly difficult to use. If you don't get all the settings exactly right in the blue logger manager software, it will give you odd results. Or none at all. The manager software is terrible.When it's working, it performs as expected. The tricky thing always seems to be to get it to the point where it will actually perform - either as a logger or as a serial device for Street Atlas. Just don't turn it or street atlas off, or you have to fiddle with it again.This has probably been one of the must frustrating techno-gadget experiences of my life, and I'm usually pretty good at figuring these kinds of things out. I was an early adopter of a unit that was fairly new technology at the time. Now every smart phone comes with GPS and bluetooth that just works. The unit is still being sold today. Sometimes, it's nice to have something that just logs. I'm sure there are newer gadgets out there that do a far superior job of logging to this outmoded and no-longer relevant unit. Save yourself a world of hassle and buy something other than this.
I have used this device for over a year.  It is an acceptable GPS device but loses the logging function whenever it is turned off.  To enable logging, you then have to use the computer software to enable it.  This makes it useless as logger unless you set it and immediately use it.  If you turn it off, it loses the data.  I have returned it to Delorme for service and was assured it functions perfectly.  I assume they are referrring to the GPS function.  It is no better than a paper weight as a logger.  If you want one, buy mine.  Delorme turned me down when I offered to sell it to them at half price.
i have so for used inav iguidance,mapopolis,navigon navigator 5 and The Blue Logger & Street Atlas USA .out of all these The Blue Logger & Street Atlas USA is the worst and inav iguidance 2.1.1 is the best  .blue logger gps hardware is good but v impractical to use bcuz of its strange onoff button....i will not recommend it to anyone....simply waste of time and money
A wonderful opportunity to obtain a copy of the complete Arp Atlas together with additional supporting data. This work provides a fine opportunity for insight into the outstanding work of a premier American observational astronomer who unfortunately has been forced to continue his outstanding research in Europe. Dr Arp's career spans the galactic observational period from his early days working with Hubble to the present time and we are indebted to him for exploring the many anomalies  present in current red-shift  interpretations.
I like to keep my screens clean, from my laptop to my iPod, GPS, Kindle, digital cameras and more. However it can be difficult when traveling since I don't want to carry bottles of cleaning fluid in my luggage.  These pre-packaged wipes are really nice to have an easy to carry around.First I start with the wet wipe to remove grease and dirt, then I remove the moisture with the dry wipe.  You want to practice with it in order to not leave any streaks but it's not too difficult to do. The wet wipes are not only good for screens but they take figure prints off the exterior on my laptop.  I still use my bottle of cleaning liquid and cleaning clothes for my flat screen television since it is too big for these small tissues.  However, for traveling these are great!
I use these for my computer, iPad, iPhone, gps watch, etc. Love that there is one wet and one dry. Excellent product!
These clean my tablet screen and laptop screens like nothing else - they do the BEST JOB! I Love Them!
The price for 6 disposable wipes is 7 bucks.. you gotta be outta yer mind...Zeiss wipes...14 bucks.. you get 200...So what makes these worth over a dollar each?Nothing
Most of these individually wrapped wipes are dried up when I open them. I have bought these elsewhere and have been happy with them as they work very well to clean my computer screen. Not so with these since they don't work at all when they are dry. The only thing I can figure is that these are old stock.
Ran this stuff to a few rooms for both long speaker runs as well as for line level connections (tape/aux).  Both worked very well.
Cable seems to be very sturdy but it was harder to install because the spool it came on was all broken so it didn't just unwind.
Works great. Instructions were straightforward and easy to follow. Buying a second one just in case I need it in the future.
My boyfriend and I spent hours looking for the one I wanted. We came across this one and it was cheap!  After reading lots of reviews I didn't expect much from it, but it is perfect. It's holding my 32 inch Vizio  tv in my bedroom perfectly. My boyfriend did tighten lots of different bolts on it after it was up so it would be completely level. I think the people that say it sags didn't do this. He did use his own level and not the one it came with. I helped him when he did this. I held the tv in the position that made it level and he tightened lots of stuff until it held it there. I have had it up for a couple months with no problem. I love it. Perfect for the price. The hardest part was finding the stud. My apt complex had them every 22 inches on the wall I wanted it on:/
Awesome price and quality. Simple and easy to install and fully equipped for installation. If you need a swing arm mount for medium size tv this is one I'd recommend.
This stand fit perfectly in my brothers room. His tv was just sitting on top of his burow taking up space, so I bought this to create more room and it was just what he needed. Having the adjustable arms make it easy to swing the tv around to different angles and such. Well worth the $25.00
when i first bought this didn't think it was really gonna work.  I have a 32 inch tv though and this has been holding it for over two months and its still steady and equipped.  When you move the tv from side to side it shakes a little bit, but this is a good product for the price.  I am very pleased
My daughter came home from college and arranged her bedroom like her dorm room with a sitting area and a sleeping area. She likes to watch the one TV in both areas and this worked out perfect.  Adjusts easy and fit our 32&#34; flat screen without a problem.
This mount was a bargain and quality at the same time!  Easy to install and easy to hang the tv. The only thing I would recommend is to buy separate drywall mounts. I didn't feel comfortable using the ones that came with it, instead I bought 75lb mounts from my local hardware store and used them. Other than that, I love the mount!
2nd time i ordered this one . shipping much better this time. no problems. easy install. but be aware when you fold the mount flat there is a 1-2 inch difference between folding right or folding the mount left.
Very concerned over hanging a 46&#34; tv on the wall.  Got this mount due to low price.  Very impressed.  No doubt it will handle a 30# TV.  Allows full 90 degree rotation with 21&#34; from wall to centerline at maximum extension.
Great product for a great price and very easy to install. Installed a 32" and it looks good and works as described.
Lil complicated to put together but over all works, looks and feels great. Extends really far away from the wall
We bought this for a 55&#34; Vizio and it worked perfectly. I would buy it again and recommend it. Good quality.
Very happy with product very easy to install with all parts and instruction at my disposal .  Great price and shipping time was unbeatable , I would highly recommend to all family and friends !  thanks
Easy to follow, simple instructions.  Sturdy installation, plenty of movement.  Liked it so much I bought two more for other TVs.
Purchased for my sister to hang her TV on a wall and she and her boyfriend reported back to me that mount works great with the 42&#34; Vizio TV she got for Christmas and was up securely in no time.  I looked around in the retail stores and found that this mount was of similar quality at a much lower price.  What can I say, it does what it is supposed to do, was easy to setup, and is of good value.
It works great for our 42&#34; TV. It was very easy, It only took my husband and I about 30-40 minutes to install.
I looked at similar wall mounts at walmart & they were $125.  I was skeptical of this because it was so much cheaper, but my prior experience with amazon pushed me toward giving it a shot.  It's a solid piece of hardware - heavy gauge metal.  It was definitely higher quality than I would have expected for the price.  It's been on the wall a few months now with zero problems. Good product, great price!
Sturdy and durable craftsmanship. Bought for my grandma in Mexico, had it installed and works great. Has awesome mobility to enjoy your television from countless angles in your room.
The mount works, but it is unrefined compared to other brands out there. Purchased because it was on sale. just ok.
This is an exceptional tv wall mount. It is very easy to install. It comes with a variety of screws to match the back of the television. The mounting screws are improved and very adequate. It took longer to decide where to place it than it did to actually install the mount and television. The center of the two arms separate, making it very easy to hang and attach the television.  It is a great value and a quality product. Please be sure the hole pattern options match the tv set.
I am impressed with the solid design of this TV Wall Mount.  I think this weights more than the 26" TV it is supporting.  It also has lots of logical adjustments so leveling the TV isn't too difficult.  The one semi negative is that it takes a fair amount of force to reposition the TV.  This does assure the TV stays put but if you plan to move the TV on the stand a lot this may be a negative.  Overall I am pleased with the stand - it seems like a good value.
Bought this for a 55" Samsung Smart TV, and oh man, it's fantastic! I installed it without using a powerdrill, but I recommend using a socket wrench and most certainly a stud finder of some sort. Very easy-to-understand instructions.
Great product even for double or triple the price. Smooth articulation and solid craftsmanship. And it comes with e erything you Could need to get going. I'd happily but it again!
mounted correctly the first time - very easy - good support - would recommend to all - lots of features
I purchased 2 mounts a few days apart. They were both VideoSecure and were the same price.  I purchased this one 2nd thinking it was the same as the 1st, but it wasn't.  This isn't a bad mount and was easy to attach to the wall.  However, most Wall Mounts let you detach the plate that screws into the back of the TV.  This one doesn't; so once you attach to the wall you have to hold up the TV and have a 2nd person screw it on from the back. Not a  big deal, but most others including the 1st one I bought let you do this.Here's the other model.  Buy it instead!!VideoSecu LCD LED TV Wall Mount Full Motion with Swivel Articulating Arm for 23-37, up to 42 in TV Flat Panel Screen With VESA 200 100, 20 in extension and Post-installation Leveling System A35by VideoSecu
The fact that the pivot point on this TV mount was not built straight caused the TV to tilt slightly when it was swung out.  there is no adjustment for it, so i had to make a choice for the tv to either be straight and level when it was pushed against the wall, or when it was out.  i do not recommend this wall mount.to it's benefit though, it was reasonably sturdy and easy to install.
Warning, Do your homework before ordering a tv wall mount!!Mom and dad bought a 32 inch Seiki TV and needed it angled on the wall for optimum viewing. That is where I the eldest son came into the picture(pun intended).I knew in advance the location had plywood backing behind the drywall, which meant this mount would be easy to install as wood screws would be secure anywhere on the wall. But what if it was a typical installation, would there be a stud in the wall centered where needed to hold the tv and mount securely? It seems unlikely most people would, so what are the options?Option #1. Buy a different mount with a mounting plate rather than small 2 hole bracket as on this model. If you don't know what I am talking about, look at other tv wall mounts and you will see on many of these a large wall plate that can easily cover an area with at least one stud, and addtionally allow drywall anchors elsewhere on the plate to handle the weight of any tv. This model has only a small wall bracket with holes for 2 screws or anchors.Option #2. Use wall anchors. Again, there are only 2 holes in this bracket so take into account the weight of the tv and the rating of the anchors. Proceed at your own risk.Option #3. Install a stud. You're on your own with this...The mount is well made, everything fits and it looks good but as mentioned, a little homework will save you time and make installation easy.I hope this review is useful. :-)
I am usually leery of &#34;universal&#34; tools of any kind, but this one actually worked pretty well. Sturdy, fairly easy to figure out how to install it (I am one of those guys that never wants to read the directions) so, I am happy with th emount.If only the TV was as good.
Didn't think it would work as well as it has,because the metal was a lighter guage thanwe expected, but it hardly deflected from theweight of the TV, even extended straight out.
Fit my TV perfectly, a snap to install on both TV and wall. I can now watch my TV at any angle I please
You can't get a better bracket for the money.  Actually worth twice as much. Easy to install.  All necessary parts included.  I mounted my 32" TV in 1/2 hour.  It's easier if you have someone to help you, but you can do it yourself.  I believe the instructions say to install the entire bracket to the wall and then attach the TV.  I separated the part that attaches to the TV and then only had to secure one bolt to the arm which I believe is much easier.  Overall, this product is better than advertised.
I won't lie, I bought this mount for the price. It fit well on my 40" Samsung led. It is very adjustable and once you get everything snuged down, it's quite secure. I gave it 4 stars because it sticks out way farther then what I would consider a "slim mount" and the arm location interferred with the video wires on the Samsung do I had to swing the arm the other direction which is less desirable for my setupAll and all I would buy again
For the price.....can't be beat.  I have two TV's hanging in the living room.  No issues, easy to hang.  I would recommend to a friend.
We purchased a new flat screen for our son at Christmas from Wal Mart.  Great TV.  The stand was $130.  This stand/mount was 1/4 the cost and works GREAT. EASY to install.  NEED two people.
Only gave this four stars because it's only supporting a 32&#34; TV. I think I would be scared to mount a 55&#34; TV on it. If you sprang for a 50&#34; or bigger TV, spend a little more on a properly rated mount. As with any TV mount, make sure you're hitting wall studs with the main screws, don't just use anchors in drywall or you're asking for trouble. LOTS of hardware included in the kit, so mounting any style or brand of TV shouldn't be a problem.
I really like this TV Wall Mount.  Is strong, compact, flexible and comes with everything you need (except tools of course). You get more than enough for the price. I definitely recomend it.
This was a great product this was the second wall mount we have ordered and both have worked out great! Will order again in the future!
I'd never bought one of these, mainly due to the high prices in the retail stores.  I hadn't looked online much, and hadn't really needed a monitor mounting device until recently.This thing is well built, and it does the job.  It's not fancy but if you are just looking for an inexpensive way to hang a monitor (TV or PC) on the wall this will do the job.  It comes with a nice bag of heavy-duty hardware.  It is primarily designed for mounting TV sets, but you can get it to work with a PC monitor, as long as it has the VESA mounting.It mainly articulates side-to-side and in-and-out.  It'll pivot a bit up and down, but that's limited.
I bought the uint for a 32 &#34; Tando.  I couldn't get the parts to line up so I bought another fixed type.
Product was easy to set up works very well. Product was a real good value.Product is very sturdyand well constructed'
This product was easy to install and fits a wide variety of tv's. It is built with heavy duty materials and not flimsy plastic. It is a great buy.
Go to a big box store and price this device , then come back here and buy it. I couldn't find ANY better deal and once I received the device I was even more impressed with the quality. It even has multiple kinds of mounting hardware so no need to go to  a hardware store, because your TV is unique.
Good price for compared to others from other stores it went up easy and have had no problems with it everything that it states it does it does and it saves a lot of space.
Did the job for my led tv! great support for my 40 inch tv. no problem with installing it either
This item is heavy duty , easy to assemble and great for the price. The instructions were plan and simple. This a wonderful product to purchase.
I have 3 swivel mounts and this one is not the best. If you don't use the swivel feature frequently or don't place it where it may be bumped it will do the job. I prefer the strength and stability offered by mounts which have TWO arms extending from a longer wall bracket. These more stable brackets can be found at similar or slightly higher prices. Also look for a feature which allows the TV Bracket (and TV) to be lifted off the swivel arm more conveniently.
Great bracket for the money. Easy to use and install. I have it above a chair in the basement, so it's been very reliable
This tv mount arrived on time, was easy to install and seems very durable.  I would not hesitate to purchase another one.  You will save alot of money by purchasing this mount, opposed to one in your local store(s).
This product was purchased as a gift. It is very well built and gave my brother no issues with installation.
I bought this for a gift for a friend.  They liked it so much that I decieded to get one for myself.
I bought this for my 55&#34; Samsung LCD LED TV. I mounted it on a wall and intended to use it extended to 180 degrees. At the 180 degree extension, there is very noticeable tilt, which gets worse each day, until the TV is tilting sort of comically. If you are just using it to watch a TV &#34;head-on&#34; the tilt probably won't matter to you, but if you are using it at any sort of angle for a large TV you will have the tilt problem. The arm is simply not designed properly to handle the 180 degree extension.Also, if you are new to this TV mount thing, note that this VESA 400 compatible mount will not necessarily work for your VESA 400 compatible TV. I discovered that not all VESA 400 mounts work with all VESA 400 TVs. I had to &#34;improvise&#34; to get this mount to work and could not use any of the mounting configurations in the instruction booklet. This problem had no bearing on the &#34;tilt&#34; problem described above. I don't really understand what the point is of listing VESA compatibility when it doesn't seem to actually indicate compatibility, but there must be some tech guru who has a complex and useless explanation for it somewhere.Otherwise, the installation was fairly easy. In about two hours I was able to get this attached to my wall, where it immediately began it's slow drooping progress toward the floor. I wish I had just kept the TV sitting on a table.
Now that it is installed it is fine.  But installation was a pain.  Unlike other similar low priced mounts, this does not have a separate plate that you mount to the TV then mount to the bracket.  You have to hold the TV up in position, align with bracket holes and start screws.  Try that on ladders 6 feet in the air,  with a 40 or 50 pound TV.  I bought some screws of proper size, cut off the head and used 2 as locating guides to get screw holes aligned.  Started 2 screws then replace my starter studs with screws. Made it easier but NOT easy.  Also adjustment is very difficult with TV installed.  Weight of TV binds the adjusting bracket when you loosen set screw.  I would NOT recommend this mount there are better choices.  I got an OMNIBasics OBFM60 mount for a similar price ( on clearance) and it was 5 STARS compared to this.
I had to use a hacksaw to cut away part of this to hang my 24&#34; LED TV in my bedroom. Other than that, seems to work fine.
I was hesitant about mounting my larger flat screen (47&#34; LG) onto the wall - what happens if it falls off!  After looking at mounts at Target and Best Buy that were $100+, would this possibly work?Fast forward...  The mount took about 20 minutes to install (too longer to locate the studs than mount it).  The TV is on the wall and works wonderfully.  Very solid mount and good articulation.My only comments are the cord clips included are very weak.  I will be replacing them with black cable ties.  Also - they do need to have a second locking screw where you hang the TV on the articulating mount - I can wiggle my screen (tilt) by about 1/4&#34; since there is only a screw on the bottom.Overall, I liked the narrow wall mount and the 20&#34; extension.  Definitely would recommend for a TV that is 47&#34;.
I just bought a 51" Samsung 3D plasma and needed a swivel mount that was built sturdy enough to pacify my concerns. Easy install. Wrks GR8T!! I RECOMMEND.
Bought three of these for a restaurant/bar.  Received the product in great condition.  Was a breeze to install.  My television is very light so I can not comment on using it under a heavy load.  Arm swings easily and stays where I put it.  Very happy with this purchase.
I bought 2 of these for about half of what it costs for one in a retail store. It works great and easy to install.
Ordered this for my Daughters room and love it more than the others I have bought for twice as much money!! Easy to install and rock soild!!My only issue would be that you have to lift the TV up to the mount and get it screwed into the mount.. (takes 2 people)
We have a 32 in flat screen that need to be hung and angled because of the ways our walls are and this did the job super well!
This is a very good product and it does what is says it does.  Seems well constructed and easy to install.  I do not have the "sagging" issue that some have reported.  It adjusts easily for proper angle for viewing.  I am overall please with the product and I do not hesitate to recommend it.
This is probably a good mount for lighter, smaller TVs, I just didn't trust the weight rating it noted.  My LCD is 60 lbs. and I didn't even finish unboxing this before I starting searching for another one.  Very thin, light metal that ended up costing me $11 in return shipping.  Spend a few bucks more and get a heavier mount like http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B001TICH08/ref=cm_cr_ryp_prd_img_sol_1
I consider myself to be a good DIYer. I've installed mounts for my 2 Samsung 46" and 55" LED TVs with no problems for 5 years. So, for this VideSecu mount, inspite of poor installation instructions, I carfeully measured all domensions to fit my new 32" Samsung LED SmartTV in a limited kitchen space. My mistake was, based on the diagrams, I assumed that the length of both the swinging arms of the mount (the single and the double arms) were of the same length. What a disaster! After installing the mount when I mounted the TV and folded the arms the TV did not center itself to the wall side of the mount! It was then that I noticed the inner length of the 2 arms is about 4" longer than the outer single arm. In other words once the arms on the mount were fully folded in towards the wall my TV was not centered in the limited space that I had and looked awful. I don't know why the manufacturer did not keep both arms the same length. At least they shd have mentioned it in the instructions.This to me is a major product defect. Luckily with Amazon I was able to return this mount but had to pay return S&H;.
This mount was a good price and it works great and was easy to install. I just purchased a 32" flat screen and it holds it with no problems.  I recommend this mount.

It does the job and it wasn't too hard to install so i'm a happy tv viewer. Nothing bad to say about it. Came with a bunch of bolt options for different make and model TV's
Easy to install...as described.  Makes it easy to see tv from anywhere in the room. Would buy this item again.
Not sure what to add except that is holding a vizio 48&#34; tv just great and allows us to move it around for viewing angles.  I would definitely buy this again.
I am extremely happy with this product and this entire purchase experience.  I bought a 32" LCD TV at Walmart and was shopping for a wall mount.  I searched everywhere, including Walmart but found that the fully articulating type that I wanted was $100 or more...everywhere.  I searched Amazon and found exactly what I was looking for...for 25 bucks!!!  Shipping was awesome...fast and free...killer bargain and killer product.  I liked it so much I bought another for the bedroom, I remove the top screw and can move the TV (with the bracket still on the back) from the bedroom to the poker room.  Very, very satisfied with everything about this purchase, the product, the delivery, and Amazon...I will never buy anything at a brick and mortar store before searching Amazon.
This stand holds up my hefty 40&#34; LCD TV quite well. I bought this mount because the new place I moved into built the studs too far apart for my other mount. This item seemed a little questionable, but I went with it because of the reviews. I'm glad I did! It isn't the sturdiest piece of equipment, but the TV doesn't sway around by itself and I'm not worrying about it whenever I leave the apartment. I don't know how well it would stand up to being run into or being in an earthquake, but then again if those are potential issues then maybe a wall mount isn't too ideal in the first place! The only thing that is a little inconvenient is the arm length. It will hold the TV out quite a ways from the wall, but it has trouble keeping the TV centered on the mounting stud while it's mostly compressed to the wall. Besides that, very good item.
This is the second VideoSecu mount I've purchased. Both were easy to install and show solid build quality, with no issues
The product seems to be of high quality.  The only problem I had was it covers some of the TV outputs to mount to the tv.  The problem could lie with the TV manfacturer. The TV Model is VIZIO E260MV 26-Inch Class Edge Lit Razor LED LCD HDTV .  I solved the problem with a metal cutting saw and some bracket modifications.  I am reasonably sure most people do not have this option, so care should be used when purchasing one or the other.
It's been great.  I would've given it 5 stars, but it was a little cumbersome to put up.  Other than that, we love it :)
This is my 3rd time purchasing this item. I love that it is adjustable to fit several models of televisions, sturdy, and will tilt and turn like you want/need it to. Have recommended it to anyone who is buying a flat screen tv, though many folks are impatient and cannot wait for it to arrive in the mail, which doesn't take that long. (You can always set it up on the self-contained stand until the wall mount arrives in less than a week.)They want their tv up NOW and purchase a more expensive wall mount that does LESS. Then when they see mine, they always say they should have listened to me.
Do not buy this for the Haier L32D1120 32" TV. It is not compatible with that TV. However, you can purchase "VESA adapter plates" for it. The Haier TV seems to require VESA 400x200, and this mount is only VESA 200 x 200.
Shipped promptly; exactly as advertised; well-made; perfect fit for our 32" LED HDTV; REASONABLY PRICED!  Anyone who can locate a wall-stud, read a level (included, no less!), run a drill, and turn a wrench clockwise should consider this wall-mount solution.
This is the second articulating TV mount I have ever purchased. The first cost a hundred bucks and I had to put it together myself. It took a couple of hours.This one was twenty five bucks and took ten minutes start to finish.If everything I bought was as good as this I would start to think life is fair. jk
I order all my mounts from Amazon for price and quality.  This is mount #4 and is the best. It comes fully assembled except for extension brackets if needed and already tensioned.  Very good quality and build. This my favorite mount!!
It is a really nice mount for the price.  I hung a 32' Vizio TV with it and it is working well. I would not go any larger then this TV.  I had to buy machine screw at the hardware store to fasten the mount to the TV.
Ordered this for a 39&#34; Insigna in the den, good quaility works great.  The only problem I had was that the bolt/hole pattern would not match up correctly.  With just a little creative thinking and only the items in the package I was able to make it work out.  For the price it was a deal have no worries about it at all.
Couldn't have been easier. Very easily adjusted. My TV was a 200X200 VESA, so I didn't have to use the extension arms.
Was nervous about spending so little on this device when others in stores are so expensive.I used it on a 32" flat screen and it worked PERFECTLY...never again will I spend the bigbucks for one of these again.
Very impressed with the quality and surprised by the price. Purchased three for flat screens. The largest is a 55 inch Samsung !
pros: fairly easy to install especially with the included tools.  Comes with various boltscons: the lag holes and bolts are too wide to fit a 2x4 stud with the center holes lined up with the center of the stud.  I would have been better if two of the three on the top and bottom were straight in to the stud and the other toenailed.  If you try to toenail the two on the bolts into the stud, they end up running into each other.
So I'm not an expert but i do like my gadgets. I asked for this wall mount as a Christmas present for my bedroom. it was very simple to put up. it holds my 32 inch Vizio tv with no problem whatsoever. the mount itself is made very well made and i am really happy with this product. oh, the price was a very big factor. Great price and a great deal also comes with a hdmi cable and a level.
This is great for the price and actually even better then expensive ones. I bought this for my 55in RCS and fit like a glove. Also, the instructions very easy to read and set up. I was able to hang my TV in less then 15 min. I am buying again for my addtional living room. For the price you cannot beat people.
Very well made, strong mount the only problem I have is the instructions are very poorly written or detailed. Pictures do not distinguish between Stud mount and concrete. Also the instructions do not tell you the size of the included boltsFor those of you who have never worked in the home building industry wall studs are usually 1.5 inches wide so this mount only requires 2 lag bolts in the middle holes to secure it to the wall to support a 23 lb TV. The four outboard holes on the wall mount are 1.3" apart so don't try to use them in a wall stud measuring 1.5" wide.Helpful hint: I have help install at least 6 other wall mounts because of family or friends so I cannot say that I am an expert but my suggestion is to drill pilot holes which the instructions do not tell you to do.After comparing the instructions on this unit to others I have installed I still must say that the pictures should have a lot more detail. Some complain that the back plate was too big for the TV they used but it's fits perfect on theLG 32LK450 32-Inch 1080p 60Hz LCD HDTVI am using it on.Works perfectly for the area of the room I am using it in which allows me to rearrange the room without the need to move the TV.
Always a little hesitant about buying something like this sight unseen.  After reading the reviews I decided to give it a try.  I was very pleasantly surprised. The stand was very heavy duty and installed easily. The HDMI cable that came with unit was a high quality gold tipped cable that works perfectly. The same cable was about $20 at target. This mount worked perfect to mount my 32" LCD TV in a wall corner location. This and the similar Units on Amazon are a fraction of the cost from local retailers and are just as good if not better. I would recommend this to anyone in need of a TV stand.
The mount purchased fit my tv perfectly and was easy to install. I would get another one when it comes time to mount another tv.
VERY HAPPY, it looks great, I'm so happy we got it. Holds good, it is a lil hard to get it to the wall. Other then that its fine I love how we have more room in our room. My husband is so happy I ordered this, it only cost us $28 free shipping and FAST(: VERY THANKFUL TO THE SELLER.
Great price and was super easy to install!  I am glad we found it before spending hundreds on a different wall mount.  This worked perfectly!
The only thing going for this item is the price.  Three of the hinge bolts had rust in it.  The arm comes apart at one of the hinges so you mount the bracket to the wall and the other bracket to the TV and then hang the TV back onto the hinge.  I had to struggle a bit to get the TV angle just right since there was quite a bit of binding between the hinge pin and the sleeve.  I couldn't free the TV either and reposition myself due to the binding.  Eventually, I powered through it and got the sleeve seated on the pin.  For a little of $20 for the mount, I'm not complaining too much though so I give it an average rating.
EXCEPTIONAL QUALITY, Best deal you can get for a TV mount. This is the second one I've purchased and it saved me at least a $80.
I found this to be a good product for the price.  If you need a nice, light weight mount, this is a good way to go.  Easy to install.
Works like a charm! Lies flat on the wall when I want it too and pulls out and swivels like a charm when I need it too!The instructions call for it to be mounted into a stud in the wall, however mine is mounted directly into the drywall using heavy duty anchors and it works perfect as well! This is a great product for an amazing price!
Well constructed, clear instructions and it ships with MANY different combinations of screws/adaptors for all televisions.  Was able to install/mount in 15 minutes.
This is the second VideoSecu product I have ordered. They are rock-solid, and with the range of fasteners and extra hardware they include in the package, it's hard to imagine any speaker or TV that these systems won't fit.
my tv! Couldn't ask for more. Thanks. These reviews require too many words. I could have said what I meant in three.
This is a very sturdy and high quality wall mount. The metal is indicative of much higher-priced models than the low price of this item. Once you have it mounted, it works great with a full range of motion and the tv feels very secure.The only problem I have is the installation process itself. You have to loosen all the nuts required for getting the range of motion, and it seems that the nuts were all tightened at the strongest-man-in-the-world competition. It was VERY difficult to get them to loosen initially.The other installation issue is that the extensions that are included to mount different size TVs did not align properly and the screws provided were the wrong height. The mount comes with a bunch of different screws with varying lengths and thickness, but none of them worked without modification. As a result of those two problems, I had to come up with a jury-rig solution to getting the four expansion pieces attached to our 400x400 TV (Sony Bravia). It's not a bad solution - putting the screw through one of the slats rather than an actual screw hole along with adding a couple washers to create tension with the too-long screws - but I'd rather it be truly universal as the description claims.But even with the installation difficulties, I'd still buy the product again because it's great quality for a low price.
I'm very happy with every aspect of this TV wall mount. I put up an Emerson 32 TV in a corner so it faces out at a 45 degree angle with about a 10 degree down tilt. This bracket allows for a lot of flexibility on angles in all directions, which makes it very versatile. It's solid, well built and easy to install. A no-brainer purchase.
Easy install and great design. The product was exactly what I thought it was going to be and just as as the picture shown.
We liked this item so much we bought another one and then bought one for my step dad. Awesome product!
The wall mount was east to assemble and works great. It didn't take long to install on the wall I selected.
This swing arm is awesome!  Very simple to put together!  Love that it's so easy to move to different positions!
I am pretty pleased with this mount. I have a 27" monitor fully extended from my wall, and it works perfectly. Just make sure you find the center of the stud.I don't think I would use this on anything above a 32" unless you were going to keep it closer to the wall most of the time.I don't think you can find a better mount for this price.Another tip, even if you are using a smaller monitor, just get this one. It is well built. The next step down is just shoddy construction.
This worked out great for mounting a 22 inch. LCD in our guest room.Very easy to mount and works great.Great price also.
What I received is more of a butterfly looking plate And therefore doesn't fit my tv without covering my inputs.  I am going to have to return it unless my dad can't use at his house.  Really bummed as I measured and thought I covered all my bases.  The item pictured looks like is would fit fine :(
We had bought a more expensive one......and returned it because it was so complicated.  This TV wall mount was easy to install.  We have it supporting our 40&#34; Samsung....we are so pleased with it.....highly recommend it!!
I bought a smaller version and was much happier with the movement.  This one does the job but I sometimes wonder if it will suddenly fall to the ground.  It is solid so I don't think that is fair it just gives me a funny feeling.  Fast Delivery, Good Price and I'm glad I bought it.
Works great, very happy with the purchased. Mounted our Vizio 40&#34; TV on the wall and has full motion. Easy to adjust and install.
All in all, it seems like a nice sturdy product, but the piece wouldn't rotate left to right at the end of the arm, so we had to return it. It said we needed to loosen it, but the factory screwed it so tight it wouldn't budge.
I am currently using this for a 46in LCD CRT RCA tv. It mounted easily and also attached to the tv easily. Motion is nice and is very sturdy. Feel perfectly comfortable trusting this on the wall
worked just like i wanted it to couldnt be happier ,would order it again quality product very very well made
It works as advertised. We had no trouble hanging it. We would purchase another one if we needed it. Good product.
as described
Mounting the TV after mounting on wall can be a handful.  It would have been nice to have some type of slide in mount for the TV so you did not have to hold it while putting in 4 screws.  That would make DIY one person installation easier.
Set up & installation took time, & NO written installation instructions, only 'pictures'.But like the way it works & that we could put our HD antenna directly on the back of it.Would recommend it to anyone wanting a good mount for a good price.
This mount works perfectly...I purchased one about two years ago for a small garage TV and now for a larger bedroom tv and they both were a breeze to install and they work great.Quality material for a great price!
I got this for mounting a tv on the wall in my home office. Price was good and it worked. The adjustments on it work well, and it has a gizmo to hold the cables in place. Don't hesitate to buy. I think I am using this with a 38&#34; tv.
I recently rigged up a treadmill workstation in my office and wanted to find a mount for my monitor so that I wasn't craning my neck downward toward my laptop when walking and working.  I researched a number of articulating arms and selected this one because of the reviews and the length of the arm itself.As other reviews have noted, the product is constructed of solid materials.  While heavy, it was easily installed by my organization's maintenance staff.  One downside to this product is that while the arm length and location is fairly easy to adjust, I have not been able to easily adjust the pitch of the monitor (angle of the monitor face relative to the ground).  Thankfully when installed it was at an appropriate level for my use and is not a big issue. Another very slight issue is that the arm has the slightest wiggle to it, so that, when the arm is fully extended the monitor is slightly off level.  This may be more an issue of installation than product, however.On the whole, I'm very pleased with the product, particularly at the price that I paid for it.
Excellent mount for an excellent price.Very sturdy; extends 24&#34;; folds up nicely.Some of the mechanisms are very stiff out of the box, but it's a simple matter to loosen them to whatever works best for you.
This wall mount is super affordable! I purchased 2, 1 for my room, 1 for the family room. The family room installed with no issues. The one in the bedroom had a small issue, we had to cut 2 in off the bottom legs to make it fit. These mounts are very adjustable and function well.
Great  , easy to install and very solid product good quality, I will recommend this for sure .  Get it !
I bought this, got it 2 days later, and installed it in about 15 min. It took me about 10 to find a bit to drill into the stud. I didnt even bother waiting for my husband to get home to help since I didnt need it. It came with a lot of extra screws to fit your tv just right. It works with both flat and curved television backs which I thought was handy and all the hardware to make it work for either.
This is a great wall mount.  I have installed three others and I like this the best.  It extends enough with the second arm so that you can mount a large TV so that it fits in the corner of a room.  The TV will hide the actual wall mount and arms mounting to the back of the TV.  This one was installed thru a plaster drywall into cinder block wall.  I used  the 2 wall anchors and bolts provided in the mounting accessory pack.  The 42&#34; TV bolt pattern fit the mounting plate so I did not have to use the adjustable arms provided in the package.  Total installation time was less than 20 minutes.  I like the fact that you can tilt it, rotate it (makes it easy to get the TV level)  and move it in and out a great distance and it will go back pretty flush to the wall.  The instructions are easy to follow.  Overall, I think this is a sturdy mount that will confidently hold a large screen TV and it does not look like a massive mount like some do.
Installed easily, has a nice long reach.  Attached a 32&#34; TV for the grandkids and it works out great. accomodates many different size TV's and was a very good price.
Good movement options, but VERY tight/stiff.  Hoping it will get a little easier with time and be less awkward to adjust.  Good deal for the price it seems so far.
This is a very sturdy product and fairly easy to install.  This item is a fraction of the cost of most store products and much better quality!
That hardest thing about installing this was finding the wall stud, everything else was a snap.Using it for my 40&#34; Samsung in the bedroom, looks and works great!
So I spent awhile banging on the wall to find the stud, then started drilling holes only to solid 17 holes to find it. Once i found it, another 5 holes later showed me where the edges were. I still ended up just missing, only getting 4 out of the 6 screws actually into the stud, but its solid with a 32" LCD 28 pounder. The level it comes with is great- don't be afraid to take it apart to make installation easier.
Did not include the arms shown. therefore when i went to use the only mounting option i had, it covered over the plug socket. so i had to rig it up on the top holess and use some 90 degree picture frame angle brackets to make it work
This is one of my best purchases so far. It was easy to install and position. Makes watch TV in bed enjoyable. Now my wife can read while I watch TV without disturbing each other.
Excellent bracket for doing everything I wanted my 47&#34; to do. The reviews were very helpful and made an easy installation even easier.  It does tilt a little to the right requiring a small adjustment. Terrific price!
I have a 40' flatscreen, works well for my uses.  Great price, would buy again if I had the need.
Good quality.  Must mount on a stud.  I mounted to a metal stud by cutting a rectangle hole in wall, adding a 2 ft 2x4 in the metal stud track, patched the hole and then put up the mount.  Holds a 37&#34; TV without a problem,even added a DVD player to the bottom of the TV and it is still on the wall after about 8 months.  Price on this item was great and it was sent with FREE FREIGHT!
Great deal, easy to mount and it appears to be fairly sturdy. I mounted a 32 in tv on it and it works great.
This tv mount is perfect for our granddaughters room. The price was amazing.  Much cheaper than any store around and great quality.
THIS PRODUCT WAS EXACT AS ADVERTISED. RECEIVED IN A GOOD TIME PERIOD. INSTALLED AS INSTRUCTED. WORKED JUST FINE. IT DID NEED SOME TRIMING FROM THE BRACKET THAT ATTACHED TO THE TV. IT BLOCKED OFF THE TERMINALS ON THE BACK. TRIMED WITH A SMALL GRINDER AND IT WORKED JUST FINE.
Bought this to mount my Samsung 40" in the corner of my bedroom and it works great. Very easy to install, seems very sturdy, and the range of motion of the arms for a corner mount is perfect.
No issues or problems. took me about 10 minutes to install it and it looks great on the wall! Less furniture in the bedroom now that the tv is on the wall!
Excellent buy! We are very pleased with this item. It performs very well. The instructions were clear. It was easy to assemble. It holds a 47&#34; TV very well.
This was exactly what I was looking for, a economical way to mount a 32 inch tv in our bedroom high on wall under tray ceiling.  It is heavy and I had a little trouble marking the holes to drill.  My mistake was not following advice to plum both holes, so after I bolted to wall it looked plum but after I mounted tv to bracket it was slightly off balance, not a big dealto correct except 6 toggle bolts are very hard to screw in with socket.  Overall, I am very happy with this, a lot of options to move tv.  HDMI cable big bonus.  Looks great too, esp with cover.  The only negative was to tilt it up or down you need to loosen 3 bolts and the supplied hex wrench too big to adjust one of the bolts so I actually had to purchase new wrench since I did not have any and adjustable wrench will not fit inside very small space for adjustment.  It takes two people to properly install this and tv.  I recommend this if you have a 32 inch Dynex.
This worked perfect.  The universal design would fit 99.9% of the TV's as advertised.  Easy to mount and very durable.
When we first bought our bedroom tv, we looked at the mounts in the store and almost fell over from shock at the prices.  This is one of the best prices I have found on mounts.  This mount went up easy and moves in all directions to get the perfect viewing angle.  it comes with everything you need but the drill and tv!  You won't be disappointed with this brand.
I mounted this t.v. in about 30 minutes.  The instructions were simple.  Came with its own little wrench to loosen and tighten the swivels.  I can say I am very pleased.  Money well spent.
i am completely satisfied with the product. its quite strong and functional.saved a lot of money too.thanks very much.
Bought this for my 40 in to put in my bedroom. It works exactly as described and installation was eay. I recommend
Great wall mount at a great price.  Already fully assembled out of the box and seems built to last.  I really like the swivel and tilt as we need it when laying down in the bedroom.  Easy instructions (I'm not a carpenter).  I used this on a 32" Samsung LED TV.
I liked it for the week we had it lol. Husband didn't tell me he was buying a 55 inch a week after we got this installed! Worked well and great price!
This TV stand is being used for our 32" Vizio. The hardware included was perfect and the stand bolted right up. I did need a socket and ratchet. Getting the TV into place however, was a bit more difficult. I recommend having a second person to install. One to hold the TV in place while another lines up and inserts the screws into the back of the TV. This wall mount is pretty strong, and seems to hold my TV's weight without any strain.
Compared to mounts I have used on other display panels, this is very poor quality. Motion joints have unpredictable friction. Loosening or tightening joints is good for one or two motions, then they loosen more or become sticky. I would not mount a $600 display on such a poorly made mount. I have returned it to Amazon. Return process was very easy. High marks for that!
Easey to put together and install. Used to mount a 37" LED flat screen. Instuction say to mount the complete unit but if you mount the TV to the back plate on the ground first its a one person job. Well built product for being made in China.wish you could buy American made, better luck next time.
The instructions and fastener labeling was a bit vague, but I was able to install it with ease. Works great! After buying a competitive product at Best Buy for $125...I found this gem on Amazon.com, for a fraction of the price. I returned the Best Buy product the next day. Thank you, Amazon!
I've got a 32" Sony Bravia flat pannel TV that just about maxes out the compacity of the mount, but it looks really good.  There's a little sag, but only because I have the mount extended to keep the TV at a 45 deg angle on the corner.  I would buy this again, and as a matter of fact I might buy it soon, as I plan to mount another TV.  Great Product!!
I just got this TV mount and I have to say, that I am really impressed with everything about this. It came very well package, and had a diagram on the OUTSIDE of the box, so you can actually just follow that, oh and it does come with easy instructions. You dont need to be a rocket scientist to hang this up. I was lucky enough to NOT have to use the arms, as I have a newer Samsung 40 inch. No sag, very sturdy This was very easy to install. I would def. recommend.Pros:1. Great packaging2. Easy to install3. Worth every pennyCons:None, just buy it.
Easy, quick install. Carries the weight of the 32 inch easily. couldn't swear to it's performance on a 55 inch tv.
got this to hang a 32" sony lcd in my bedroom.  used my stud finder to locate the studs, drilled 6 pilot holes and hung it up.  and extra set of hands is helpful when hanging the mount and mounting the tv.  holes on mount lined up perfectly with my tv.  screws fit just right.no complaints.
I was not hesitant to buy this product based on the many positive reviews but now that I have this product installed in my bedroom I have to say that the reviews undersold the  quality and value of this wall mount unit.The  mount unit itself is solid, well constructed, and designed to give you almost unlimited viewing angles. It is easy to install and comes with all the hardware and tools you need except a drill and bits for making pilot holes.Note: If you are installing in corner of room to catch corner stud you will need to leave about a 1/4 inch space between the side plate and corner of wall. I modified cover to fit but would have been easier had I left the space.What surprised me is that it also came with a mini level and an HDMI cable. Most people spend more on the cable than they would have spent on this unit.No brainer, get this if you need a wall mount for your flat panel tv.
This is one of the better one's out there.  With the adapters I can't imagine any TV this would not work with.  I am actually going to buy another one.
Works great for a cheap mount. Worked great on a 32&#34; Emerson LCD tv. Does everything as advertised! Can tighten or loosen joints for easier movement.
This mount is just amazing, the price is unbeatable, its extremely easy to insall, definately gonna buy more for my next projects.
This is a great quality mount, very strong and very good price! Diffenately plan on buying another mount for my other flat screen.
finally found a mount to fit my tv! I have a 42in. but it is older and I wanted to hang it above the fireplace. very easy to install, although the directions were very vague
Highly recommend this product. Price is awesome and it includes an HDMI cable. This same "combo" at Walmart would run a good $150.Installed it in 30-45 minutes and the biggest pain for me was finding a stud in the wall. there are 6 holes for the lag screws to go into which are supposed to go into a stud in the wall. Well in my wall we were able to find half the stud, so 2 of the holes (one on the top right and one on the bottom right) went into a stud, the middle screw I think got part of the stud and the 2 left screws I had to use an anchor on. Probably not the best way of doing it, but the TV is up very sturdy. Now I don't move it around at all since the spot I mounted is a corner and doesn't allow for much movement, but if you get this unit and intend to adjust it constantly I recommend you install it into a solid stud.
This was one of the easier mounts that I've installed, taking less than 30 minutes unboxing to TV hung. I'm using a Samsung 42" flat panel. With some of the reviews I've seen, reviewers report the mount that bolts to the TV wasn't removable from the arm itself. I found this not to be the case and I've uploaded photos showing as such. I also like the angles that the TV can articulate to. After bolting the mount to a stud and hanging the TV, I found little sag. I'm very impressed with it for the price. And to be honest the only time it would sag or "bounce", is when the mount was completely extended. That's also with a TV that's pushing the weight limit of the mount. All in all, I wouldnt' hesitate to buy this mount again.
After looking at a couple of negative reviews, I thought I would take a chance on this wall mount and I'm glad I did. This mount was very sturdy and is one the heaviest mount I've. (which, in my opinion, vouches for it strength. I mounted a 2012 51 inch Samsung plasma TV and , after two weeks, the mount still holds. I have used it for hours extended in multiple positions - it still holds.
I had low expectations from a TV mount priced this low. This is a well built mount and well worth the price. I was surprised at the quality and construction of it. I was able to install the mount and install the 24" TV in less than 1/2 hour. I would have given it 5 stars if the instructions gave drill bit sizes instead of just 'drill holes'.
I am very happy with this wall mount.  This is the first wall mount I have purchased, so I was a little anxious.  This was easy to install and went up quickly.  This allows me to move the TV in every direction - I love it!  I will be able to angle this one way to watch while in bed and then move it around for the other side of the room while I am on the treadmill or sewing.  It is also very study and I feel confident with my TV mounted on this
Easy to install, works perfectly on a 40" Westinghouse LCD!  Includes all hardware required for almost any application.  Highly recommended!
Great bracket for small TVs.  I used it on a 19" LCD and it worked well.  The large mounting plate may block some connections on some TVs.  Installed easily and could be adjusted to make level.  The links were very tight and need to be loosened for initial installation.  When the TV is in the desired position, you can tighten them up.
my unit arrived quickly, installation is so easy plus it comes with everything you need to install it. Highly recommend this product.
We have such a tiny house, but we have nice TV's.  Wanted to be able to have a nice big TV in our room and this helped with that.  Super easy to put together, really strong and lots of extra screws just in case.  Only 25 dollars for such a life improver.  Would really suggest you buy this if you need to put your TV up and out of the way!!
Paid three times as much for a similar mount. Very simple to mount unlike the more expensive one. Highly recommend this item. Used on a 32 inch TV. Solid.
price is right on this product! very easy to install..my husband is not the most patient fella when its comes to installing new things, but this went very smooth and quick! thank goodnes! most certainly will pass the good word on this product...by the way the price was $25.00. before researching on amazon, we bought one for our first flatscreen at wal mart...mistake! the cost was 100.00! granted, it had a few extra features,which we did not need.
Given the wealth of reviews, I thought this wall mount would be a safe bet. Unfortunately, it never even made it onto the wall.The bolts securing the swing arm were tightened so far, the arm could not be moved. (It's worth noting that the enclosed instructions *do* mention that in some cases, the bolts may need to be adjusted manually. Unfortunately, these were so tight, they could not even be loosened with a wrench.)After about half an hour of struggling with it, I returned it as defective. Better luck next time.
This was installed by two handy men - the first they had every done.  Went very well.  This mount was chosen because of the 20  inch extension.  The wall is recessed so the TV needs to come out of that hole.  The mounting plate sets above the 23" LED TV an inch but the length of the extension makes that O.K.  I would have done this myself (68 yo female) except the handy stud finder declared the whole 3' wall was a stud!!  With much chatting the handy men were finished in 45 minutes.
This product works as advertised.  It is worth what it costs.  It doesn't quite move easy enough - almost like it needs some lubrication. But other than that, I recommend it.
Product was very acceptable for what I was needing. It was easy to install and met the needed requirements.
This mount is much lower priced than anything I have seen in the retail stores (including Walmart). It is a little flexible & wobbly, so it would not be the best in an area where kids would mess with it.  That is the only reason I didn't give it 5 stars.  I use it in a bedroom up high, where it won't be messed with.  It does everything I need it to do at a great price, so it is perfect for me.
The wall mount was just what I expected...maybe a little better. Solid steel with attachment bolts. Looks like it should last for a long time.
It took about 10 mins to install this TV Wall Mount with a 48 inch Samsung TV.  It does the job, there are much more expensive arms, but this does the trick.
This wall mount  can and will accommodate all types of flat screens. I enjoyed the ease of assemble and the instructions.
This Flat screen wall mount was about 1/4 the price of the ones at the stores and works as well or better.
I thought this was a great value for a wall mount.  I have installed a 32 inch tv in my bathroom with this unit.  It worked well with the Visio TV that I bought.  It looked it it could accomodate many other tvs because there were a variety of holes on the mounting bracket.  Is it the best quality ever, no.  It is decent quality, and it worked well for me.
received the product and got it installed today. for the most part I am pretty happy with the hardware except the materials being used to make screws or other parts. the screws get very easily damaged by the most commonly used screw drivers that you can find for $1 per piece.  Once I put the bolt into the LCD TV and mount it with the plate, I found myself having a hardtime removing the screw because the tread mark on the screw head is already messed by by the screw driver, which makes me doubt about the material being used on the mount and arms.  is the material used on the mount going to deliver the same quality as the bolts and nuts?
Worth the money...High quality product......It fits perfect for my 32in..RCA...LED...It came a day early.Fixing to order one more. Best TV wall mount for the money
I am very happy with this affordable wall mount for my Sony 32" Internet TV. One nice feature ist that you can swivel the mounted TV depending on where you are seated.
Awesome, great wall mount for TV, came with 2) 2-1/2&#34; lag bolts and a vast assortment of hard ware, so much hardware you should be able to mount any TV to the mount.  Mount is hidden completely behind TV yet looks attractive, folds to just a few inches from the wall or pulls out to position, easy to adjust angle adjustment and came with clips to keep the cord from being pinched inside the mount.  Shipped and arrived very quickly.
Exactly what they said it was. Very sturdy mount that can fit almost any sized tv. It was easy to install.
I was worried but this thing holds up my 55&#34; 3d LG tv  and can adjust for any size...and is a great deal I'd get another if I needed one
Like the various Adustablity, as I had an older model in my living room and it was hard to get it away from the wall when I wanted to angle it.This one is very light and I can get it to adjust with very little effort, I have some arthritis in my knuckles, so this is a very nice asset.  also I am 5'2&#34; and I struggled with the older wall mount, this one is in the Identical Location and moves in and out so easily.You might have to  tighten it up a little more than I have it as it tilts about 2 inches Forward the was I have it, but it is up High and I don't even notice it from my recliner chair.
The wall mount arrived in a timely manner.  I was a little hesitant about ordering this product after reading other reviews that was not very favorable.  I took a chance and ordered the wall mount .  I am using it with a Samsung 32&#34; LCD/ LED Smart Tv and it works fine.  My husband had no problem with the installation and did it by himself.  When I arrived home it was hung and ready to go.  There is no sag and the unit is pretty heavy and solid.  I had to loosen some of the screws because they were to tight and I could not adjust the tv like I wanted to.  Other than that the tv wall mount is fine.  I don't know what experiences others had but for the price yipeeeeee!
i got it based on the a suggestion you know the products often purchased with------. So I got it it said it &#34;FITS MOST&#34; 19in-36 inch tv. So not true. Well it was a BIG let down more because it was a Christmas gift the TV and wall mount was going to be up Christmas morning oh joy....But no the stupid mount didn't fit the TV. So I have the TV still sitting in the box and told the kids that Santa will have to send us the extension parts via UPS. Not Cool at.
Well worth the money would buy again and suggest item built as good as the ones in the stores for double the money
I had read a couple of bad reviews about this product - that it was hard to put up but we purchased it anyway. My husband had it installed in no time and we love it. This was our first flat screen TV and we have it in our bedroom and this bracket is perfect for it. Thank you.
This product is sturdy as ever.  Whatever angle we are watching within our fifth-wheel trailer, we can maneauver to that position and tilt our tv for great viewing.  Wonderful product!  Easy to install.
I mounted a 32" flat-panel TV in a bedroom with this excellent product, which can be set permanently to almost any viewing angle (lateral and up/down tilt) and readjusted with wrenches. You'll need a stud-finder, a drill, and a screwdriver. A wide assortment of mounting bolts and adjustment wrenches is included.A very similar product at Best Buy is about $120. Save your money and buy this one (but be sure your TV weighs less than the specified max.)
Cannot beat this deal anywhere else on the web!  All other retailers are over-priced for what you are getting - a couple pieces of fabricated metal to hold a TV that articulates! This mount is reasonably priced.Pros:  Easy to install (helps to have a cordless driver to drill 6 pilot holes, and to drive in 6 lag screws. You also need to have a stud finder).- Well fabricated- Mount does everything advertised (i.e. articulates - you made need to loosen up some nuts)Con's: Really stretching here since this is a good deal: Instructions could use some help for the "novice" DIY'ersInstall tip:  It really helps if you have a second person assisting you for the final step of mounting the flat panel to the TV mountInstalled a 15.5 lbs, 26 Inch Flat Panel LCD (VESA 200mm X 100mm) to this mount. Mount works beautifully! I originally had the TV sitting a little high on a stand, but then the picture was not as good because of the upward viewing angle of the screen (inherent problem with cheaper LCD's - not being directly in front of a LCD screen) - this mount corrected this issue by allowing me to "tilt down" the screen.  I would strongly recommend this mount if you are in the market.
I mounted my 32" TCL which isn't a very heavy HDTV, but it makes the mount flex a bit more than I like. Not a soid mount with a 32" tv; less weight and smaller tvs should be fine.If you want a really solid mount for a 32" and up, spend the money and go better quality. I am a professional satellite installer and know how to find the stud, and mount it level and true. This is just adequate for the never-move situation my 32" is for, but for a tv needing some occasional motion I would listen to my cautions, and go better and heavier...something spanning 2 studs for support.
It looks exactly as it did in the picture.  It's sturdy and well constructed.  It's not the easiest thing to hang, but I did it alone and had no major problems.  It's holding a 37" TV now and it's been up for a month and I haven't noticed any bowing.  The flexibility allows for a large range of movement which is nice.  I would definitely recommend this to anyone looking for a wall mount to hold a bigger TV.
This is perfect for what I needed it for. I can move the screen from side to side if I need to and I don't have the TV sitting on my desk.....
The directions stink. Just remember the spacers go under the arms if you have to use them and you will be ok.
This TV mount is perfect for a tight spot on the wall for a 40&#34; TV.  I needed it to swing 180 degrees
This is mounted in a doorway between two rooms in my basement with a 40 inch TV attached to it.  I can move it to either room and still keep the doorway open plenty wide enough to pass through.  Perfect for my needs.
My mount came in without any hardware. No bolts, washers, sleeves, anchors,or spanners. I did check the box for the proper model number (ML563B), and I did check the description to make sure hardware should have been included (&#34;Standard hardware and user manual included.&#34;).Amazon offered me a return at no cost, as they shipped it but did not sell the product. My options were to refund for another model, reorder the same model and risk the same issue, or just buy the hardware myself. I spent nearly $10 on hardware, but my 40&#34; television is securely mounted to the wall. The arms are a bit stiff, but they don't move once they've been adjusted. It has the right tilt for mounting near the ceiling.
Arrived on time, works as stated.  I hooked up a 39: tv.  This was smaller than I expected, and a littel Lighter than I expected, but the newer tv or lighter also.  I wouldn go above a 42&#34; tv however.  Lots of positions to put your tv in with a little tlc and effort in how you get the tv in your desired postion.There were all types of screws in the box, but the only ones that scewed into the bak of my tv were too long or too short.  The box had spacers but they still were not wide enough, so I had to cut some wood to adjust for the extra space.
Excellent product. Far exceeded expectations! Easy to hang on the wall and even easier to attach to my tv. Full motion allows the tv to be viewed from any angle in my game room.
Perfect fit for my Vizio 37&#34;, easy installation, quick shpping, no problems whatsoever.  Wouldn't hesitate to buy another one when needed.
Owned this for a couple of years now and I love it. Very sturdy and works just fine for us
I usually never write reviews but after recieving this item and getting it put up I felt i needed too due to some of the negative reviews I read while doing some research on this item.I have a 46" Samsung LCD, not the skinny one it weighs 46 lbs. By no means is the mount sagging at any point. Full extension or swiveled it does not sag one bit and I am very confident that it will hold because I did a pull up on the arm before installing the tv just to be sure. Make sure and tighten down the allenhead bolts for the tilt once you get it to the tilted angle that you are looking for. They give you more than enough hardware for whatever the case may be so do not worry if they will have the right size bolts because there are multiples .Overall a great product for the money and if you are thinking of this at all, dont think anymore, BUY!!
Installation was fairly straight forward.  I do wish arm used more than 2 screws to secure to the wall.  It does not seem to have any problem with my 38&#34; TV that weighs over 50 lbs, but I'm leery of what would happen during an earth quake.
This works perfect with a 50" vizio tv I have. A very good price, a very sturdy and easily put together. Couldn't be happier
Solid, quality product at a great price.  I compared to other options and really glad I went with this unit for our 26" TV.
Fits many different size TV's,  is very solid, and was easy to install.  I would recommend to anyone is even slightly handy.
I use this arm to mount my 39 inch Vizio. I'm surprised my TV has a 100x100 mount thingy. It can tilt left and right, up and down. I do wish it swiveled the TV so that it wasn't crooked. When the bolts get loose, my TV looks crooked.
After looking around a bit I took the chance for some of the "cheaper" wall mounts in the market. This was a great decision. This mount is easy, sturdy as keeps my 32" LCD were I wanted, moves nicely (after having to play around a little as the beginning the arms were a bit tight). It is a very good buy, and bought a second one for a smaller TV
Works Great. Holds my 40 inch TV effortlessly. Very well built. Definitely worth the price. Easy to install TV to the mount. Has cord clips. TV can be tilted up or down and sideways. Extends from the wall 24 inches. I highly recommend this brand..
At first I thought that I would have to have someone help me install the arm and TV, but found it to be very easy and no assistance  was needed, I am a 65 year old female and if I can install it anyone can.  It works great and looks good, and the price was well within my price range, Thank you, keep up the good work.
I don't know why this model shows up on my account, however I did order and install a smaller VideoSecu model.  Installation on a 26 inch Vizio was a snap.  Bracket went inside a cabinet where an old analog tv sat. The new TV now swings out and away providing access to the cabinet.  I have ordered another VideoSecu articulating wall mount like this one for a similiar installation of a 32inch Vizio.I suggest one person hold the mounted TV where you would like it to swing out to, and have another person hold the wall attachment and mark the holes. That way your final viewing location and swing out radius should be correct.
Easy to install and very well built. Put it together in five minutes, then ten to place and screw to the wall. EASY!  If needed I would buy it again !
Worked perfectly to mount my tv to the wall. TV now swivels easily to accomodate me. It was very easy to install and very sturdy, I was worried it would be cheap but I was incorrect!
purchased to install a 47&#34; tv in a 24&#34; deep built in cabinet - simple to install - works perfectly - great price
This was very sturdy, easy to install, and I feel like my TV is secure. Really good price, fast shipping. Can't beat it!
Tv has been on wall for a long time.  Hasn't fallen off.  It's metal and considerably cheaper than kits available in stores.
very easy to install.  It took no time and is firmly in the stud.  The package came with many different nuts and bolts to handle any situation.
Great price, very easy installation.  I am using it on a 42&#34; Sanyo in garage, easy to rotate and adjust.  It comes with more hardware than needed, and clips to conceal wiring.  This is the second one I have installed, probably takes 10-15 minutes.  Price is far better than I have seen anywhere.
The quality of the mount is very good, very easy to install by myself.  But i am having an issue with the bracket for the back of the TV it covers all available inputs except for one HDMI input.  It even covers the plug, which I had to modify for it to fit my tv. I am still using it because as of right now I am only using one HDMI.  But other than that I would say it is a good mount if it does not cover your inputs.
I installed my tv using this mount about a month ago. Despite hitting a bad part of the stud with 1 screw, the other 5 were good and the tv seems secure.  I have a 32" Sharp.  The mount includes about 5 different sets of screws so it's easy to find the ones that match your tv. No complaints so far.
This is the smallest articulating tv mount I have seen so far it is holding up a 40 inch flatscreen effortlessly and makes the room look bigger with out being noticable
Used this for the bedroom. Put it in the corner but was only able to hit the stud with a couple bolts.
this item arrived on time and works awesome it is now holding my 32&#34; tv and it was shipped in a great and timely fashion
Perhaps I misunderstood how to install the mount, but I:1) Installed the mount to the wall (easy enough)2) Attach TV the mount with some screws (difficult for one person)With one arm I held the TV (heavy!). The other arm was trying to attach some small screws connecting the TV to the mount. It took quite an effort to hold the TV for that long. Certainly having two people installing this would be waaaay easier :-)I have another similar mount where the TV back plate and the mount are separate parts. So once the back plate is installed, you slide the connecting parts together. Much easier! :-)
Great mount that gives you all the features for 360 viewing.  Follow instructions and enjoy your flat screen TV as never before.
The quality of construction is very good. It wasn't unduly difficult to install, but would be easier with two people, especially with larger sets.
Unbelievable price for such a great item, it has a great design and seems pretty sturdy and reliable to keep your T.V. safe.
Easy to attach. Easy to adjust. Very Solid and secure. Used on a clients 29&#34; LED with built in DVD.
This mount worked very well. Assembly was quick and fit perfectly on my 42.inch display. The price is impossible to beat.
Seeing all of the positive reviews I expected this TV mount to work like a charm.  However, once it was mounted on the wall the first bracket was bending under the weight of my TV.  My TV is well within the specified limits, it's a 32" Dynex that's under 55 lbs. so I expected the mount to work fine.  The TV was tilted because of the stress on the bracket and I didn't trust the mount not to break.  I'm returning it for a sturdier mount.
This is a great product I was on vacation visiting family when I ordered it. In arrived in the two weeks that I was there. The construction of the product was excellent although you may want to loosen the swaying arm with the tool. Installation wasn't to bad but i reccomend using two or even 3 in your a clutz to help put it up. it wasn't a huge pain in just took alot of exactness. It is still hung on the wall so look at the specifications and then buy if they match.
Solid tv mount.  I attached a 42&#34; LCD to this and it holds it rock solid with the ability to pull away from the wall to plug in additional inputs.  Don't let the low price make you wonder.  This thing is rock solid and will do the job.
Held up our new samsung smart TV! works perfect and have had no issues! holds up really nice compared to the $100 versions from Best buy
I was skeptical and unsure whether I should order this wall mount but after reading the reviews I decided to take a chance, I figured I have nothing to lose. This wall mount was easy to install and I was able to hook up my 42&#34; TV without worrying that it would fall. The instructions were easy to follow and my TV looks great!
We needed something to Extend our tv away from the hot pipe for the winter and this wall mount did the trick. It went up with no a problems. It worked out very well!
Great deal, just as good as the 100 dollar ones I bought. Fast shipping. Will buy another one when I need it.
My second order of this item.  Amazon has the best price for wall mounts,  Please with this product and I would order another when I buy another tv.
Perfect price and works like a charm. Can't beat it. I would recommend this product to anyone. I have had them for over a month with no issues. Easy install.
After we located the stud and predrilled all the holes for the screws, this installed very securely and provides a good range of motion.The one hiccup was the plate that attaches to the monitor - while it had all the screw holes in the right place for our monitor (Viewsonic 22"), one of its "wings" extended over and blocked the cord and DVI sockets on the back of the monitor. I had to do some judicious hacksaw work to provide access. This had no effect on the strength of the mount, since it was all past the screw holes. But be aware a little additional work may be necessary on your install.
This is my first Tv wall mount and I couldn't ask for any thing better. You can watch your Tv from any direction. Comes all different types of screws to hold your Tv to the mount. Also comes with2.5 inch long bolts to hold mount on the wall.
The wall mount did not come with extenders for larger TVs. It is pictured with extenders and no where in the listing does it say they are not included and must be purchased separately.  Not very pleased with purchase.
Product arrived in a timely manor and in new condition.  The only negative was the arm drops slightly at the elbow joint (due to weight of the TV).  This was / is easy to correct because this model has a tilt adjustment.  I would buy this product again.
I bought this wall mount to hold a 26 inch Samsung LED television in my den. The mount easily allows me to position the television in the two locations I regularly watch from. It is a well built mount that has all the adjustments you'll need. I had to make one modification/cut in one corner of the mounting plate to clear the location where my antenna cable connection goes into the back of the television. This is no fault of the mount it just relates to the size and brand/model of television. Not in any way a problem for me. Coupled with a few cable ties and wall mounted plastic track for the cables, it gives me a clean installation. I fully recommend this mount.
We used this to install a 42 inch LG in my son's room.  We didn't have to use the arms, the screw holes lined up perfectly.
We have been very pleased with this product and it was surprisingly easy to install.
Fast for hubby to throw up. Allows me to put the tv wherever I wanted it then tilt it do I can see wherever I am. When I'm done, just push it back so no big tv sticking out. It's great!
If you want a wall mount that is universal and can be moved in all directions this is the one to get.  My 42&#34; Samsung 3D tv mounted easily and the extensions were not required.  I mounted it to a stud and it seems to be very secure.  I am able to swing the tv to watch from my bed or from the lazyboy chair without a problem.
The TV wall mount was effective but did not exactly fit the bolt holes on the set.  It is convenient for wheel chair patient use in the small room for TV access to both chair and sofa.
It works great for our TV and was so reasonably priced compared to all the others we had looked at in stores.
Just what I needed.  I mounted this high, and it swings out and pivots into the open doorway for a more natural viewing  angle from my exercise machine.  My one complaint is that it is pretty hard to change the tilt since I may be on the floor or raised up on the elliptical trainer.  I completely understand the complexity here -- the weight of the TV means you need something solid and tight or it would always droop (no drooping here) but I think they could have come up with an alternative to give the control without breaking out a wrench.
We bought 2 of these. One to go with a new purchase and one older TV. The functionality seems to be just what we need.  Thanks for the fast shipment!!
Sturdy & does the job well.I research the products before purchasing & this one is it. Take my word for it.
Excellent product, fast shipping, great price, easy to install on wall, highly recommend this tv wall mount. I will be ordering this mount again for basement tv after i finish remodel. 24'' wall arm works perfectly as a corner mount in living room.
The wall mount was easy to install and I am able to position the TV so as to view it from several different locations in the room.
I was impressed with the construction, very sturdy and easily mounted. Great price! I would reccomend this product to friends.
Easy install, but tv went crooked when it was extended towards limit of extension. It was very noticeable when arm was to the right, but not when it was repositioned towards the left. Too much play in the extension joints. Installed this for my dad and next day he said plastic piece had broken off (Turned out to be the cheap plastic wire-run that never quite fit on right anyways). Went out and bought one from Sams club knowing I could return it if it also had extension/tilt problems. Well the one from Sams Club (Omni Basic Series) was just fantastic and it came with two STEEL wire-run holders even though it is a bit shorter on the extension than this wall mount.My dad had a brand new sharp 32 inch LCD which weighed in around 24 lbs or so. Couldn't even imagine a bigger tv being extended with this. If you're going to keep the tv flat agaibst the wall this should be ok, but I wouldn't cheap out again. Spend another $18 and get an excellent mount from Sams Club, as this one just isn't up to the task.
This mount is sturdy, easy to install, and easy to mount the TV to.  The included hardware was heavy duty also.  The action is good, and tension is adjustable.  The tilt can be adjusted by using the knob in lieu of one of the bolts, or locked in place (which makes it more difficult for someone to remove the TV unless they have a wrench with).  I mounted the 27" TV on our lanai, so a little theft-proofing is a good thing.  The TV is now visible either on the lanai, or from the patio.I RECENTLY BOUGHT A SECOND ONE, AND THEY HAVE CHANGED.  STILL STURDY, BUT LACKING THE QUICK MOUNT FEATURE! NOW YOU MUST HOLD THE TV IN PLACE WHILE INSERTING THE TINY SCREWS THROUGH THE BACK.
This is a great wall mount.  Installed in less than 10 minutes.  Comes with all the hardware needed and more.  Very strong and adjusts very easily.  I would definitely recommend this item to anyone that needs an articulating mount.
We got this one recently and its a great wall mount. The unit is pretty heavy, so you will need a helper. It also includes a variety of screws to mount also. Our TV documentation stated it was a 400x400 pattern. But after putting hte plate over the back, seems we didn't need the extra extenders as its 200x200. This is on a Samsung 40&#34; 5000 series LEDTV.The arm is hard to push and pull, but that is more due to being new and stiff. Make sure you adjust the tilt angle screws as our unit came with them loose so we had to tighten them.I initially was scared to mount it (what if it falls if I screw up!!!) but its pretty easy. Not only did i use a stud finder to get the general location of the stud, but i also used nails to get the actual edges (those basic studfinders are never &#34;exact&#34;). make sure you do the same.not bad for $30-ish
UPDATE: I have now have purchased 3 of these for work and home and with the lighter LED TV's this is a perfect mount for most sizes - this is a great mount - easy to install - easy to use - easy to expand - easy to mount TVs. I havent found another one that is so useful - even if you dont need it to extend this is still a great mount--- I guess for the price I was expecting something cheaper but I was quite surprised. It was easy to install and works for what I need it for - it may be over kill for a 22 inch LED LCD TV but I like the way it can be moved around.
I ordered this to hold my 42' flat screen TV and it works great! It took about 15 minutes to install.
We are very pleased with this product. Much cheaper than purchasing in the stores and worked very well with our new tv. Like that is can swivel and be moved to accomodate us! Thanks!!!
Totally love this product!! I bought two - one for living room, one for bedroom.  I decided to try my hand in the bedroom first (in case I got frustrated and didn't finish the project).I've gotten items needing to be assembled before with all the hardware in one bag -- not so with this product!!  I'm impressed! Every nut, bolt, screw, washer, etc. is clearly packaged (individually by size and labeled!)The Arm also comes assembled -- which I disassembled for easier handling (the wall plate is attached to the Arm with two Carriage Bolts / easy to remove and makes holding in place while bolting to the wall a breeze).Took me 1-1/2 hours from start (gathering my tools) to finish (hanging the TV)  Oh, and I'm a 56 yr old disabled female.  I do have a  lot of construction/tool knowledge however.
Using this mount for a 32" flatscreen tv in the bedroom.Good Quality.Installation was pretty easy for 1 person - but definitely need 2 people to mount the TV.Instructions had us using 6 screws to mount on wall. We felt that was overkill. 2 large screws in the center of the 2x4 would be sufficient for our flatscreen (it's very light).The Tilt adjustment is a bit of a pain - only drawback we found, but once its set, it's done; so not a huge issue.
A solid built product. Easy installation. Very versatile.  Fit my 42&#34; Vizio like a glove. Installation takes about a half hour.
Let me start out by saying the one not good comment. This item is a two person job due to awkward weight. All other comments I have for this mount are great. Attachable cable ring helps keep the cords neat and away from my one year old son. The mount also works great in my boys room because they are able to watch tv from anywhere in the room due to the great amount of flexibility of the swing arm. This is definitely a great buy. I strongly recommend this product for others to use
Sturdy, swivels nicely. Very happy with this product.
Installed easily, Plenty of nuts and bolts and spacers. Easy to adjust. Strong, well made. I would recomend  it to anyone. Excellent value.
This is a great wall mount. it fits my tv well (i have a Dynex 32 inch 720p lcd) it puts a little more strain on the mount than i would like but it has held well for the few days its been up there.Also one of the screws that you use to bolt into the wall had a round head? anyways its a great tv mount, and the instructions are easy to follow. installation took about 20 min.
En verdad, es un muy bien articulo, viene con todo lo necesario para instalarlo uno mismo, lastima que no venga el taladro,jajaja. pero en realidad muy buen producto.Lo recomiendo
I really like item ! It's perfect for the usage of the Tv..I recommend it to all buyers! Enjoy it!
Great wall mount!!! Works perfectly in my bedroom.  My husband and I can see the television perfectly! I would recoommend this television wall mount!!
This flat panel mount is adjustable and very cost effective, an excellent product for the money.  This arm comes with all needed mounting hardware for either masonry or wall stud mounting as well as a set of 4 screws for several sizes of panel mounting screws.  It also comes with a small wrench for two different sizes of hex heads on the arm and an allen wrench for one of the arm adjustments.  It is at least a two man operation to attach the flat screen after the arm is attached to the wall.  I mounted mine on a stud in the wall.  For stud mounting you use two of the six mounting hex head lag screws that come with it.  It doesn't say exactly in the directions but you should use a 1/4" drill bit to pre-drill the holes in the stud.  I would not recommend trying to use the included hex wrench to tighten down the wall mounting lag screws, you need more leverage to tighten it than it provides; use a crescent wrench or other longer hex wrench.  I used a stud finder to locate the studs accurately.  Make sure you do not have obvious pipes or electrical going through the wall at the chosen location.  They can throw off some stud finders.  If you want to quickly adjust one of the arm adjustment screws it also contains a replacement screw that has a slip bar top lever so that it can be loosened and tightened without a wrench.  There is one optional cable management loop that attaches to the bottom of the middle of the arm.  It could use one more at the wall, but that is easy to improvise.  The flat panel we have is 32" and 25 lbs. and works well for the mounting arm.I really like this product for this price.
For the money it works fine, but it will take two people to mount your TV to the bracket.  The bracket and mount are sturdy enough but it will not articulate as smoothly as some of the higher priced models.  Also, do not bother with the bubble level as it is cheaply made and will not provide an accurate reading.I will keep this one as I already mounted up the TV, but the next unit I buy will be a higher priced, easier to articulate mount.
The price was great, it arrived quickly, installation fairly simple, but the wall mount is actually heavier than my 28" tv!
I wasn't willing to pay $100 for simply mounting a TV, so I bought this item to give it a shot. I have no real complaints.  It holds the TV up, which is all I wanted.  It does not have smooth pivot points, so if you're planning on moving it around a lot, don't use this one, but if it's going to stay in a static area, this is your mount.
At the 28 dollars I paid, this is a great deal.  Solidly constructed and pretty easy to install, even with the badly-translated instructions.I recommend putting in just the top screw at first, and then installing the other screw after attaching the monitor.  That will let you adjust for any slight tilt created by torque on the monitor arm.*UPDATE* - It looks like they've changed the product.  Those large arms that stick out from the corners in the photo aren't present on my unit.  They may just be an addition, which would make it an even better deal.  Or they may have changed everything.
This wall mount met all me expectations as of right now.I Have had it installed for over a month without a hitch. Currently, it's holding a 46&#34; Sony LCD over the fireplace and it looks great. Took about 30 mins to install.Haven't found anything, in this short amount of time, I dislike about the Mount. Would recommend to any one that needs or wants a single stud wall mount!
Did all it was advertised to do. Istallation was simple and it took less then an hour to put it up and mount the tv. Looked at Best Buy, Walmart and concluded you just can't beat the price for this one on Amazon.
Good deal.  Easy to install.  If your walls are cement behind dry wall no problem but you'll need a cement drill bit.  Measure the back hole inputs of your tv to make sure the holes match before buying this.  Some 32 inch tvs have large rectangular holes versus smaller squared off holes.  The forward tilt is good but there's no way to adjust level so make sure the mount to the wall is correct.
This mount is extremely user friendly, I have mounted flat screens in the past that were much more difficult than this one. Good buy!
I must admit, I'm very cautious of what I buy especially when I've seen this identical bracket in the electronic stores priced three to four times than this one.  Bracket arrived much faster then what Amazon estimated and was well packaged.  The directions were adequate but I'm very mechanically inclined so used them as a quick guide and had this bracket installed with my Sony 37" LCD in under a half hour.  My hats off to the marketing folks with this manufacturer as they did their homework and included additional hardware and brackets to meet any possible configuration out there.  Including mounting tools and level were also an exceptional idea.  And tossing in a 7' HDMI cable was the icing on the cake.
Install was quick and easy the mount worked perfectly on my 32 inch vizio tv. The unit is installed in my outside patio, i have patio furniture all around my patio and with the swivel feature i can cover any are of my patio. I know that nothing will happen to my smart vizio lcd with this mount. Thanks for a great inexpensive product.
this works greaat for my 37" vizio!! my only complaint is that it doesnt tilt up and down with just hand adjustments. you have to use an alan key to loosen it up and retighten it. not deficult just annoying.
If you purchased the TFDVD3295 32 INCH TV with this wall mount DON'T FORGET TO GET THE ADAPTER!!!!! Or else the TV mounting holes will not line up with the wall mount bracket.
Mount was easy to install and one month after install.....no problems.  It extends from wall very far and great to allow the TV to almost move 90 degrees from the mount base.  We have a 32" tv on ours.Works great - would recommend
Would never put anything biggest than a 27in , has week points and sags.I guess you get what you pay for.
47&#34; flat screen LED went up in 20min.  Looks great in the corner of my room. Would recommend this to anyone mounting there TV.  Going to purchase a 2nd mount for my 32&#34;.
Allows me to move my tv to a position of my choosing. Able to be comfortable watching tv or playing games
It works fine but it is too big for our 22"TV. The way that the holes line up the plate sticks out at the bottom of the TV and it looks bad. If I didn't already hang the bracked I would have returned it. I am sure it wil work fine for a larger TV.
I ordered these for my sons bedrooms for there 32 inch tv's and they went up very easily with a stud finder. I had both units that i bought up and the tv's were hung in less than an hour each. the quality is very comparable to that you would get from walmart but, it was half the price. I am getrting one for the living room next. cant wait.
I was unable to use the TV mount because the mounting plate was too large and when attached to the TV (22 in. Samsung), I was unable to insert the HDMI cable.  I did not pay attention to the pattern of the screws on the back of the TV when selecting the mount so it may partially be my fault. I assumed they were universal. Obviously not.  Amazon took the return  - no questions asked.
I bought it so I can move my computer monitor on the wall. The mount is sturdy, reliable, and looks great.
Very sturdy. The arm is very stiff at first so you have to work it lose.  However, the mount works great, just make sure you get that stud just right. I was impressed with the quality and happy with the price.
The product works great. I have put 2 different Tv's on the wall mount and it works and adjusts great. Plus plenty of hardware for mounting the product was provided.
Great Value with a lot of included hardware. Some of the hardware included was of low quality. The two lag bolts (all that could fit onto the stud), held up my Sony Vaio computers 28lbs, just fine. I wouldn't put too much more weight on there and still expect full range of motion.Installation was straightforward.
Very inexpensive compared to other sites and stores.  It was easy to install and works great with my Samsung 32in tv.
The only issue that I have with this mount is that is only has 2 bolts to hold it into the wall.  I have a 55&#34; that it is holding, and I really don't feel that it is that secure.  I tightened everything the way the instructions say, though when moving the TV the mount was sliding against the wall with the weight of the TV.  I would suggest only using this one with a smaller TV than it's max of 55&#34;.  I tightened everything more, and it no longer moves against the wall, but I think the stud in the wall is now cracked.  Not good.
My only compliant is that even though it says it will support my TV.  The weight of it must be too much, for I can not get the arm to stay extended. Works fine for staying close to the wall, but not flush.
I am awarding this mount 4 stars.I used the Video Secure mount for my 23 inch TV which weighed only 13lb. The hardware supplied was excellent for mounting it on a wood wall stud. The arm of the mount detaches so that it is easy to mount the wall plate to the stud. The mount was more than adequate for my light weight TV. It can be adjusted to swivel and tilt. The only negative was that while the plate mounted to the back of the TV with the screws provided, the lower left corner interfered with the power plug. Video Secure can provide a mount with a smaller plate. Rather than return my mount for the smaller plate, I chose to use a hacksaw and removed an approximately one by two inch corner in order to permit the plug to enter the TV. So with that caution in mind, I would recommend this product very highly. If I had ordered the smaller plate originally I would have rated it 5 Stars. I was able to do the job without any help. With a heavier TV, an extra pair of hands would be useful.
Bought this for the great price and free shipping. Cannot touch one of these in Hawaii of any quality for less than a hundred bucks. Good quality, installed easily but when we went to put the TV on...well we are now waiting for the adapter/extension to fit our TV. Make sure to verify that the holes on your TV/Monitor will match up with the mounting plate....if not make sure to order the adapter for this. Still a good deal and was very relieved to find out there was an adapter available!VideoSecu Universal VESA Adapter Plate LED LCD Plasma TV Wall Mount Bracket Extender MLEB 1UUBottom line: I would purchase this mount again and would recommend as a good buy.
Easy to install, strong enough for the 40&#34; flat screen and swivels nicely or hugs the wall, depending on preferred positioning. Very good product.
This mount is easy to install and very sturdy and is very functional and very affordable for the price. A+
Purchased this to hang a 32" Sony LCD.  Works well for that purpose.  As other reviewers have said, it is welded out of level.  Note this before you hang it.
A very sturdy mount with adequate mounting hardware.  I had to mount on a wall with an angle (A-frame house) and it had enough up/down adjustment to accomdate.  Mounted a 27" LCD monitor and it worked great.
We bought this for the tv in our gym as it gets moved around a bit.  It's definitely sturdy and works well.  Our tv in there is 24&#34;,
I love everything about this mount. It's versatile, holds our 30&#34; LCD TV no problem and is discreet. My only complaint at all is that the instructions for mounting lacked a little detail but we looked up some videos and everything was fine. Most of the other mounts I found were twice the price so this is certainly a good deal!
Great product. Easy installation.Works as advertised. Arrived on time and in good condition.Supports TV very well. We are enjoying the conveience it offers.
This is a great buy, compared to a $60 or more a retail store.
I have an older very heavy 36&#34; Samsung High Def TV that weighs substantially more than my new 42&#34;. I replaced my old basement CRT tv with it, installed the VideoSecu mount easily and it does the job. I was amazed, the price from Amazon was only $30 dollars and with prime I got free 2 day shipping. The original price was $149. Wow, what a reduction!
This is what I wanted for the TV. It is well constructed & easy to install all for a resonable price.
TV has been mounted about two weeks and still holding up.  Pretty easy to adjust the TV to different angles.  Overall installing the TV mount wasn't hard.  The only thing that gave us a little trouble was the TV had a little raised curve on the back.  Therefore when we tried to attach the bar that connects to the TV, the bars did not sit flush.  We had to cut those bars down to get a flush mount.  Not sure if that is a fault of the TV mount or the TV itself.  Note: I don't know how the mounting sizes are created, i.e. 300x300, but the mount did say it would fit my TV and we still had to cut those bars.  Not a big deal to me and the mount still works well but this is something you may want to factor into your buying decision.  For those green people, packaging was really good on this, not much wasted/open space.
I was impressed with the heaviness and quality of this TV wall mount.....it was just what I needed and had shopped at the local stores to find a similar item for much more $$.....very satisfied with purchase..
This articulates BUT it does not tilt up & down without unloosening a bolt and tightening it back.  In other words, the vertical tilt is fixed once you set it, so if you intend to adjust it that way move up to a more expensive unit.
Best Buy has mounts that are basically the same as this for $125. This one is sturdy, came with all the mounting hardware you could need, and was easy to install. Twenty five freakin' dollars! Why did I leave my television on milk crates for so long?
For a good wall mount of a smaller TV, this is perfect. Much cheaper than similar in various stores, and actually is more flush/compact than I have seen on others with all the adjustments you could want.Only gripe is that the included wrench to tighten the wall bolts is pretty weak and strips itself almost immediately, but it'll work to get it on at least. All hardware needed is included, I had to use a few adapter pieces on my first TV. Getting ready to hook a second one up on another rooms wall, both are 32" screens. I feel confident they will be there until I decide to remove em.Wall stud mounting required, but depending on the stud size, you may only get two of the three wall bolts into the stud. Should be enough though.
Simple installation. Helpful to have a second set of hands at times, but could be done by yourself. Instructions aren't the greatest.Holds a Toshiba 46&#34; LED in a corner perfectly. Feels sturdy.I don't so much like the look of the plastic cover on the wall side of the arm.
The directions for this mount aren't real clear as far as connecting it to your TV.  But for the price, it was worth it.  I have it holding a 55 inch Samsung.
I ordered this and was a little skeptical at first. Once mounting to the wall (easy), attaching the face plat to my TV (easier), and then mounting one to the other (easiest), I was sold! From there, it took me moments to figure out how to adjust the tilt. I was sold! I can watch my TV from anywhere in my house now!! And it's the perfect solution for people with small spaces that don't want to waste floor area with a TV stand!
I purchased this mount for use in our Motorhome.  It installed easily, and holds our new LCD TV securely while on the road.  My wife is very pleased!
I now have TWO of these fantastic Articulating Arms. One for my computer monitor(24") and one for a monitor I use as bot a TV and spare monitor(21") for my laptop.This is a stable, solid, very well constructed device. Highly adaptible to the many VESA as well as some non-standard mounting holes out there. I was worried that since I was using the VESA 100 holes the mounting plate might stick out to far, but even on the 21" it doesnt stick out at all.The instructions are very well written and provide good graphical representations. The arm is easy to mount to the wall, and to the monitor/T.V.. Compacts well to the wall when pushed all the way in, and extends easily when I want to move the Monitor out and around.Very stable, no vibrations, appears very solid, you won't be worried your monitor is going to fall off.The only piece missing is the ability to adjust it up and down. You can adjust the Arm left, right, in and out, and so on, you can even adjust the tilt of the monitor, but if you need to be able to move the monitor up and down, this is not the arm for you.For the money, you cannot beat the quality or functionality of this Articulating Arm.
For the amount that you pay, this mount is amazing. I have 2 and they both hold up a 42 Inch LCD TV.
Great product period.  Comes with multiple sets of screws to mount your flat screen LCD depending on the screw hole depth in monitor.  No teardrop mounts however but you don't need'em...most screens are lite enough to hold and attach by yourself.  I did it easily.  Anyway, it's still hang'in on the wall.  An allen wrench is provided to tighten the tilt of the screen after its up.  I'm getting another one or two for my computer monitors to attach to the wall at my desk.  Be sure to mount to a stud in the wall or equivalent and level first before attaching to the wall.
It needs improment. I wish it has one more hole to put a screw on the wall.It looks shaky for 55 inch TV. However, it still holds it.
I brought a 32' tv for my room, and bought this mount to hold. Very good detailed instructions. Packaging was well kept and came on time.. Works great for all tvs.
everything works will but 2 things, I used it on a 23" ips monitor and it is very light weight, due to its light weight it is not easy to tilt it down or up, I believe the mount was designed for the heavier monitors.  The second thing is that I had to cut off the bottom corners as my monitors plugs ended up being covered...no big deal, the metal is fairly soft so I was able to use 18 gauge tin snips to cut off lower the corners. Other than that the mount is working out great.
I installed this for my sister who had a 22" Philips LCD. Nice sturdy mount, with all of the nuts, bolts, screws included. Only problem was that since my tv was so small, and I was using the most inner mounting hols on the mount, the outside edges of the mount covered both the cable connection, and the power cable connection. Instead of returning, (then paying $70 from a local store) I simply went to a hardware store, got a 1 & 1/2 inch boring tool that attaches to a hand drill, and drilled holes into the mount. It was pretty easy, but a bit messy. It is not visible after mounting the TV, so who cares?? It is one thing to consider before buying this, there may be another mount that does not cover your TV connections. Otherwise swivels well, does not sag, good value.
The unit arrived in minimum time, had to drill out existing pivot bolts and install larger size to take out the sag or play, it works great, also I had to cut an area out from the bottom of the plate to have access to the hook ups.As I said you get what you pay for the unit was suppose to fit my vizio 26 inch tv.
As soon as i received my mount it looked realy flimsey, but actually it is sufficient for the 32 inch sony tv that i use. The tools they provided were not good, luckily i have my own spanner set.Setting the mount is really easy, you might need someone to help you mount the TV(I did it my self though, was not easy alone). Adjust the joints to your convenience and enjoy watching.
Got this for my parents so they could watch tv from the bedroom and free up some space on top of their dresser. I put it up on the wall from the side of their bed. This thing extends out so nicely and doesnt feel cheap one bit. My parents love it and thank me constantly for it! Highly recommend
great productif you want  to make your leaving room to look real good that the way to go .
This was needed to mount a 32" LCD that weighs 27 lbs in my bedroom. I looked at another mount by the same company but it did not articulate so I was worried I wouldn't be able to achieve the viewing angles that I needed. So I found this one & went w/ it based on the high reviews. I could not be more pleased.1) PRICE - If you were to go to the big electronics store (BB) or the big box monster (WM) you would pay hundreds. I can't fathom those more expensive mounts doing anything that this one does not. Does it cook dinner for me? Why pay $100-$250 for a mount when you can get this one for $29.99 & oh, by the way have the confidence in 898 customer reviews averaging 4.5 stars at the time of this writing?2) FUNCTION - This mount is solid. It articulates to the left, to the right. It pans, it tilts. One small negative.....the plastic clips for routing wires are nearly useless. I took them off.3) WHATS IN THE BOX - Normally I would not comment on what an item comes with but in this case I was so impressed I felt it was worth mentioning. It comes w/ everything you need in neatly sealed and labeled plastic sleeves. It comes w/ lag bolts that everyone will use to mount to the wall stud. (mounting to a wall stud is required unless you are mounting to concrete) Then it has 9 different screw sets to mount the plate to the back of your TV. It has 2 washer sets for the mounting plate (based on if your TV has a flat or curved back). Then it has a spanner wrench for tightening the screw of the mounting plate. Then it also has 2 plastic anchors for mounting to a concrete wall. Last but not least are the VESA adaptors (which I did not need)4) WHAT YOU NEED THAT ISN'T INCLUDED -  Pencil / Level / Stud finder / Phillips screwdriver / Drill w/ a 7/32 drill bit / Socket wrench w/ a 13mm attachment.5) CONCLUSION - This is a no brainer. I have another 32" that needs mounted. I think as soon as I click publish for this review I will be ordering another one. If you find yourself reading reviews on TV mounts and you have found this one your search is over, just click buy already.
This wall mount is awesome, it holds up a 55 pound Plasma TV. Its great!! Have been using for about 6 months fully extended, and it is as straight as an arrow! No sag what so ever! I highly recommend this wall mount!
Bottom right mtg.plate covers power connection plug hole I had to bend it over.( no easy job) this was on a 26 in lg tv.other than that it was easy
Unit was received promptly and was easily installed.  All hardware needed was included and easily utilized to install the unit.
Strong and easy to install. Fits my old flat screen and new flat screen. Nice for the bedroom where you can angle the TV for your comfort.
I installed a 45 inch TV, which weighs right at 50 lbs, on a brick wall using the supplied masonry anchors.  Nothing about this looked like it was going to work but it does.  The unit is solid as others have said.  There are no instructions for brick, line it up so the holes are in the mortar rather than bricks, that way you can patch the holes if you ever move it.  Also, the cable management clips are pretty flimsy.  Otherwise than that, no complaints.  A little graphite lube on the hinges (sold for locks, wherever keys are cut) is good advice.  One major complaint, about the way these are sold by Amazon -- there are a bunch of different SKUs and you can't tell by this listing which one you're looking at.  Many of the negative reviews are related to this issue.
I like this mount because of the tilt function and more importantly, because of the extension.  I also like the multiple ways to attach the mount depending on the tv size.  It arrived on expected time and was fairly easy to install. If I ever need another mount,  I will buy another just like it,
I bought this wall mount for my 32 inch tv and it is perfect. And for the price it just cant be beat. I plan on buying a few more
Very good item; I am happy wit it, and delivery time was excellent!!  I recomended; is a good support for your LED TV. It is easy to install, and it have extra screws for different sizes TV.
I am using this with a 40 inch Samsung smart tv.  The extended bars were not needed.  This is very easy to mount to a wall stud with just two bolts.  Many bolts are provided to fit with your television.  It is very sturdy and able to be positioned in many different ways.  Highly recommended.
This is a great TV wall mount. After reading the reviews decided to purchase for a new Samsung 32" for bedroom.  The mount was easy to assemble and mount to wall. Although instructions call for finding a wall stud to mount, the hardware package includes large dry wall anchors and screws.  I opted to purchase "Toggler" high performance drywall anchors/toggle bolts.  These cost a couple bucks for a package of two at any big box store and they hold up to 240 lbs each.  There was no stud near where I needed to mount the bracket for the TV mount, so I used four toggler bolts, which was probably overkill.  The TV itself easily mounted to the wall bracket with hardware provided.  TV was on the wall and in use in less than 30 minutes.  Really like the 15 degree angle, which works great in a bedroom.  For the price you can't beat this mount.  Although I will probably never use the articulating arm, it is great for adding/moving cables from behind the TV by simply pulling it away from the wall.  Would highly recommend.
not the sturdiest, but very adaptable and the attachments work. This is by far the cheapest wall mount of this type.
With a large tv we needed a way to get it off the dresser. It was just what we were looking for and the price was right. Installation could have been easier however.
Installed this mount about a year ago and am using it with a 32" Vizio TV.  Installed easily, the product is well made, and it is rock steady.  Highly recommend!
Unfortunately, I'm returning this mount.Though I like the look of it, particularly the two part plastic piece that clips to the wall mount portion to cover the bolts, I feel that the one I ordered wasn't well made.I purchased it to mount aLG 26LE5300 26-Inch 720p 60Hz LED LCD HDTVin our kitchen.The mount arrived quickly and was well packaged. Unfortunately, the arm was welded to the wall bracket at a slight angle, meaning that regardless of how it would mount it and the LCD would never be level.Also, the powder coating near one of the bolts had come off and I could see some rust already forming.I decided to see if the mount would be the right fit for the tv before returning, figuring I would just get a replacement and hope for the best. I'm glad I did because this led me to find two other issues.The first one I blame on the manufacturers, the second I would consider a design flaw of the LG lcd.The first issue is that the screws supplied to attach the bracket to the tv are too few and two short. The screws are only 12mm long, and would barely catch in the threads of the TV if they weren't recessed at all. Most mounting threads on lcds and plasmas are partially recessed. I stopped by my local Lowes and picked up two packs of similar screws (M4-70 or something to that affect). $0.80 a packet so not much of an expenditure, just a big hassle. I needed 20mm long screws to mount this to the tv, so a pretty fair difference over what was supplied. The manufacturer supplies several different thread and gauge options, but only one shallow length of each set.The second issue is that this universal mount covered the power and HDMI ports on the back of the 26le5300. Again, I think this is more of an issue with the tv then the mount, as they're situated rather high and central. Either way, it's something you'll want to check on your tv before ordering this product.I actually returned this and in its stead purchased a similar mount from the same company. TheVideoSecu Swing LCD Wall Mount 20 inch Extension 55 lb loading capacity for LCD TV Monitor Flat Screen VESA 75mm/100 mm 1USgets very high marks from me. It's basically the same arm with a 75x75 to 100x100 VESA head on it. This second arm did not have any of the manufacturing errors of the previous model and fit the back of my tv perfectly.I understand that it's a very affordable mount, and that most of my issues may have been resolved with a replacement. However, I just can't give this mount any higher rating than I have.
This mount is heavy, strong and already in one piece. Almost no directions were needed. The only issue I would have: After the mount is installed I had to lift the TV to the mount and screw the screws in while holding the TV up with one hand. I checked the instructions to make sure I wasn't being stupid. The directions confirmed to lift the TV and screw in the screws. Other mounts have a bracket installed on the wall and TV, then I just lift the TV and click it right in. The sturdiness of the mount makes up for this defect in my opinion.
I was so excited by the price...the one i wanted at walmart was $159 dollars,  Once I recieved this one, i could see a big difference from the one I was considering.  It doesn't move fluidly at all...the instructions even say put it where you want it and tighten the screws.  I wanted one the could tilt out to watch in from bed them push back against the wall.  If that is what you what...DONT GET THIS ONE.  It seems unsturdy stretched all the way out with a 32in tv also.If you are like me, and dont want to shell out a lot of money, this one will be fine to mount , push it back against the wall, tighten screws and leave it.  Even the screen tilt scfrew.  Also, if mounting a bigger tv....all the screws are really close together and its a lot of weight in one spot.  It seems solid for now...but I haved got complete faith in it.Overall great for the price if you want to mount it and leave it.  If you want one to constant move around...you gotta spend some bucks.
Very sturdy. Seems compatible with pretty much any TV under the sun.  Has more parts than you likely need. I mounted my 40&#34; Samsung perfectly in the corner of my room and was able to save a lot of space by doing so.
Purchased this item at a very competitive price and it arrived in top condition. Powder coated with black paint and solid fasteners used for construction and assembly. Took 10 minutes to mount it and install tv. Excellent!!
INEXPENSIVE MOUNT THAT GETS THE JOB DONE,I MOUNTED IT AND THEN MOUNTED THE TV TO IT,SIMPLE INSTRUCTIONS ,EASY TO MOUNT UP
Definitely more robust than I anticipated. I bought this to install a 42" LCD for a client. I was very pleased to see it was a heavy duty, well built piece of hardware. I have no doubt it will hold up for he life of the tv
I hung this in my house with great ease and it held up my 8 year old son because I wasn't going to put the 55&#34; flat screen on it to find out that it failed. Fully extends out 2 feet. This was worth the money.
We hung our 40&#34; TV in our bedroom and it works perfect!  Strong and sturdy and assembles in no time.
This product did the job and well. It is a bit difficult to move when the TV is attached, however, because the TV is so heavy, I don't think much can be done about that. I would recommend this item.
I used this for my 47&#34; Samsung. Its fit/feel is great. Easy installation. Appears strong; although I personally spent way too much on the tv to risk leaving it fully outstretched with too little lag bolts for a long time! It is very convenient to be able to move it away from the wall however and I would feel very comfortable tilt or swiveling if needed. The movement is fluid and easily adjustable.I am very pleased with my purchase.
This is wonderful. came on time in great shape, went up with in a few minutes. Love the way it mounts and how it looks on the wall. thanks
So glad we bought this item. Good price. Fast shipping. Works great with our TV we now have mounted on our deck. Extremely well made.
Easy to installEasy to use and adjustAllows for multiple viewing angles, so we're able to watch from multiple rooms.4 stars because I did have to go buy longer screws to mount the TV to the bracket, but overall a Great Value!!
Works great with my 40&#34; sharp. Takes a little bit of time to set up but it's worth be able to watch tv where ever I am in my office!
I purchased this mount for my 37 inch LCD TV.  Installation was easy...  The trouble I encountered was due to a bad wall stud finder.  Make sure you have one when you install this mount because you need to screw the mount into a wall stud or at least have one screw into a wall stud.The arm of the mount sags after I hooked up my 37in. LCD TV to the mount.  My TV is within the weight limit of this mount (less than 55lbs.) but the arm still sags due to the weight of the TV.  I guess as long as it supports my TV, the sagging shouldn't be an issue.  It just looks funny from the side.  I do retract the arm inward towards the wall to minimize the sagging and it also gives me the warm fuzzy feeling that the arm will be less likely to break off.Overall, for the price this mount is a great deal and works but I would suggest purchasing it for flat screen TVs less than 37 inches.  I would not hesitate to buy this mount again but for a 32 inch TV at most.
Easy set up & so much cheaper than in stores! Will but again! Perfect!!! perfect! (Why do I have to type so many words?-Really)
I have a 47&#34; TV and had no place to put it in my bed room. With this mount it use the space i had a poster hanging. Very easy to install, came with all hard ware.
Swing arm worked just perfect for our needs! It now holds a 37&#34; TV at the perfect position for viewing in an otherwise awkward corner of the room. Yes, the swing arm was stiff at first, but just move it around a little and it loosens up enough to position it where it needs to be. I wouldn't want it swinging around freely, anyway. For the price, it absolutely cannot be beat! Comparable products inthe store were well over $100!
The price of this was great, it is strong, holds our Tv without a problem, it is made very well, and in the retail store it goes for more than $100.00 and not made as well. I would so say this is a very awsome buy. I do want to mention I have a 42in.TV
Well constructed wall mount for TV sets up to 37 inches. The mounting  plate has numerous holes for varius sets. Plenty of extra hardware provided. Price was about 1/8th of what it would cost on the open market. I recommend it highly.
This mount is excellent. It is very well built and sturdy. I used it to mount a 32" TV and it fit the need perfectly. The price was also very good and much, much cheaper than what an inferior mount would cost in a retail store. I would definitely recommend.
fit perfect for samsung 50' led tv sturdy material cant beat the price plan on buying another for my other tvs
Now I can arrange my room any way I want to and we can still see the tv. It is great.
We have no name tv's at work (Elemnet) and it fit those without an issue.It comes with the allen wrench and a cheap box end but no levels or stud finders that some of the more expensive models have
We just moved into a new house and there was only one stud on the small wall we wanted the tv on. We went from a double studded mount to this. We were nervous, with a 46'' tv, but this has done the job well for months now. We pushed it back to the wall completely and there is still room to hide the cable box behind the tv. My only complaint is that when you push it flush with the wall the tv is a little off center; it's not that noticeable though.
Used this with a Panasonic 22 inch LCD. Very durable and works as advertised.It was advertised as fitting 22"-37" televisions, but the size of the t.v mounting plate is so large that it covers some of the plug connections on the back of the television. I will have to cut the metal plate to get to the P.C connector if i choose to connect a computer.Haven't decided if i will keep or send back to get something with a smaller mounting plate.Other than that, it's a great product and meets my need for a hanging television.
The only reason I didn't give this a 5-star review is one design flaw:  The mounting plate for the TV isn't intended to come off the main arm (as it is secured with a lock nut) to allow easy mounting.  In other words, you have to mount the system to a wall and then hoist your TV up while someone else fastens it to the mounting plate.  That said, it wasn't difficult to mount to a wall, nor was it too difficult to secure the TV and it is very sturdy.  I've mounted a 32" TV that weighs about 25 lbs. and think the mount could've easily handled another 30 lbs.  I received the item within a few days of ordering and am quite pleased with the product.  Even at Sam's Club, mounts of this quality cost at least twice as much.
Great quality product. The price was better than what you would pay for it in the store. I'd buy it again of I needed to.
We had to &#34;shave&#34; a little off the wall mount plate to get this product to work for us, but after doing so it has served it's purpose on our 24&#34; tv.
Received the wall mount but not the free bubble level and HDMI cable as advertised.  Amazon had no solution other than just send me a label to return the mount.  I have no idea if the mount is good or not since I never put it up.  I only got the mount from Amazon because of the cable to use with it... I found the mount cheaper on another site and will buy it from them instead.
The package came in time and everything was in the box. My boyfriend put it all together and it's been over a year and the tvs still hanging in the mudroom.
After buying one for my 47&#34; LED TV, I ordered 2 more for my daughter's sets. It goes up easy, adjusts to any position. It folds flat against the wall and had a low profile. for the money and 2 day amazon prime shipping, you just can't do better.
Perfect for our bedroom! Can move TV against the wall or pull it out for viewing. Great product.  Highly recommend.
Amazing how easy it is to move my 46&#34; around on this mount and able to hang off one stud. Nice quality feel to metal it is made of.
Well I ordered 2 of these for my TVs. One is 35 in LED and one is a 55 in Plasma.I gave it 3 stars because it was perfect for the 35 in.Tho for the 55 inch...using the extender bars...I have a problem with because they give when I try to pull the TV from being right up against the wall. At first I thought it was breaking, but I looked in the back and the arm is fine, but the TV is leaning away from the mount! The arms are not strong/stuff enough to hold my TV to the mount plate... It will start leaning to the side and will not hold well with the pivoting up and down.So if you are going to have to use the 4 extenders because the screws are not located in the square part in the center... I would recommend looking for a different product. They advertised for my size, but should also put a weight limit for the arm mount.
I bought this for the flat panel I bought for my husband for his garage. It installed well, works great and looks great
i mounted a 42 inch on my wall, and it really does the job. for the price you pay, this is an absolute steal. highly recommend.
It works, easy to install. The 400x400 was kind of long and stuck out of the bottom of my 50&#34; about a half an inch.. For the price you cant beat it.
Easy to install.  It is nice to be able to pivot the tv in  many directions.  Will likely buy another one for the basement tv!
Works great... kind of a pain to install it took two guys and some power tools... and a lot of measuring... make sure you follow directions... also I didnt need all the hardware it came with, come one guys... not trying to make my walls swiss cheese. sheesh.
Great bargain for what you get. I wish it could adjust with having to turn bolts.I would recommend this to a friend.
very easy to install has added brackets for bigger TV but did not need. Pulls out further then any other unit
For the price, this is a heck of a wall mount.  You can move the arm & tilt it. Based on others' reviews, we purchased better quality screws.  We were a little scared once we got it up, but after a month, our 32" LCD is still mounted perfectly on our wall.
JUST IN STALL ANOTHER SAMSUNG 55&#34; LED FLAT SCREEN. OUTSIDE A  PATIO DECK AREA WHAT A DIFFERENCE THIS UNIT MADE.THE MOUNTING KIT WAS VERY EASY TO USE. AGAIN I DID UPGRADED TO  USING LONGER HEAVIER MOUNTING BOLTS. THAT WAS ONLY $1.00 MORE BUT IT'S WORTH IT IN THE LONG RUN. HERE IN EARTHQUAKE COUNTRY YOU NEES THAT SUPPORT. YOUR FLATSCREEN TV RETRACTS A FEW INCHES OFF THE WALL PLUS IT WILL LOOK SWEET FROM 2&#34; TO 24&#34; FROM WALL AREA
The mount itself seems fine, it just didn't work with the Phillips tv we bought....the 'x' arm things did not line up and if they did then the 'x' parts would have covered the holes for the inputs...........we ended up using one we had had around here.......seems to be built well though and sturdy
it was a really good price, arrived at the shipped promise date.  only thing i don't like is that you have to tighten screws and stuff to be able to tilt and swivel.
Bought the tv from Walmart they wanted eighty dollars for the same one. It does what I wanted it to all bolts needed wa in the box took about ten min. To install
It was easy to install on the wall.  I love the different angles you can move the TV while on mounted on the wall.
Well, it was super hard to anchor for me, it was going into a concrete wall with drywall over it.  I need super long anchors to reach the concrete block and anchor this thing securely.  I guess if you are satisfied with anchoring the mount into the drywall it would be much easier but I wanted it to be super solid!  I also needed to buy adapters to mount a VESA 400 TV.  So now it is supporting a 32" LCD and is rock solid.  Overall I give the product a solid 4 stars!  Another point, all of my TV's over 30" have a VESA 400 mount so expect to spend another $15 on adapters for this item to support televisions it says it supports.  Would have given five stars if it would support a VESA 400 mount.
This articulating wall mount is used at a guard house 24/7 by multiple personnel. It is strong and provides a stable, secure position even after several users have moved it to meet their daily preferance. It has been in use for 30 days without any repairs to the installation. I suggest that the wall mount have a 1/2" plywood base (12" X 12")bolted to the wall mount end, and this be attached to the wall. Even our 6' tall guard hasn't pulled the flat screen/mount from the wall or bent any of the articulating arms.
After reviewing all the available mounts, double checking the whole patterns on the back of the TV, I decided this was my best option. It arrived in about 3 days, even though it said 7 when I ordered it. It took me about 20 minutes to install it. The package with the bolts and mounting hardware was very abundant with many sizes for length and thread size. I am certain that anyone else that is looking at this mount will be able to adapt it to there TV. It is very sturdy, stout, universal and simple to install. I say buy it!!
It arrived ahead of schedule it works great and it went up e z. Just read the directions It can get a little tricky
The mount fit and worked well.  Had to invert the mount to mount it correctly in my RV but it has held the flat screen perfectly.
Perfect... This works great.  I went to Costco to see how much the wall mounts were there, I found it for around $180. I figured why not check on amazon, I found it there for $25.  It came on time, Exactly what I ordered it is not plastic its metal strong. Even though I only put a 24 inch TV on it I would be perfectly confident putting any size TV on it. I love it!!!Pro'sWell MadeMetalStrongEasy Set UpSeveral Mounting FigurationCon'sNone
very sturdy, easily moved in a regular daily way with a 40&#34; flat screen mounted. Easily assembled and installed. Thanks!
Very inexpensive.  Good build quality and the product came with a half dozen different screw sizes so its probably going to work with your tv.
This is very nice and simple. Works great if you want you tv in the corner too. Cant go wrong with this one and it took me about 10 minutes to put up. All you need is a socket(13mm), level, 7/32 drill bit and a drill and its up in no time.
This is an excellent tv mount. It took about 1-hour to install and mount my 26" LCD TV. It's heavy duty, very secure. It has a large range of adjustability for optimizing the tv position and viewing angle.
With just the one arm going out from the wall, I was worried that it wouldn't hold up my 55 inch TV. When the TV is completely extended, the arm does sag a little bit, but it's not bent or anything, it's just the hinge. It seems to be doing it's job and it's not damaging my TV or my wall.Also, I love all the angles that I can move my TV.  the room that it's in is rather large and I'm glad that I can turn it almost 180 for when I'm on either side of the room. :-) It was a great great price, and I would recommend it!
I bought this to mount my Sony 50 in. tv and it works awesome. Impressive for price it's a great buy
Cheapest price we could find for wall mount designed for our new tv.  We can turn the tv toward the sofa or toward the kitchen, press it against the wall, or pull it out.  One thing to keep in mind is that the tv is only flush witht he wall when the arm is off to the side, so centering the base on the wall won't center the tv.
I purchased the VideoSecu Articulating LED TV Wall Mount through Amazon.  It arrived promptly and was exactly as I ordered.  I am using it now and very pleased with it.  I would order again.
I was surprised with how heavy this box was when it came in. My husband installed the mount and tv without any help while I was at work. The tv has been up on the wall for a couple weeks and we have had no issues. We use the swing arm to tilt the tv towards the exercise equipment while we are working out and push it back against the wall in the evenings when we are watching movies.
Easy to install, worked perfect. Even included a HDMI cable that I wasn't expecting and saved me even more money.
This is not a high cost unit so i didn't expect too much.  It worked well and has given good service now for two years.  It could have a better cable management system on it, but I don't expect such frills at this price.  This is solidly made, no complaints
I am not sure why but for some reason the arms have bent a little so when I rotate the tv it tends to be crooked. Everything was mounted properly and my tv is not too large, I only have a 32" LED that weighs 14 lbs.
For the price, this wall mount is great.  Not too hard to install.  The only reason I didn't give it a 5 star is wire management.  I could not get the little loop to work.  Not a big deal at all however.  Overall, I highly recommend this product.  Well worth the money.
The arm is built steady and has a ton of possible holes to fit your TV.  I had to go through many options before finding a combination that my Sony Bravia needed.  I bought a pair of 5/16&#34; screws that were a little longer (3&#34;) than the lag screws included since I have 1/2&#34; sheetrock over plaster and furring strips.  I also put some felt on the bracket being fastened to the wall so not to damage the wall.  The arm moves in every direction other than up & down.  Well worth the price paid.
This was for a 32 inch LCD.  Easy to install and works great.  I am very satisfied with this wall mount.
A little cheesy, but you get what you pay for. It does what it is designed for. I would use if on a budget.
really nice and durable.. i have it hanging my 42 inch Visio and it menuvers excellently. highly recommend for mount buyers
I did research at the box stores and by far this is the best price and quality. Most of the swivels were 3 times the cost. I'm very happy customer and this was easy to install.
Easy to install and the TV is still on the wall after three weeks! I consider this a good value for the money
My application was to set a 50&#34; TV right under the ceiling in my sports room. Plus, the location was above the closet's sliding doors leaving only 17&#34; of vertical space on the wall. This mount allowed for such a tiny foot print with no problems. And it carried another solution of aligning the top of the mount and the top of TV because of the ceiling proximity. I could orient upper brackets horizontally and use a steeper angle for lower brackets. Because of a plethora of holes in the arm plate I could accommodate for any geometry. Amazingly, this kit comes with brackets-extenders if you need for weird TV form factors. The construction is very sturdy and there is no gaps in the joints. The TV can be turned and moved to any direction without skewing or loss of horizontal. Because of the extended arm it has another great potential by attaching your great old speakers to the back of the TV holding brackets. This might save you $500 - $1,000 on a Sound Bar.
I used this mount for putting a 42&#34; LCD screen on a wall.  It is a solid and sturdy mount.  I was extremely pleased by the quality.  Hex head lag screws that are included which are a breeze to drive into the stud.  I purchased a mount previously that had a phillips head on the lag screws and that really made them a job to drive into the stud.  Since the TV was rather large (400x400 vesa mounting pattern) I had to use the extension arms off of the main plate as shown in the picture.  They were surprisingly very easy to attach.  A nice plastic cover is included which slides back over the wall mounting plate to conceal the mounting screws - I thought that was a nice touch.Overall an excellent product and I would easily purchase another if I had another TV to wall mount.
The product arrived on time.  It is sturdy heavy black metal, probably weighs almost as much as the 40&#34; TV I mounted on it.  The instructions were somewhat unclear, especially the drawings, but if I had read them very closely, it would have been very easy to assemble and mount the TV.  This is a good product at a very reasonable price.  An added bonus is all the extra screws, etc that come with it to make it fit multiple sizes and makes of TVs.
Great value for a wall mount arm,  lots of options and works well,  comes with a wide variety of hardware to mount in any situation
Has been holding daughter tv up for couple years now it is good and strong 32 inch if your looking for something flat on wall this isn't what you want this sits a little off wall and can pull in and out must pull from both sides of TV may be difficult at times and you may have to secure bolts over time because pulling back and forth loosens up but they give you a tool keep it in safe place just for those times over all good product glad I got it.
Great mount for the large tvs. keeps them sturdy and right where you need them to be. Couldnt have asked for a better mount for the price.
For the price it can't be beat.  The mount is strong and sturdy.  Two sets of hands are mandatory for mounting, three would be ideal.  Once up though, it's better than most of our friends mounts.  It has full articulation, and I can swing the arm out and angle it towards my kitchen.  This is highly important while cooking buffalo wings and trying to keep tabs on football games.
For the price this was a grade product, nothing to compare to it at walmart or locally.  PLUS you got an HDMI cable.
I love having my flat screen up high in my bedroom. Makes it so much easier to relax while watching TV.
I've used other LCD articulating mounts that seemed better designed.  This is very stiff, making it extremely difficult to move.  The tilt can only be adjusted by loosening a lock nut on the back & then re-tightening while holding the TV at the proper angle (not a one person job).  On other designs, the mounting plate secures to the TV & then the plate fits onto the arm with (being held in place by gravity with only a small screw for safety).  On this one, you need to hold the TV up while someone screws the mounting plate onto the TV.
Moves to about any viewing angle around a 180 degrees. Tilts and swivels. Holds my 42&#34; LG 3D TV solid with no jiggling.Perfect!
Product arrived right on time. Installation was pretty easy. -- about 45 minutes. My wife helped me when mounting the TV but other than that, it was a one man job. Product came with good directions for mounting in a wooden beam or in concrete (for a basement I suppose) and slew of screws and other accessories to fit a variety of TVs. Fit my 32' like a glove.  Performed exactly as I desired once installed...TV swings into a sitting room off the master 180 degrees. I will likely reinforce the mount and reinstall down the road but the overall unit is fairly heavy duty and capable. I would think twice about mounting a TV over 30-35 pounds unless you reinforce the mount on the wall. Mine is 25 pounds and it is no problem at this point.  No real issues with tilt...when it is moved, you just adjust it to square.  Also, ensure the adjustment screws where the TV connects to the arm are kept fairly tight. Best 30 bucks I've spent in quite a while.  Tremendous value.
The package was exactly as described and the product was well built. I was not able to mount it to the wall, I did not know that it would not fit the TV I purchased. Shipping and product were excellent I just didn't get to use it.
I have a full 42&#34; HD flat screen mounted on this. Not only does everything look better than strapped to a table, but the adjustability makes this mount a pleasure to have.  It was simple to attach to the wall and has a small footprint, being a single stud wall mount.  The other major point of this mount is how many sized TV or monitors the mount can be adjusted to accept.  My TV mounts solidly and the mount itself is solid, yet adjusts with little effort.  This is just plainly a good and solid product that is well worth the money.
This wall mount came with clearly marked mounting hardware and easy to follow instructions.  It was super easy and was installed in on a matter of minutes.  Some of the other reviews indicated that there was not hardware included for mounting in wood studs, but I found that to be untrue.  There were 2- 4&#34; #4 Black lag bolts included with the hardware package.  So, you don't need to buy any additional hardware if you are mounting in wood studsThe only downside that I have found with this mount is the cable management clips that were included are of little use.  As soon as you put the clips in place along with the desired cables and attempt to swivel the tv, the clips pop off.  I wound up just using zip ties, which have seemed to work quite well.  But for the price of the mount, it was more than worth it.
Installed easy and in no time at all (finding the stud was the hardest part for me).  Articulates well with the 40&#34; TV on it. I would not hesitate to look for this brand when it is time for the next TV mount.
Instructions indicate you center the mechanical arm for mounting but it must be offset to center the TV correctly within the opening!
Mounting a 42 inch LG TV weighing 33 poundsPROLess expensivePrevious purchase of VideoSecu productAppeared solid and strongHad tilt and various adjustmentsMount on single studCONSagging..this is amazing that it sags and does so at different angles based on how far the TV is pulled out from the wallTherefore one cannot keep the TV properly aligned because any movement changes the tilt or other angles.Mounting is a pain because the mounting bracket never comes apart from the articulation armCritical bolt attachment for the mount from the TV to the articulation arm does not get tight!  This is amazing. It is not stripped but it does will not stay tight even from the first use.  This makes the product unsafe.I am amazingly frustrated bordering on angry because of the time put into this and now holes in the wall.  I need to get a different one.  My prior experience was with a VideoSecu MW380B TV wall articulating mount, which is far superior for a larger TV.  I bought this other one because I wanted a tight fit to the wall.Can I send a bill for my time and work putting it up and taking it down?????
This wall mount works perfectly for the TV in the guest room as the room is relatively small, and thus, we needed to place the TV in the corner. All in all this is very functional and has the ability to move in multiple dimensions. Note though it is difficult to easily tilt the TV down or up. A minor point is that the screws for the wall are very thick with the plastic screw anchors even thicker and so I had to drill really large holes - which given that I was mounting a 32 inch LCD-LED was not really necessary but would make sense for someone hanging a large plasma.The HDMI cable was a nice bonus and works very well.
It is a solid mount and I doubt that it will ever fail to hold the 22" LED TV that is mounted on it.  My only complaint is that the bolt that attaches the arm to the wall plate is smaller then the hole in the wall plate so when the TV is anything other than parallel to the wall it leans (up to 1.25" from one side of the TV to the other ~16") but for the price I can live with that.
I bought two of these mounts for two different size TVs. (36" Vizio and a 27" Sony with built in DVD).When I looked in the different stores, I was very disappointed in the price.  Most were anywhere from $60 - $100.  When I saw these on Amazon, I took a chance and was very glad I did.  I don't plan on moving the TV in and out all that much, but wanted it flexibility - just in case.  They installed with ease, came with more than enough screws for most any TV.  Both are working great and have no problems what so ever.  I would buy them again.
I love this mount.  This is the 4th one I've bought and it works great every time.  excellent seller and excellent product
Installation was easy.  TV is stable and can be positioned in many positions.  Not sure it would be all that stable if the TV was moved a lot, but the mount works perfect for my use.Have bought a couple more of same mount.
Awesome product for a great price.  Used it with 40 inch Samsung smart TV.  Works great and is easily set up.
This is a well built device.  However the instructions suggest that you install the whole device on the wall and then install the lcd onto the device while it's on the wall--6 (smallish) screws.  This means that if you are by yourself, especially with a big tv, you won't be able to install it.  You will need 2 people.  In my case, I have a smaller tv, 27" and I had no one to help me!  So I took one articulating arm apart from another articulating arm (1 screw), attached wall mount to the wall (only used 2 screws into the stud with screws I bought at the hardware store--the tv weighs only 15 lbs & the device can hold 55 lbs if the correct screws are used), attached the television mount side to the tv while the tv was sitting face down on my couch (this is really the best way to do it because you don't have to balance anything)--and with only 1 screw to attach the two articulating arms together--and a big screw at that--I was able to put the tv up by myself. You will find that you will need to adjust the screws on the articulating arms because they come to you pretty tight.  And for the price "such a deal"!
arrived promptly, packed wellsupprisingly held a 46&#34; tv with no problem!!!blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah,
This device is somewhat weak even for the 46 inch TV weighing only 31lbs that I'm using it with. after some adjusting it's working ok.
The instructions aren't great, but it doesn't take a rocket scientist to figure out how to put it together.  I have it holding a 50&#34; led Samsung.  The swivel joints are a little stiff, but I don't need it to move, I just needed it to hang over a cutout above our fireplace.  It works perfect, and you cant beat this price.  Very sturdy, and it holds the TV level in place.  I like the ability to swing the tv away from the wall when I need to retrieve something in our wall cutout.
I love this mount! All the adjustments for tilt and extension are awesome! Holds a Sony 32in Ex-3000 just fine even fully extended. Even bought another. A++Mike
Installation was a breeze. Will work with any Vesa mount TV. Tilts and rotates with ease. Can't beat the value!
This mount is just what I needed.  It is strong and sturdy.  It folds almost flat to enable the television to sit square and flat against the wall if desired and extends and rotates for angle turns.  A perfect fit as long as you match the correct visa pattern for your television.
We wanted a full motion mount for our 50 inch tv and this one is perfect. Pivots every which way. Was a bit tricky at first aligning the holes but definitely worth it! The stores wanted over $100 for the same item!! Would highly recommend!!!
I bought this with a Coby TFTV3225 since I wanted a wall mount and it was in the recommended items section - it does not fit!! The TV is a VESA 200 400 not 100 200. Yes, it was already on the wall when I realized this. Since it's in the "Customers Who Bought This Item Also Bought:" section, there must be a lot of returns...
This wall mount turned out to be great value. It does everything as advertised and was easy to install. Glad I didn't spend the $125 they wanted for a similar product at the big box store.
I got this aas a gift for my mom she just purchased a new tv and wanted to hang it. It seems durable and she is happy with it. So I guess for the price I would recommend it to others.
We've had the TV installed for several months now and have not had any issues.  It is so wonderful to have it wall mounted.  It was easy to attach our 42&#34; TV.
I bought this mount due to the price should of known that when a swing mount is less then $40 its not going to be the best. First its a pain to put together instructions not that clear. Second the arms which is shown on the picture are very flimsy. I would recommend this only if your not going to be moving it alot otherwise spend the extra dollars and get it from Costco or Walmart so you can return it for a better one.
Purchased this for a small 22 in TV for bedroom. The mount weighs more than the TV ! That's not a complaint though. I actually took down the 22 inch set today and mounted a 37in Sharp Aquos. Much heavier set than 22 in, no issues at all. It supports the 37 in just fine. The set probably weighs 35-40 lbs. For the price, $25,it was a great bargain. Installed it myself into wall studs,very secure.
Was easy to install and is very sturdy. I would recommend this to anybody because I a impassable deal and is a must if you have small children who play around the tv
This item of a wall mount will not work with a 33" tv or bigger. Found out on Christmas day and had to buy a different one for my son room.:(
I purchased this mount based on others comments beforehand and i appreciate the guidance. The problem with wall mounting flat screen TV's is to make sure the hole pattern of the mount lines up with the hole pattern on the TV you buy. I'm using this mount with a VIZIO E320ME 32-inch and it works perfect.
Bought NEW but I could tell right away that mine had been repackaged and refurbished.  Plus the was missing the 4 arms but had some other random hardware included.  I made mine work for my 32&#34; set and it serves it's purpose. Just wish the seller was upfront on the condition, I could have bought a used one for $5 less.
Thrifty mom had no problem mounting this on my daughters wall. It was easy and I enjoyed the results.  My daughter and my husband were very impressed at how good the wall mount looked. Great choice, great price.
I bought this TV mount to attach a 32" flatscreen tv inside an armoured so it can be pulled out and swiveled 180 degrees in either direction.  The mount is simple and sturdy, with straightforward mounting.  It works well, although cable management is a bit tricky and we need to be gentle when moving the tv.The mount came quickly, arrived before promised, and we are totally happy with it!
This wall mount was easy to install, bought 3 of them...love them all!  Great price!!!!  Bends and goes all directions that you would want!  Highly recommend!
It works, it moves, it moves every which way, uses one stud, you will be pleased, cheap, quality, good buy.
I originally bought this for a Sony 40&#34; TV, but installed it with a Vizio 42&#34; instead.  I did this because the Sony is an older model TV and weighs a little over 50lbs (which is still within this mounts rating) and the Vizio only weights 23lbs.  I have a Sanus extended articulating mount that I bought a few years ago and paid over $100 dollars for it.  (It now costs over $150) The Sanus is much stouter in construction than this VideoSecu mount is, so by reading some of the reviews on here and not knowing exactly how this mount was going to measure up pre-install, I swapped out TV's to match mounts accordingly.Now that installation is complete, I'm sure this mount would handle either TV just fine.  Is it the same quality as the Sanus? No, but it has enough quality to perform its advertised claims.  I saw some reviews on here complaining about mount sag after install.  Now this is based on the 23 lb TV, but I'm not experiencing this problem.  The mount has 4 pivot points and after installation, ALL need to be tightened to the point that movement is allowed with intentional moderate force.  Out of the box, this mount would have sagged like others complained, but I'm guessing its left slightly loose to help ease the installation process.I won't hesitate to buy another one in the future if the need arises.  An excellent price ($30) for a good quality mount.  If you want a mount that you can do pull ups on after install, buy the Sanus (and pay 5x more to do it).  If you want a mount that you can safely hang and secure your TV on, save some cash and buy this mount.
this Wall mount is easy to install and very good to move the TV to the angle you wantfor that reason I recommend it
Just as advertised. Love it! Moves in different directions and stable. In, out, up, down, tilt, sideways... I put it up high on the wall, so it's perfect.
I used it to mount a 32" LCD TV to the wall... about 28LBS.  I installed it in less than 1/2 hour and am very happy with the results.PROS:-Comes with all of the hardware you'll need-Comes with some extra hardware of which I have NO IDEA what it is there for.  I suspect it's a 'universal' hardware pack for several models and not all hardware is used for all models, but it's nice to have a little 'extra' (which is always better than not enough!)-The included Level is nice... well it's cheap but it works!-The instructions did a decent enough job of explaining how to install the unit.CONS:-Metal is just a tad on the flimsy side.  I have no problems trusting it with my &lt;30lb television but if I were to mount something closer to its maximum rated weight of 55lbs, I think I would be quite a bit nervous about it holding up.-The holes in the base were just a little bit too wide for my wall stud.  I think the particular stud I was installing it onto was a typical 2X4 and if centered, the left and right side holes were just a little too far to grab both sides of the stud.  I had to reposition it so that the center holes were aligned to the left side of the stud, and that the right side holes were aligned to the right side of the stud.  As a result, I was only able to install four of the six bolts to hold it in place, but I don't feel it will be an issue with my 28LB television.  If your house uses wider studs this probably wouldn't even be an issue.-The metal does sag just a little bit with the weight of the television on it.  I mounted the base just a little bit "off level" to help compensate for this, and had no problems getting the television level using the adjustments available to me.CONCLUSION:  All in all It's not a bad unit.. ESPECIALLY for the price.  Yes I would have liked to see a sturdier unit, but when you take into account the &lt;$30 price tag, it's an excellent bargain.  I don't think I'll have any issue with a static mounting of my TV in the corner of the bedroom *BUT* if you are considering installing this unit for a television that will see a lot of traffic, constant repositioning, etc... then you might want to spend more money on something sturdier.
It is a good value, but is not top notch quality. If you extend both arms in the same direction, the TV (30 inch) tilts. However if the arm goes right, then left, the play in the hinges offset each other and it works great.
Bought this mount for a 32inch Panasonic LED TV. The mount may look cheap, but I found it to be extremely sturdy and a great buy for the price. I strongly recommend it to everyone.
Sturdy and easy to install. It's a little stiff in its movement but it is nicely adjustable and gets the TV out of the way and up against the wall when desired.
Unit came with all sorts of screws for any type setup. Quality was better then expected, well made and sturdy.
I like long arm and it work great I recommon get long arm instead of short which I had and long arm was better
Quick and easy installation - very solid product. Very pleased with this purchase.When in need of this type mount again I will certainly purchase this brand/model again.Great price on Amazon makes it very easy.
The mount plate and the extender arms need to be screwed together and there are two holes for each arm to attach to the corner of the plate. The holes don't align so I couldn't put two screws in. I just used one screw which is not the most secure attachment. Then I used zip ties to secure the arm better. I did this because I had to install the tv ASAP and could not wait for a replacement. Also, the mounting bracket that attaches to the wall has a larger screw hole on the bottom. This means that the bottom can wiggle and the bracket will be misaligned. Again, I did a quick fix. I gave this 2 stars and not 1 because it actually stayed up on the wall and is now holding my tv, albeit due to my own ingenuity and not the quality of the mount. I should not have to do quick fixes on a product like this.
This product arrived in a timely fashion. It was boxed appropriately with adaptable arms etc. I did not use the additional arms because my 40&#34; Samsung Smart TV configuration was convenient for the existing metal plate holes. Because I have used many arms for a majority of all my TV's, I can safely say this was a standard and sturdy easy to install arm. I would not use this arm for a 55&#34; TV even though it says it can accomodate it. The reason for this is because you cannot compensate for the inevitable sag or pull on the metal components. Also if you plan on a consistent manipulation of the arm in a back and forth adjustment- to which it is designed; than choosing the right arm and compatable television is a must!
We have this in our living room and it displays our flat screen beautifully, I can't believe we waited to long to get one!
So you're going through all the possible wall mounts for sale, and you after you've noticed that most of them are north of $50, and many are selling for $80, $100, or more, then you start thinking about this unit.The hope is that you'll spend something around twenty bucks on a device built in China (I believe), and use it to secure your flat panel television (your sweet baby) to the wall. Your television probably cost you several hundred dollars, so entrusting it to this wall mount is a big leap of faith.I received mine about three weeks ago, and since I'm not handy, I had my buddy help me. You better be ready to drill, because you're going to be mounting it into the wall with multiple screws/brackets. You have to know how to find the stud in your drywall...It took my friend and I about forty-five minutes to install the unit.Included with the wall mount is a tool, some sort of wrench you will need, but it was so poorly constructed that we wore it away so badly in the first few minutes that it no longer turned the included screws.So far, for the last month, the wall mount has held my 32" television (which falls within the allotted weight) up to the wall. There are two caveats: firstly, I NEVER pull it out, articulate it, turn it... nothing. I don't trust the wall mount enough to do anything but leave the television flush against the wall. Secondly, make sure you have a level with you, not just for installation, but pretty much for the life of the wall mount so you can make sure your television is level from time to time, in case you bump it or move it ever so slightly.Well, that's all there is to say. Good luck to you.
This is a Great Wall mount and especially for the cost!  I've ordered a second one to hang another tv. I would definitely recommend!
Put a 40&#34; TV on this outside, works GREAT! Easy to attach and moves easily! Would definitely recommend this to anyone!
this is a very high quality mount . very well built with high grade steel. works great for a corner mount on my 32 inch flat screen.
We used to have a larger TV that sat on a shelf in our 5th wheel. It had fallen a few times, when we forgot to place it on the floor before driving. My husband uses our trailer for staying on site at his job. We ended up buying a small flat screen TV and this mount is so great, it swivels so we can view it anywhere in our trailer. When we travel, no need to put the TV on the floor. all we do is secure it to the wall by putting a bungie around the TV and the mount and we're ready to roll. Thank you
The mount itself seems well constructed.  I was hesitant about having only one brace against the wall to support a 40 inch tv but it seems to work.The only downside is that the beam above my fireplace is centered on the wall and to the fireplace... when the arm is completely folded and the tv is as close to the wall as possible, the arm does not line up with the mount.  The center point of the tv is not inline to where the mount is screwed into the wall, SO my tv is off centered.-Mount is screwed into beam, centered. When arm is retracted or folded fully to keep the tv against the wall, the tv center is off, it is next to the mount against the wall.Hope this makes sense.Other than that it works
I used this mount for an LG 32 inch LCD so it only needed to hold 30lbs which it is doing no problem.  I am only able to screw in two of the four screws to the back, but it seems to work just fine.  I saw in the other reviews complaints about the bolts and the need to make sure you mount the unit level as it does not adjust to compensate in that manor.  I think they must have addressed these problems because the bolts provided are sturdy and the tv has some play to compensate for any mistakes in mounting.
I do some adjust for a  sony 40&#34; TV I'm happy I recommend to my friends also good price and fast service good qualitythanks..
I was looking for an articulating wall mount arm for a 32" LCD that would mount near the corner of a wall.  Because of the TV's location I wanted something that would provide flexability and movement for optimal viewing angles.  I looked at several brands but for the price I was leaning toward the VideoSecu mount. The product description says it will hold a screen up to 37" so this should be no problem.I would not recommend this for someone who needs to move a large screen very often because the mount becomes stiff at the various joints under the weight of the TV. If you are looking for something you can set in one place (or periodically move) that offers more flexability than a traditional wall mount, this is an awesome product for the price.If I had it to do over again, I'd buy the same mount...
This mount was the most inexpensive one I found on the internet or elsewhere.  It was easy to install.  It performs everything we wanted out of a mount.  It is sturdily made not cheaply made.  Great product!
Received it very fast and onlyn took me less than a hour to install. Just make sure you make sure it's mounted to a stud.
This was just what I was looking for.  It fit my TV perfectly and installation was very simple.  5 stars all the way!
This is a very good wall mount , easy to put up and very durable.and the swing arm is great for adjustments.
My students and I used to huddle around laptops to discuss projects. Now I have a 47&#34; TV for display and this mount makes it possible to put it on any wall and swivel it in any direction depending on how many people need to see the screen. Really stable, no wiggling
love it. i can position my 40 inch any way to my liking. no dislikes. Assembly is fairly easy if you have all the tools
I had a tough installation and this proved to be the best and most affordable solution. I needed some reach for my tv, and it was really easy to install. The way it is engineered allows for a flexible install for a tv. I love it so much I am about to buy a 2nd one. my first tv was a 46&#34; Samsung LED. I am about to buy my second for a 32&#34; Samsung Smart LED.
After buying a couple that didn't match up to the screw holes on the back, I decided to take my search to Amazon.  After searching for my tv, I found this one.  I found it especially useful that Amazon had a picture on the website with the measurements between the screw holes.  I could easily measure the holes in the back of my tv, before I even bought it.  Installation was very simple with easy to follow instructions.  I've had it up for 2 weeks now, and it's peforming flawlessly.
Don't have anything to really complain about.  EXCEPT there doesn't seem to be a way, or i'm missing it to tilt the TV up or down (ie. mounted high on the wall and pointed down towards the chair).  and i am quite savvy with tools/assembly/etc. And it is difficult to get to the bolt heads on the back of the TV to adjust the angle.  No reason to not buy it though.
For $25 you can get a wall mount that is every bit as good as a $150 unit from BestBuy.  Sturdy, attractive TV mount also includes a free HDMI cable--which can cost $25-35 at a place like RadioShack!  Is was easy to mount--please note you must have a stud in your wall and pre-drill pilot holes--if you are handy.  The enclosed level was a nice bonus.  It fits all the standard-size TVs I am considering, and it seems sturdy under the load from my aged 27" TV w/ built in DVD.
this mount was not only the best price for a dynamic TV mount, but it is built with strength and longevity in mind. The angles described are true to form, allowing me full control of the 180 degree yaw, and 15-degree tilt flat-screen TV.  the instructions were very simple to follow, and once mounted to the stud, has demonstrated stability and agility in the control of my TV and its A/V inputs thereof. having this mount, and trusting it, has drastically improved my quality of life with respect to using this television, and nullified any further need for another monitor or TV in its location because of how versatile the mount has allowed the TV to be. a perfect buy, and i'd recommend this to everyone with a TV that has these mounting specs.
the right tool to extend my 23" all-in-one computer a few inches from me in the bedroom to cruise the internet or watch tv . what can I say , it works just how I wanted . A recommended product for sure , was easy to put up .
tv was ok but dont like the display, too small to see and sound is not great. everything else was great
This is the second time I purchased one of these brackets.  It's solid and easy to install.  The included hardware allows for many TV mounting options.
Ordered this for a 26" Flat Screen used in the bedroom...Overall it is a decent mount...It is a bit difficult to adjust and does not move as freely I would have thought...but it does work and it does cost less than many of the brackets...overall a good value...
I bought this when I moved and I love that my TV is mounted.  This mounting bracket is perfect my TV and it moves so many ways.
This item is stable, neat, and easy to install. The black finish paint has no flaws, it like a matte black, so it kind of blends with any television with a black back console. Not stick out all shiny like.
The absolute best TV Mount on the market.  And for the price its like Christmas! Angles your tv in any position and is also super easy to install!!
It was not too hard to put up. That was nice but its a little hard to swing and very hard to tilt it.
its a little flimsy and not the easiest to put together, for the price it works.  But for the quality i'd go with Cheetah.
One of the easiest TV mounts to install.  This works on several standard TV mounting patterns and has a &#34;quick release&#34; to put on or take off the TV.  Well worth the money!
Awesome price and works fantastic! Easy to install and fit my 55 inch samsung smart tv perfectly. Glad i found this one before i bought one twice as much in a store!
ASIN:0972683275 VideoSecu Articulating LCD LED TV Wall Mount for 22" to 37" Flat Screen with VESA 100 200 Mount Pattern 1XE]]  this wall unit was very easy to install, has all the hardware needed, and does an excellent job of allowing you to maneuver your TV to any position you want, also the price was unbelivable.  we mounted it on a wall that has about a six inch offset, with the unit having the maneuability that it has it was exactly what we needed. our TV is a 32" Toshiba Flat Screen.  if you need a mount for your flat screen TV and it is not over 50 lbs i can highly recommend this unit.
The wall mount is well made. Strong parts. Good size bolts to mount to the wall. Price is the best out there for the quality of the product, that is not to say it is of cheap quality. The quality is as good as the ones selling for between $50 and $150.I would highly recommend this wall mount to any one mounting a TV or PC monitor weighing less than the limit it lists (55 lbs I believe).http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/0972683275/ref=cm_cr_rev_prod_title
Installation went well, instructions were clear and had more than enough hardware to complete the job.  Of course you will need a helping hand when putting something like this up on a wall, but overall it was easy.
This product is user friendly and versatile.It is easy to install and comes with everything needed for installation.Adding bidding could drill and bit
This mount is perfect for my needs. Some may think that it's a little stiff, but after moving it around for a while it should loosen up. Overall happy :)
Sturdy easy mounting with great selection of hardware. Price was well worth it. Will be ordering for my sister and installing a 42 inch tv with it.
Very easy to mount and hang the tv.  The mount is very versatile to accommodate many sizes should the need arise.
Got my TV mounted with this above my PC and its been on the wall for a year now. No problems with it holds the TV well and its study. Way cheaper than store bought and its perfect for what I got i got a 37 inch HDTV
My flat screem computer monitor is very light and didn't need such a heavy duty mount.  The product is fine and would work for monitors much larger and heavier than my 20&#34; LED
We recently mounted a tv in our boys room but the arm was too short so we were only able to mount a smack tv. My husband was in search for a tv mount with a longer arm so we can get a bigger tv. He came across this and were glad we purchased it. It works well for a corner mount, the arm is more than long enough for our purpose.
This thing is great for the price. The most important thing for me is that it feels very sturdy. I can't see my TV falling off the wall with this. It comes with a lot of extra bolts and spacers to make sure it works with all TVs. It does feel pretty stiff and can be hard to move the TV around.
I received it, opened it, installed wall portion, installed back plate on 32" Sony TV, and mounted on wall without issue - very solid. I then discovered I had no place to plug my power cord, dang - it's under the back plate. reversed process and this time plugged in power cord first then applied back plate - re-mounted - adjusted viewing angle - Perfect!
Worked great. Easy mounting and setup. 2007 Vizio 42&#34; LCD hung perfectly. It is a heavier TV, around 50lbs and it mounted up great.
Love the price and Love the quality.  Super easy to install what's not to like about it. Would defiantly buy it again.
It was easy to put up. I like the way I can move it around.  Overall great product. I would recommend this to anyone.
The mount is a full on 5 Star device!  Used to mount a 42&#34; Insignia LED TV in my bed room, but I needed to be able to turn the TV 90 degrees to the wall as to be able to actually see it in bed.  This mount dose the job exceptionally well, and then folds back flat against the wall to be out of the way.
not to bad of a deal,this was new to me, hanging a tv on the wall. i ordered this mount not paying attention to the mounting holes on my tv, well it did not fit,so before ordering this unit check where your mounting holes are, you may have to order the extentions to make it work. i love mine,and would buy another.
you can spend a ton of money on one of these, or you can buy this one.  hung a 32 inch tv with it with no problems.
Very solid...we mounted our flat panel in the bedroom. Like the tipping feature and love the articulating feature.We checked prices at stores, big boxes, etc. best price of all including Costco...
Could not be happier, absolutely perfect.Clean looking solid build, beat the shat out of  my bedroom unit (payed twice as much)
Loved the wall mount. It was very simple to put together and install. Was very excited to add more space in my room.
I really like the action on this mount.  I purchased a 27&#34; monitor for my wife and this mount really frees up the desktop real estate.  I would purchase again.
This was a present for myself, my son installed it, in about 25 minutes, and I couldn't be happier.  I wasn't sure this was for me as it for my bedroom, but my husband and I love it.  So easy to move the TV no matter where you are in the room.  A great buy.
I would have given this a 5 star rating, but it came without instructions and there were parts missing. The part is that once I figured it out, I didn't need the missing parts, and it works like a charm.
Perfect fit for my 37&#34; TV. Sturdy and strong. Will hold the weight
Way more substantial than I thought and more than did the job as intended. Thought obviously went into how engineered. Safety an obvious by product.
Was everything I expected its sturdy, well built and it makes my tv look absolutely amazing mounted up on my wall. It's awesome thanks a lot!
Very good materials, very lightweight,  cheaper than others brands. I have a 47&#34; LG Led tv and it fit at 100%, and I'm capable of sell my tv, buy an 55&#34; and use the same mount without problems.
This mount is very sturdy, assembled easily, and had all the parts to attach to the wall securely. While the monitor turns easily from side to side, I wish the adjustment for tilting the monitor up and down did not require a nut be loosened first.
Excellent buy. Mounted my 36 inch samsung LED without a problem. Very easy to install. And came with all different screws to fit any kind of tv. A++
Great bracket work wonderful easy instructions and I was able to do it myself with a few tools needed for the install
Before Buying this product i saw many bad negative rewievs but after i bought it was what was hoping for . I have 51 inch samsung tv and i did research my tvs wieght and hieght before buying this product . this is spectacular product i hang my tv to wall and holds it perfect . price is also good its same product as an 400 200 wal mounters any i love it .
firstly, this thing is sturdy! I mean i gotta 55in sony hangin from it and even when you pull it all the way out it holds great!the only thing is the bottom 2 bars of the x shaped support stick out past the bottom of the tv and are visable. it just doesn't look exactly clean but it holds up.I think this is more of a sony tv design flaw having the mounts off center. however, I cant help but think if the x bar things could &#34;slide' to varying lengths, then fasten it would make this product 5 stars.I if you want to position it a specific way you also have to use a socket to loosen it, move it, then tighten it. its not a big deal for me becuase i dont move it often enough. its not a big deal but for the price it is great!
When you consider the outrageous prices for mounts in stores compared to here on Amazon it's ridiculous not to buy a mount like this. Easy to set up and had all the hardware you could need this is a great deal for a good product.
I was lucky that I didn't need the extensions, the holes in the square plate the extensions bolt to matched up with the TV mounting holes perfectly.  That saved some installation time.  It is a very sturdy bracket.
Very sturdy and easy to install no sagging at all with the weight of TV.  The only place for a TV in my living room is in a corner so this mount did the trick and was fairly easy to adjust. Just follow the directions. Figure out how high you want want it, locate the center of the stud, pre-drill the hole and use a ratchet to screw in the bolts. The bottom screw hole gives a bit of wiggle room to get it perfectly level. The plate for the TV side is a quick release so it's easy to get the TV on arm after it's been mounted. Everything adjusts with ease if it moves or tilts too easy or too stiff , then tighten up or loosen a bolt or two. My TV uses the VESA 400x400 screw pattern and it lined up fine.
The mount I purchased is great. It is designed for TV's 32&#34; and under. The link here, and image are not correct. But, I really thought the mount was build well, was easy to install, and the price was fantastic.
I bought several based on the reviews and all positive are right on the money. The products lives up to its description and most of all capacity. I mounted my 55" and it was breeze and the product held it as if it was a 32". I did not have a problem with the tilt as the other reviews mentioned. The manufacturer must have corrected it. I just hand tightened the screws and no  tilting issue experienced. I will buy again if I need more. Great product.
VERY CONVENIENT for the tv AND STURDY CONSTRUCTION. GREAT BUY! Would definitely recommend buying this product! EASY TO INSTALL ALSO!
I'm using this with my 32" tv and I love it. The price is significantly lower than what you can find for monitor wall mounts in the retail stores (walmart, best buy).I found this to be an easy install and very secure. The swivel is smooth and I can orient my television perfectly. It also has plenty of VESA mount patterns so it will hold just about any TV.
works great and goes up easy. Cant beat the price. Like how you can swivel the tv to different positions
Santa brought me a 47&#34; Vizio Smart 3D TV (M3D470KDE) for Christmas and I came to Amazon looking for a reasonably priced wall mount for it. After reading the reviews and the specs of this wall mount, I made the purchase. I got the free shipping and it arrived sooner than I expected, which is always good.It took me around 30 minutes to install this mount from opening the box to plugging everything back in. It has plenty of adjustments, articulates as expected, and holds this TV fully extended without issues. I recommend using a stud finder and drilling pilot holes for the stud screws and using a good ratchet & socket to drive the wood screw into the stud. I'm glad there  is only one stud to find and only two holes that need to be drilled, which makes it easy for anyone. lolAll in all, I'm very happy I got this wall mount instead of a more expensive one that does the same job.
This bracket does not fit the tv, as it says it did in the product description.  Very disappointed in the product. Had to return it and pay for the shipping cost, which wasn't cheap, due to weight of bracket.  Don't waste your money on this!
Ordered this for a 32 inch TV. Was easy to install, all parts are included and about $100 less that at department store. Great product.
Very good price and very good quality. I made big mistake before when I paid 3 time more for almost same product in a local store and quality was sucks. Buy it, you will like it and nobody can not beat the price
Very good and very simple to install, but if you don&#8217;t pressure enough one of the screws it does not balances well in to the wall, so be very Shure to have it done by an expert or someone that does it very well
This was easy to install and does the job.  It extends the way it is supposed to allowing multiple areas of viewing.
I purchased this for a 24" Sony TV. The instructions are clear, and easy to follow. There are many sizes of screws provided to ensure that your TV will have the necessary hardware. The arm articulation is smooth horizontally. However, if you want to angle the tv you have to loosen a nut, so if you typicall change the angle of the screen often, you could get frustrated. If you are looking for an easy TV wall mount this is one.
The instructions clearly say to hire a professional installer but who does that?  There are six mounting holes and only the two middle holes fit in the joist, at least in our house.  The other four screws went crooked because they rubbed the joists sides.  Maybe center it so at least four holes cover the joist and the other two use the anchors?  I just hope this thing holds!  The arm itself seems like it's straining a little, even though our TV is well within the weight limit - hope that part holds too!  I give it three stars but really it could go either way.
I used this mount on a 32" flat screen and it worked well.  I don't think I would use it on any larger TVs than a 32".
I have purchased this mount twice now - one for my bedroom TV, and one for my living room TV.  The bedroom TV is a 35" LCD, and the TV in the living room is a 55" LED.  (Surprisingly enough, they both weigh 50 pounds...)  This mount works very well for both of them.  It's relatively simple to install - you just need to find a stud and screw the support in to it.  (I will admit that my bedroom TV has been attached not to a wall stud, but a jury-rigged support brace on a cabinet.  It's still there and attached after 6 months.)I will say that the joints in the arms are quite stiff - it can take a little muscle to move the TV.  But I think I prefer that - it certainly doesn't feel flimsy, and it stays wherever I put it.A tip for would-be purchasers: make sure your TV supports this mount.  You can usually find your compatible VESA patterns in your user's manual.  (Or a quick online search, perhaps.)  As I often say - when buying online, it pays to do your homework.
I've had my tv mounted for about 3+ months now. Installation was not done by me (I had a guy do it for me), and I also don't think I would've been able to do it myself. I used my own wall mounting screws because the ones provided were not suitable for the wall. Before purchasing, I verified that it could hold my tv, which is a 42&#34; and 42lb plasma. However, when it was mounted I was a bit apprehensive because the arm seemed to droop a bit under the weight. The good news is that it hasn't fallen off the wall as yet!!!! I do plan to invest in a brand that's more sturdy though. All in all, I don't trust how it looks. I've been monitoring the wall-mounted plate everyday to make sure it's not starting to come out, and it really hasn't moved. I'm just not comfortable with how it appears and I've decided to not push back or pull forward at all. I just swivel it left or right. It's really great for studio apartment use because I'm able to watch/twist it to any part of the room I'm in. That's about the only positive...plus it was cheap, so you do get what you pay for!
I have a 26" LCD monitor mounted on unit.Seems sturdy enough, would prefer a more fluid motion and a way to adjust the pivot of the screen without tools.  As it is I keep it loose and it is reasonbly adjustable.For the price I certanily can't complain and would recommend this unit.

Easy to install and great price.  Gave it a four due to the quality not being the best but for the price what don you expect.
It works as indicated, but the quality of the hardware leaves a lot to be desired.  The bolts and screws are not made of a good grade steel and strip easily.  Also there's only one screw that controls the tilt of the tv, and because it's hard to reach and hard to use since it strips so easily, you're kind of left with a cock-eyed installation.
Been using this for at least a month now.  Using on a 32&#34; so it does a full 90 degree angle.  Most of the time is just sits like that, so the mount is definitely strong enough.  And it folds too if I just want the tv against the wall.  Definitely worth the cash.
The TV I have has very odd mounting holes. It is 200mm x 214mm. Not the standard for TV mounts. This one was well adjustable and able to fit my television. Great product
and these mounts are the best....I have friends with different types and when they see what I have they wished that they had bought this type instead.....it is solid, and I have all angles........I mounted it on a sturdy board and then to the wall as I live in a log home....
It probably would have been good, but the wrong item was sent to me.....and I ended up having to go to a local retailer and purchase another one that would work....the installer was not gonna be able to come.back.for several weeks and if they came back I would have had to pay another trip charge.Therefore I wasn't able to use the mounting support that was sent and there is too much involved to sending it back....Probably will not order items this way again....
Purchased this as an Xmas gift in order to mount a 32" Dynex TV, which was also a gift. If you've done any research whatsoever, you'll first note that mounts such as these are at least $100+ in stores like Best Buy, PC Richards and more. So, with that said even though I was looking for a better deal, I must admit I was a little nervous about this purchase. WELL, nerves were immediately settled when I finally got the item. Everything was shipped very well and upon opening the box for the actual mount (it was even double boxed for shipping!), I found all items to be in tact. The product was brand new with no signs of rust or chipping, as some have experienced with other mounts. I found the hardware for the lightweight Dynex 32" TV to be more than adequate for mounting and the process OF mounting took all of about 15-20 minutes. Included in the package was a small level and also an HDMI cable which has been working just fine for our son who has used it to hook up his Playstation 3. BOTTOM LINE: You will NOT be disappointed and it is more than worth the price.
If I need to order another, this will be the one.  I used this to mount a TV to the wall in my basement and it allows me to pull the tv out from the wall and turn it towards my desk so I can watch TV while working on the PC, nearly a 90 degree angle.  My TV is only a 32&#34; and I could see that this would work up to a 40&#34; or so, but if you don't need to turn the TV 90 degrees, you could get by with a larger TV.
If less money had been spent on packaging and more on quality, it might be a good product.The product was double-boxed.  The included level was broken. I would prefer to use my own level and have good hardware instead of junk on both counts.  One of the pivots on the arm was so badly rusted out of the box it seemed to compromise the whole system.  Despite 6 huge lag screws and strong arms, the joints are not strong enough to keep the mount level as it extends and articulates.  Each time I moved it it had to be re-adjusted to be level.  The hardware had to be tightened so much to keep it from wobbling, it made moving it very difficult.  I used a 26" tv.The whole thing went back in the box for a refund.
This is a really nice wall mount. My son had no problem mounting it for me. He liked it so much that his sister bought him one for Christmas. Great to have the TV on the wall with no grandkids standing in front of it.
The TV mount was very easy to adapt to the flat screen TV.  The instructions for assembly were clear and straight forward.  It came with more than enough mounting screws to fit any TV.  Easy to move after the TV was mounted and stays level in any position.
We bought this for our flat screen in the playroom. Really can't beat the price on it. Very sturdy and not too difficult for my husband to install. Glad we purchased it. I was a little worried that it wasn't going to be sturdy enough or would not be compatible with the TV, but it works great! We have a 42&#34; and this works great.
love it, it works just great holds a 32" t. v. no problem.like the idea that you can move this to different angels.
this is a great purchase I recommend it to anyone looking for a wall mount.... I do recommend that you pick up all the proper tools first but after that its a breeze
UH , WON'T  Work For All Sets .........Mostly made for  24 &#34; ..........Gave mine to GOODWILL........SO  , No Free Lunches
Good wall mount. Sturdy and does what it is supposed to do. In fact, it even held a larger TV than what it was listed as capable of holding. I believe I mounted a 42&#34; television with this one. Not a flat-flat one either. I mounted an older heavy thick one.
I just got this and a new 40&#34; tv.  Installed it in 20 min.  Easy and strong.  Great buy!!!  Highly recommend this tv wall mount.
less than half as much as one at Walmart. I mounted a 32 inch flat screen tv on it and it is perfect.
This is a great product, well-designed, easy to mount, easy to adjust. I bought this to put a new Samsung 28 flatscreen in my wife's office. With her help, we got everything done in about a half hour or so. The mount is excellent. It adjusts in every way, adjustments are easy to make and everything stays in place once adjusted. The great thing about this unit is that everything is included in the box--screws for the back of the TV, lag bolts to screw into a stud wall, even a small wrench to make the tilt and leveling adjustments. Very high quality product. Buyers should note that an electric drill, drill bit, Phillips screwdriver, and ideally a 1/2 inch rachet socket (a 1/2 inch box-end or open-end wrench would do) are needed, things that some households might not have in their toolbox. I recommend the product...but one must have the appropriate tools.
I purchased this mount for a 42&#34; Philips LCD TV and it works perfectly. The mount is heavy and holds the TV well. We have two adjacent rooms where we relax and this mount swivels easily around the corner so that was can view the TV in either room. I was a little skeptical using only two hex head lag bolts, but it holds the base mount solidly to the wall. Some of the reviews I read before purchasing it mention sagging, but I have no such problem with this mount. Using the extension arms, the holes on the back of the TV lined up and after tightening the screws, it was very solid as well. Make your connection first, then tighten. The bolt that attaches the TV to the mount arm just before the final step to adjust the position of the screen, seems a little small, but it holds. It took me about 20 minutes to install. For $29, it was a great buy. It comes with a variety of bolts to accomodate most mountings but I'd skip using the enclosed wrench for a metric socket and good screwdriver.
I have a 40 inch Sony tv and I was very disappointed that even this common tv couldn't fit the right bracket measurements. I had to create my own mounting method with the brackets and the screws in the back of my tv.That's not even the worse part. The actual mount itself can't even hold my 49 lbs tv. My tv is at a constant downward-facing angle. The metal arm itself is bending down because it simply cannot hold my tv how it's supposed. I'm scared to even use the full motion capability of the mount because the further I extend it, the more my tv hangs.I leave 2 stars for simple directions, and it came with all the screws and equipment I needed. (Besides a power drill)Not completely happy with this product.
I won a 32 in TV at work and gave it to my son since I already have one.  He expressed he would like it mounted on the wall, because of space in his room.  I found this on amazon and thought the price was good.  He installed it himself (he's 20 yrs old). The directions were easy to follow. He did a good job. The quality is very durable. I was a little nervous that it would be of cheap quality, but it wasn't.  While bored today, I decided to look at deals of the day and found this same one on sale for $19.99.  I couldn't resist in getting one for myself.  I have one already for myself, but it only tilts up & down. This one on Amazon Swivels & tilts.  I cant wait until I get it. My son has agreed to install it for me!!!Well it came after three days. I was concerned after readings review stating that it won't work with Sony brand TV`s..... it worked with my Sony Bra via.
had a couple of guys put this up for me, but they said it was easy to install. I like the fact that I can move it around easily and tilt it anyway I want it to be.
Great product..... when you figure out how to set ir up that is. I had the hardest time trying to place this mount on to the tv. Be prepared to figure out how to set it up yourself given that this is a universal wall mount so the instructions don't help much. After figuring everything out the mount is great. Had it up for a few months, tested it and it did there without moving. Great product.
Haven't yet set it up, but like that it can be moved from side to side. definitely worth the price!!!
This item didn't disappoint. It's sturdy, has all the screws included for different flat screen models and yes, it works well.
Excellent quality, solid metal construction, easy to install.  The only problem for me was that the plate that attaches to my TV partially covered the TV power cord receptacle and fully covered the cable input.  Since I am using the TV as netflix/Blu-ray monitor with a HDMI connection, the cable input wasn't a problem, but the power cord was a problem.  I solved it by using the bottom two holes on the plate to attach to the top two holes on the TV instead of all 4.  This is certainly not ideal, but since my TV is 22" and very light and I don't move the monitor, it works for me.
Great product for such a cheap price.  Just hung my 50&#34; LED TV last night and it is perfect.  Only problem I had was that I had to customize it a little to fit my TV right by cutting down the two bottom arms that attach to the TV and get bigger spacers (which I had).  The arms are a little stiff but I am ok with that, better than loose.
Bought this for a 32 inch TV. Instructions were clear and the product is very well made. The extension is adequate and there is enough friction on the arm to keep it in place.  Well worth the price
Works perfectly for our 47&#34; LCD TV and we've notice no dipping or bending from weight even when moved.  I'm glad we didn't go with the $135.00 one in the store.
Took 30 minutes to install and works great.  You cannot beat the price anywhere!  Arrived very quickly and has plenty of options to fit different TV's or hang on any type of wall (drywall, concrete, etc.)
I really wanted to like this mount, but I'm somewhat disappointed.  I have installed many different types of mounts, so I have a lot of experience with them.  The quality is decent, but there are some items of which you should be aware:* If you have a 600x400 VESA pattern mount on your TV (as I did for a 37&#34; LG), then be aware that the extension arms are &#34;maxed out&#34; at this size, which means you have zero flexibility.  Unfortunately for my TV, the center plate onto which the extension arms attach completely covered the inputs I needed to use.  This isn't completely the VideoSecu's problem, but since there is no flexibility at this size, I had to rig it together off-centered only using two screws on the bottom arms.* All of the mounts I have ever done have a tilt function, and this is by far the biggest pain I've ever dealt with.  Instead of using thumb screws, you have to use a wrench (cheap one included) to adjust the tilt.  It is much more difficult to get the TV held in place and tighten this way.* Similar to the above, the mount gives the ability to adjust leveling after it has been installed.  This is also done with a wrench, but it is a big pain and is very difficult to keep level (keeps slipping) even with a helper.* Lastly, be aware that when folded completely, the screen is not centered over the wall mount.  It is about 2-3&#34; to the left or right, depending on which way you fold the arms.  If you're looking for the flexibility of full motion but most of the time it will be against the wall, keep this in mind.
I just purchased this mount to hold a 32" LCD TV.  Price was very low,  but the reviews were mostly positive so I thought I would take a chance.  This mount came well packed and was shipped promptly.  After my initial inspection I was concerned about how stiff the mount gets from moving the arms back and forth.  The nuts on the joints kept getting too tight and caused the mounting bracket to bend under the load. Very soft metal was used and the construction is very low tech. I would be afraid that the thin new TV set would be damaged by the force required to move the mount.  I was very disappointed with the mount both with quality and the operation.  Even for the low price, I would avoid.
I have used 4  Wall  mount mechanism already and and help friends to install one, this is the best I've seen.
I have had this unit about a year and it works great in the bedroom with a 22&#34; flat screen TV.  Very good function and can't beat the price!  You will need two people to set this up, but it goes easy with four hands and simple directions.
I mounted my 50 inch thin flat screen tv with no real problem except it was straight so I had to readjust it, LOL. But it holds aewsome.
Nice mount for the price.Used it to mount a 32' Dynex in my son's room.  All the joints seem strong and it holds the TV  sturdy.  Haven't noticed any sag in the arm as described by other reviewers.  But reading their description of the mount it seems to have been redesigned as the it didn't sound exactly like the mount I have. Who knows?Wrench provided to loosen the nuts on the mount is garbage, don't use it or you will strip them out. Don't even think of trying to use it to drive the lag bolts into the stud. Use a regular 1/2 inch box-end wrench or rachet & socket.Main complaint is that there should be a way to attach the plate to the back of the TV and then attach plate to the mount arm as in other mounts I have bought.  I did take the last arm bolt out so I could attach plate to TV first, then simply lined them back up and had my son slide the bolt through and start the nut.  If it had this easy TV mount design I would have given it 5 satrs.For $22 I'd say its worth the money.
Great product at a great price.  Very simple to set up and attach to wall. Multiple adjustments allow for flexibility in installing.
I bought this product for my new 32" Toshiba lcd tv.  Once secured in the wall the tv hangs great.  I can have it straight on for viewing in my bed or turn it 90" so I can use it as a computer monitor.  The swivel was a little stiff when turning it but after a little more use and some WD40 it works perfectly.  Great product, free HDMI which works fine and a level for the tool box.
My son in law put it up for me in my bedroom.  My TV looks really nice and you can tilt it up, down and sideways.  I'm totally satisfied with it.
great product ,great price the only thing that should be noted is the mounting point is not centered its offset, so if you are mounting over fireplace as i am this creates a positioning problem. i worked it out though just wished it was part of the discription.
Installation was simple. Many reviewers commented on how hard the mount was to turn... All that needed to be done was the bolt be loosened a fraction. If you wanted to go the extra step, you could spray wd-40 on it really quick and it's perfect. Can't be happier with the purchase. Put a 32 inch vizio on it and it swings freely with no problems or bend. Trust me, loosen the bolt a hair and see the difference. Those other buyers must have no mechanical sense about them.
I bought this to install a 19" LCD TV in our kitchen, installed in 10 mins. All parts included even tools, screws and shields the quality of which was more than adequate if you pre-drill for the large lag bolts. Price OMG $18 including free 2 day shipping with Amazon Prime. Can't say anything bad about this product. If you need a Swing Wall Mount for a small to medium size flat screen buy it now while it's still available.
This thing is amazing at any price point, but at this price it is incredible. Easy to install. Adjustable. I took it apart at the middle, to mount one side to the wall, the other to the tv, then reconnected in place. 1 person job.
Just hung a 37" vizio.  This mount contained all  hardware to hang many tv's. Much hardware left over.  Handy level and hdmi cable included. Love that I can pull away from wall to access hook-ups or change tv angle. Wench and 2 allen wrenches included to adjust mount.
it is very convenient and adjustable to your liking, it is very easy to install and setup just the way you want it, I would recommend this to anyone
Very functional and worth the price but not very sturdy. I have had to go back and retighten a few times. If you have no intention of using the articulating arms, it will be fine, but if you use it a lot you will have to check the screws on a regular basis.
This is a great swing arm mount.  I wanted one with a long extension because I mounted the TV on a side wall and need to pull it out 90 degrees to watch.  Most mount arms just aren't long enough.I also liked that it came with multiple size screws and bolts for different VESA sizes.  Some of the mounts I looked at came with fewer sizes of screws.You will need an electric drill and a socket wrench tool makes installation much easier.
What is with all the 4 and 5 star reviews? This mount is atrocious!Installation isn't too bad. But you do need 2 people for this.As for quality... there is none. It's the epitome of "Made in China". It's extremely flimsy and I was so afraid to keep my TV mounted on this thing that I returned it to Amazon.Rotating the TV on this is also VERY hard. I think you have a good chance of breaking your TV if you rotate it too many times on this thing. You have to use a LOT of force to get it to move.DO NOT GET THIS. For $18 I should have known better. You're paying for spray painted metal and some screws.However, if you don't need to rotate your TV, this will do the job I suppose
For the price it works fine though i have to admit it worries me.  It says it can fit a 55 inch T.V, i put a 48&#34; TV on it and it by all means fit, but the thin metal bars which bolt to the TV are obviously bowing under the weight.  I'll give it this though, my TV has hung on it for probably over a year now and it hasn't fallen yet, though i can say each day i am waiting for it too.  The full swing motion is nice works as expected, we occasionally turn it toward the kitchen when we are all in there doing things.  I would give it a 5 star but the thin support bars always worry me so that keeps it at a 4.
The base is as is as seen in the image, hold your weight, HOWEVER have small slope failures in his arms
This was well priced, sturdy, easy to install.  You have to mount it on a stud in the wall. The mount joints are stiff.  Even though there is a generous pack of screws of various lengths and washers, I still had to improvise to mount the television. Good value
Very easy to install. worked as stated. will buy again when installing a new TV. Easy to understand dir. All hardware needed included.
This is a nice mount however it DOES NOT work with an LG 26" TV - covers up the power and HDMI connections. Looks good for bigger monitors but NOT for small ones....
Sturdy, easy to install swivel mount.  Holds our 32" Vizio perfectly. This was exactly what we were looking for, and at a great price!
Easy to mount, perfect fit.
Mounted 42&#34; Samsung LED in home office with this mount.  The arm that leaves the wall is longer than the others I've used and pivots in the middle, so it's easy to get the TV in whatever position you want it.  I was concerned it may not be as stable when it is fully extended, but that wasn't the case.  Very stable when fully extended.
I graded it a 5 star because it was just what I was looking for. The form and function are good and it's built well.  Would also recommend as a good buy for anyone.
Thought this product would hold up to weight of TV.  If your TV is heavy consider another wall mount product
This is a nice TV wall mount that works as it describes. For the price that I paid $25, it can't be beat.  Compared to department stores like (Walmart, Target, Costco), they are charging $70-80 for something similar to this product.  This was use to mount a 32-inch Samsung LCD TV. It feels sturdy and works good. I only give it a 4 stars because the instructions that came with the mount isn't very clear.  I highly recommend this product.  If you're unsure, rest assured that this product does what it says its supposed to do.
I received the mount, which was well packaged for shipping.  The installation instructions were Moderately clear.  No issues following them, they were just a little disjointed depending on the wall surface you were installing on.My shipment had a mis-cut piece, and was missing 4 screws.  I contacted the Manufacturer, and they shipped me a replacement part and screws the very next day (Shipped out of Texas, so normal mailing times applied)I like how the Mount fits together, and I easily mounted my 60lbs TV by myself.  The part that attaches to the TV has a hook that will hold the TV on the Arm till you bolt it on.It's very adjustable, and pushes almost flush with the wall.I'm very happy, but took one star for the miscut piece.
Install was easy, just as instructions said.  We have a 42&#34; on it and it works just fine and is level in the current position.  My only negative comment is the single &#34;swing arm&#34; is not that sturdy, so when theTV is moved, it is no longer level because the single arm doesn't appear to be strong enough to hold the weight in the new position.  Overall a minor comment, as the cost for the unit is very reasonable.  I would recommend it to others.
Easy to install.  Very sturdy. Best reach of all other style brackets that cost way more.  I put a 60&#34; tv on this bracket and it works awesome.  All I had to do was make holes in flat stock and criss cross them and it fit perfectly.
Does exactly what it is supposed to do.  Great value.  Highly recommended product to anyone wanting to hang their TV
seems like a bit flimsy for the larger modelsPros:easy to installarticulating armwill work with the smaller size perfectlyConslarger TV's could have an issue being heavieroverall if you have a smaller TV under 45&#34; it is a 5 star, otherwise 4 stars
Considering the size & weight of the 32 inch TV I mounted on this bracket, it's perfect. With the required wall stud to mount this near a corner and not centered to the space, it was no issue getting the mounted TV perfectly centered as I wanted it to be. Any articulating mount at the major electronics stores I researched would cost well over $150.00, and were not made any better than this mount. Well made and strong enough to hold a much bigger set if you wanted to. Best value on an articulating mount I found on line.
I checked around Amazon as well as some other sites, and decided these were what I needed.  I read the reviews, looked at the pictures and bought two of these.  I received them today.  I unpacked one of them, read the instructions and immediately filled out the return request for Amazon.  These mounts are very, very heavy and require 6, yes SIX, screws to mount to the wall.  Are you kidding me?  The TVs are only 22 lbs!  Two screws in the studs and then more damage to the wall than is necessary.  What a joke!  And Lag bolts?  Ever heard of screws?  The other issue is that these are very hard to move.  I bought an articulating wall mount for a reason, and I expect them to be able to move without a wrench in my hand.
It's hard to argue with this mount for the price.  It's an excellent value and sturdy.  I mounted a 32" LG set that weighs about 17 lbs and did not experience any sag.  The instructions do not indicate this, but I removed the TV plate and the wall bracket from the arms to facilitate installation.  My LG set has a 200mm x 100mm mount pattern.  The M4 screws are the correct choice for my application, but I needed washers to prevent the screw heads from passing through the large holes in the plate.  There are some spacers/washers included in the hardware pack, but I decided to pick up 4 fender washers and used those instead.  After I got the plate mounted to the TV and the wall bracket mounted, I reattached the arms to the TV bracket and re-installed the bolt I removed earlier.  I had a helper install the bolt attaching the arm to the wall plate while I held onto the TV.  Once I got everything tightened up, I was a bit concerned that the set was crooked even though I installed the wall bracket level and plum.  Luckily there is about 5 degrees of rotation adjustment in this mount which will remedy any slight rotation issues.  I'm very happy with this product and feel it is an outstanding value.
I have three of these mounts on one wall with 32" tvs on them.  Very easy to install. Prevented thieves from taking my tvs when they broke in last year.
I have purchased a total of 4 HDTV wall mounts from the VideoSecu companyand they are all quality products at a very reasonable price.-Tilt TV Mount: for stationary TVs up to 65 inches.-Articulating:  corner mount for SMALL TVs-Long Arm:  corner or high mobility mount for LARGER TVsAll of them are excellent products, and very easy to install.
used it for vizio 42&#34; tv. easy to install. fit perfectly. what is there else to say? strongly recommend for everyone.
Great product, installation was quick and easy, instructions where written to be understood, my wife loves the wall mount as she moves around the bedroom she can adjust it for her viewing
For such a cheap mount, it works well. I installed in in about 20 minuets and use it to hole a 32" Vizio LED.
I bought this depending on the reviews I saw, got to say it was worth it, it holds my 40&#34; TV up perfectly and there has been no issues or problems!!
Great for the money. No problems with installation, everything included.I like that all the screws were with this product. I would buy another
Bought three of these to mount two 37" and one 32" tv around the house. Very sturdy and zero complaints
I Love How I Can Swivel The Televison  Around And This Bracket Stays in Place Mount On Wall Or Shelve.
Made in china, but this time , its well made. nice and sturdy and lots of options to mount differenct type of LCD. It has a good viewing set of angles and can be adjusted just about any view you want. the value for cost here is big, since most of these sale for over 75.00, or over 100.00 at wm. im pleased with it.
Works great with our 39&#34; Apex TV. Does not sag. Seems very sturdy. My husband mounted it and only needed my help for about 30 seconds.
This TV mount works great.  It's easy to use (position-wise)but I can't be sure how easy to install it was, as my son put it up for me (I'm nearly 80) and he didn't seem to have any trouble.  He did seem to have equipment that I wouldn't have had around the house, like a laser beam for getting it centered and level at the same time, a drill, etc. but the bolt holes were matched evenly with the bolt holes on the TV.  I really like it a lot.  Get one and if your under 70, you probably will be able to install it yourself!
This was half the price of the TV mounts at Costco and perfectly fits a Vizio 37&#34; TV for the spare bedroom. It will work with many different brands so in my book that is great. Strong, sturdy and robust.
I gave this mount 3 stars.5 to start because out of the box, and mounted on the wall, I really liked it for my daughter's room. The ability to move her 26" TV around so she can play in other areas of the room is a welcomed addition.I subtracted 1 star because of the tacky instructions and poor cable management for something that moves at maximum, about 2 feet away from the wall.1 more star fell off because now that the TV is mounted, the mount seems to sag, even though there are two huge lag bolts in a stud mounting it. That parts not the problem, the problem is where the tv mounts to the plate itself, it seems no matter how many washers you use, it just does not make full contact. Also if you move the TV to a new position the mounts seems to want to "fall" in that direction on its hinges. SO it must be releveled by yanking on it every time it moves.Otherwise, it works I guess. But for $50 I'd rather have a stationary mount that I never have to worry about. I would not set a tv larger than a 30" or so on this. I just don't trust it.
Bought this to mount a 26" thin led tv in our kitchen.  This mount is easy to install, has lots of tv mounting options and hardware, and is strong and secure.  Works exactly like I wanted.  My only negative point is that for my Samsung TV, the 100 x 200 VESA holes are located high on the back of the TV, so my TV sits low on this mount and the very top edges (&lt; 1") of the mount show above the edge of the TV.  I could have cut those off, but it's not a big deal to me.
Purchased this item for our church to be able to mount the tvs in the children's rooms above their inquisitive hands. It was easy to install and the tvs mount easily on it.
Pro's: Easy to setup.  Supports many different VESA formats. Has some articulation.  Sturdy construction.  Can be installed by one person w/o too much effort.Con's: Cable guides fall off easily.  The joints are a bit too stiff; you really have to man-handle it to get it fully extended, and you have to push fairly hard to get it to compact again.  So far I have not noticed any wear from this firm pulling/pushing, but I worry because it is only attached to the studs buy 2 bolts.
This wall mount for my flat screen is just what I was looking for.  If you follow the instructions, it is pretty easy to install.  We installed it into a stud.  If feels very secure and the TV looks great in it's new spot on the wall.  I don't know why you would ever spend more for those overpriced ones, this works great and is a fantastic value!
For the money you can't go wrong. Yes, it has a litlle play in the mechanism but, you can adjust your mounting to accomodate that. It works great and frees up counter space. I would do it all again. Why spend 3 times more.
This is a rather good tv mount. This tv mount works exactly as expected and described. I would buy again.
We received the wall mount very quickly and it looked very good.  It mounted to the wall with no real problem, but since it is all one unit, you have to put the whole thing up, and then raise the TV up in the air, while you line up the screw holes in the plate with the holes in the TV back and get the screws started.  This is at least a two man operation, and our TV was small.  I cannot imagine doing this with a 32" TV.  With the four screws in place and the TV up in the air, we started connecting the wires only to discover the cable connection was covered by the mounting plate.  Brought the assistant back, removed the TV from the mount, had to disassemble the mount to get the mounting plate off, then take a hacksaw and cut one corner off the mount plate to uncover the cable connection on the back of the TV when the plate is in place, and then put it all back together again.  The design of the mounting plate is such that it cannot be disconnected from the rest of the mount and then put on the back of the TV at ground level.  The plate needs to be able to be mounted on the TV back at ground level to make sure all connections for the wires are clear.  We got it up, and it works well, but having to do it all twice, and hacksaw a notch in the mount for the cable is not what I call "easy installation".
Mount was very easy to install. Did not have any problem. Take apart mount at joint. Install to wall and other side to TV then put together. Works well for the price. I leave adjustment nuts tight and just move it slowly. I would recommend to any one mounting a 32 inch flat screen. Make sure your TV mount holes will match mount otherwise no problems.
pros: heavy, solid & stable,cons: the faceplate is large.so large I had to cut off an area 3x1 inches just to have access to my tvs HDMI portsmy tv has a VESA 100x100 layoutso, installation was a bummer
Great product, awesome price compared to store prices, highly recommend product,easy to install.  Good quality, matches most tv brands. Great bargain
This wall mount for flat screen TVs or monitors installs easy and works well. I have an older Samsung 32" flat LCD. It took less than 15 minutes to install, a novice installer maybe 30 minutes, and it comes with a variety of fasteners for the wall and TV. Easy to understand instructions and some wrenches included too. Packed well with no rust or finish defects.
This mount works really well once you get it up and going.  Only problem is just the arms are a little goofy getting them all in the right spot.  But that's really not too big an issue considering all the different TV's and their mounting hole locations.
This product is great! It does just what it says it does and im very satisfied! I would buy this product again in a heartbeat(:
Another great buy from Amazon. The local stores wanted twice the money and the other mounts were cheaply made. this mount is made well and you get a free hdmi cable and level with it
I searched around for a TV Wall Mount for my bedroom TV and didn't want to pay the outrageous price I had seen at my local stores. This was a steal compared to what was on the market. Easy instructions and quick installation. I purchased this 6 months ago and it is still holding up and doing fine for my 32 inch Panel TV
I am very glad for buying it.  It is heavy duty and good quality for the price.  It was very easy to install.
After looking through what was available on monoprice and realizing that Amazon had a few of comparable price but with free prime shipping, I went the Amazon route. This is the second I tried and I have to say it's quite excellent. Stable, even when holding a good 50 lb, 46" LCD, swings pretty well. If there was any complaint with it, the tilt control isn't the easiest to configure and you'll need 1 or 2 helpers to tighten the bolts in place to keep it at the angle you want. This isn't enough to knock any stars off.
I bought this for the sun room we are building, haven't opened it yet but it look like what I need from the box.
I have two of these now in different rooms. Works well with my Samsung TV'S  for the size noted above
This is a well made product for the price. The installation was simple but mounting the actual TV wasn't. You have to lift and hold the TV up so as to align the holes for the screws. An extra person was needed. Once up, the Tv leans to the left. The mount was installed level and the first arm is level but second arm is not. However, it fits my needs and for the price I am satisfied.
Read the specs and if your monitor fits the guidelines, get this.  It's been on sale and if it is now, get it.  It has many options for rotation, etc.  Can't go wrong with this.
Works great on my 27" ViewSonic , Articulation is awesome. Just right for my TV, it's light weight! came with every thing i needed to hang it. Bracket fits the back of my TV perfectly , I can pull it out 24" from the wall , no drooping at all!
I got this wall mount for my 39&#34;&#34; LED HDTV. The mount  fits well and is sturdy. Good price too.
I needed a wall mount that would allow my 46&#34; screen to be my computers display and my TV. The screen is a couple inches from the wall right now, and when I'm ready to watch TV, I pull it out about two feet, move back to my recliner, and watch TV. The mounts movement isn't real fluid, but it works. It doesn't tilt up or down, but I don't really need it to. At $30, it was a much cheaper option than I could find elsewhere.
I was unsure what to expect for a 25$ wall mount for my new LED LCD 32" TV.  What I found was that the mount was easy to install and it is sturdy enough to hold the TV out at full extension without sagging.  I am very pleased with the purchase and will recommend the mount to friends
For the money, this worked fine on my 37&#34; TV.  I had to make some additional hardware up to attach, but it worked out fine. Like the ability to tilt in the room that it is in.
I am unable to use it in my trailer. I am going to give it to my son who lives nearby for his new house.
The product is of very good quality I recommend to everyone who wants to buy it, do not hesitate to buy it
TV plate that attaches to TV mount will not fit my TV. I was buying this as a replacement mount since I was moving the TV into the bedroom and needed a tilting mount. Possibly shame on me for having a generic made tv and not knowing the exact VESA mounting pattern but I have used the same TV with another universal mount with no issues. Problem was that where my mounting holes in the TV were, I would have almost had to drill a home made hole in the metal to accomodate the tv.  I needed a hole exactly in the middle of where the mount curves inward.If this mount would have worked, I would have given it 4 stars.  Seems to be reasonably well made for the price with a heavy metal. Definitely much better quality from the speaker mounts I bought from the same manufacturer.  The only negative I saw what the tilt motion.  Instructions make it seem like the tilt is accomplished where the tv meets the mount.  This is in fact not true.  You have to loosen a bolt near where the mount holds to the wall and position the mount up and down on a curved insert.  So if installing, be aware that if you need the tilt to arrange it before you mount.If I were actually able to make it as far as mounting to the wall, then that would have been easy.  Just make sure you have a high powered drill to make it through the stud.
This product is very inexpensive and very reliable. If you are wanting to move your TV around very often, this may not be the best as the joints do not move very smoothly. However, the mount is very sturdy with my 32" Sony Bravia. It was very easy to install and came with all the necessary hardware. It is the perfect product for those on a limited budget. The trade off is the smoothness in the joints. Safety and heavy construction are prominent features.
Amazon as always 5 stars in service and shipping.The mount was for a VIZIO E260MV 26-Inch. Product comes adequate with a lot of screws, an Alan key and standard nut key that fits all the nuts. The bubble level (with magnet on the side) and cable are a nice addition.Had to cut 1 inch from the top and bottom of the base that gets screwed no to the TV, since it covered some of the inputs. Other wise very practical for my bedroom/Study that has more width so the convenience of swirling is why we wanted this and it does a good job.For the price ($25 and free shipping), its is a really good deal. Would recommend this.
I bought this mount for my 22 inches TV for my kitchen. When I ordered this product the description said it fits most 22" to 37" and now that I am writing a feedback the description says it fits most 32" to 55" (I am clicking at the same link). Confusing but now I understand why I am having so many issues with it. The price is great but the product looks and feels kind of cheap. If I paid full price of $145.99 I would probably return this product. Pictures showing this product are kind of misleading and inconsistent with the model I got. This mount goes not work on my LG TV. When TV is attached, this mount covers up access to power input and HDMI access is very limited! Cable management on this mount is pretty poor as well. Overall I think that the description and pictures are misleading so if you don't want to be disappointed do some more research.
Great Mount, so many areas of articulation. This was a great gift idea my mother loves it. I have purchased two of them and they are sturdy and give a touch of class to every room you put them in. A must have any video file or those who want to save space in a bedroom or office.
Very pleased with this wall mount. Easy to install, does exactly what we wanted. Can adjust the viewing angle for all our needs.
Mounted a 42&#34; Vizio.Pros: Mount is sturdy, fit TV, and is a great valueCons: Articulating the mount could be easier, but it really isn't that bad
I checked various prices and some of them were ridiculous.  This is well worth the money.  We have a 32 inch LG TV and the holes lined up perfectly.  All the necessary parts were included.  One person can install it.  Just follow the instructions.  It pulls it in and out.  Swivels left to right.  Tilts up and down which locks in the place with a set screw.  It is in full way adjustable articulated arm.
I have mounted a 42 inch old LCD. Easy to install. Easy to swivel, there is tilt option but it has to be locked by nuts(it can not be changed without loosing the nuts).
I was worried my tv had irregular screw holes in the back that would require some sort of wild goose chase at the hardware store in order to use this mount. Instead, it came with an assortment of screws so installation was a breeze. I was skeptical for this price, but it works great.
this is was a gift to my dad  it was easy to install and set up he liked it very much
The product is very nice as described, and i am very happy with the purchase. recommend this to anyone who is looking for sword holder.
Don't  let the low price fool you - I was looking at a $150 sanus mount at Best Buy and but thought I'd atleast give this one a shot.We are glad we did - the mount is made of heavy metal - the instructions are adequate and it has true full range of motioin adjustments. I'll definitely reccomend to others!
Overall this product was great. Easy installation, shipped fast, and has a solid construction for a wall mount. I would recommend this product to others at such a good price.
This product works just great. Very reasonably priced and includes the HDMI cable which was a bonus! No regrets here.
This mount is best used if the TV needs to extend away from the wall or be rotated so it is not parallel with the mounting wall.  The mount I received was exactly as described.  "Fits VESA (mounting hole patterns) 100x100 200x100  200x200mm without extender, and also fits VESA  600x400  400x400  600x300  400x200  300x300mm with 4 plate extender:  loading capacity up to 66 lbs;  VESA TV plate can be taken off, quick release design for easy installation;  Standard hardware and user manual included."  The enclosed mounting hardware was sufficient to attach the wall mount to wood studs or masonry walls, and there is an assortment of  screws to attach the TV plate to the back of most TVs.  The wall plate also has a plastic cover that snaps on and hides the mounting bolts, giving the wall mounting plate a "finished look."  The included instructions were well written, detailed and describe the mounting process in step by step fashion. (In my opinion, some of the best instructions I have seen for the half-dozen mounts I have installed.)  One definitely needs a stud sensor, electric drill and a good wrench to install the mount.  I used the mount on an older 42 inch plasma that weighs 60 lbs, so it will handle its rated weight, assuming both mounting bolts of the wall plate are properly secured in studs.  I have observed no "sagging," but I would say the arm "flexes"  about 1 inch with my 60 lb TV attached and the arm fully extended.  In summary, I rate it 5 stars, and feel this is an excellent mount for the money, especially if one has a heavier (40-60 lb) TV with VESA mounting holes larger than 200x200.
This is perfect for your bedroom or office.  You can swivel it and turn it to whatever direction of the room you are in.  This is a very inexpensive product but works great for me.  Love this product!
Good quality and nice articulating action.  I like the versatility of the the mounting for different tv sizes.  The only bad thing is the mount brackets stick out a bit from the bottom of the television.
I have a 37" LCD TV too HEavy for the mount. 1. it didn't come with the extension kit for the 37" tv to fit on it. So, I bought it spending another $20+ finally put it together and now my 37" LCD TV is too heavy for me to feel safe putting this on the wall. Also, it is really difficult to try to put on the wall it is deffinetly a 2 person job. I think this would only be good for your monitor for a computer and right above a desk incase it falls but deffinetly don't trust it with my TV
Heavy duty...easy to install....and most important, very easy to attach your television to.  I would buy again and recommend to anybody who is looking to buy one.
I gave this product a I love it rating because It's made my life a whole lot easier because I was able to mount the TV on the wall!
The best thing about it?  The parts came in separated pouches with labels on them.  Very organized!  Installing and mounting was not a problem.
This wall mount was very easy to install and sturdy. The swing arm is very convenient and allows me to see the TV from 3 rooms of the house.
so i recently bought a 40 inch Samsung smart tv but my problem was that my room is pretty small so i didn't have sufficient space to set it on my dresser like i did my previous tube tv and after looking around i found this beautynow when it came in it was in a small box fairly heavy and in good condition. Now when i opened it i was surpised to see every bit of hardware you need in a plastic roll out bag separated by individual pouches in my case i did not need those extentions  you see in each corner of the base plate because the base plate fit perfectly on my Samsungthe product itself is well made and well worth the money this mount will swing 180 degrees left or right and it lays 2.5 inches from the wall. i recommend you have someone with proper tools to install this you can't just hammer this thing into the wall and by tools i mean a drill and stud finder every screw you need come with the mount
Easy to install, and works great. Television moves with ease and always feels secure. Doesn't loosen over time like other television mounts.
Very easy to install ! Love it ! I can easy move the tv from one side to the other !
Heavy duty construction, easy to install, could have easer adjustment knobs as I use this on an RV and constantly make mount adjustments. Other than that this is a great product for the price and I would recommend it to anyone.
was really easy to installcame with a lot of  hardware to fit an situationwe did not  need to use the extension bars
Outstanding product. Hung a 42&#34; Vizio with ease. Great price and great quality. I would recommend this to anyone that needs to hang their tv.
Just to know that the TV will sit off center of where the base is placed. Other than that it has held up and worked.
Works great and is so much cheaper than the more expensive versions at the Big box stores. It is super easy to install yourself too. You just need a drill and a ratchet set to get it into the stud (oh yea a stud finder too).
Easy to install.  Took me about 45 min. to an hour to install. Works great. Simple to use and looks good.
This is the best mount I have ever found, especially for the price.Home Depot has a nearly identical mount for $90.This mount comes with every fastener you could need from Lags, Hollow Wall Anchors, Spacers, to varying lengths of Metric Fasteners to most if not all TVs.They mount easy and are sturdy; I have a 60&#34; LED TV on one without issue.I also have 32&#34;, 42&#34;, 46&#34;, and 50&#34; TVs on them; I have used these to mount every LED/LCD TV I or friends have mounted.
I have my 32 inch Tv on the wall and it works great. Easy to install and came with all the parts. The screws that it comes with for the TV will not fit but you can buy some for 2 dollars.
Works great, easy to install, and fits almost any TV. Love the tilting feature. It has a low profile when you want the TV flat against the wall, so that keeps everything out of the way.
I bought this mount for our bedroom in order to swing and tilt the TV based on our viewing angle.  In order to move it I had to loosed the screws each and every time.  I had it connected to a 27in vizio LCD which is pretty light.  Could not find a tension to keep it where we wanted it.  Had to return
The VideoSecu Ariculating bracket did not fit for a 32" flat screen.  The Ario 32" flat screen takes an additional purchase to fit mounting this TV.  Disappointed in that the advertising indicates it will mount a TV up to 37".VideoSecu Articulating LCD LED TV Wall Mount for 22" to 37" Flat Screen with VESA 100 200 Mount Pattern Free Bubble Level and HDMI Cable 1XE
We installed this in a flash! Maybe 20 minutes... after we located our wall stud. The screws are VERY good (hex screws), and the directions on how to put it onto my difficult flat panel were great. I attached this to my MAG 32" flat panel that I purchase from STAPLES store back in 2004. I couldn't find any mount to fit this TV, until NOW! I love it. I know it will hold up well. The swivel/tilt/movable arm feature is AMAZING!!! It truly does move and adapt to any angle you need. Don't hesitate to buy it! Just do it! - It's VESA compatible. If you are curious if it will fit your TV, go online and look at your model of TV and check if it says "VESA compatible". VESA refers to the 4 arms you see sticking out of each corner in the picture, and they move around to wherever the holes are on the back of your TV. Any questions? Just ask me!
I like the fact that it was at a resonable price and very easy to assemble.  TV looks great on the wall.
it was so easy to install.  the instructions were simple and so was the process.  i was putting off the project for fear.  i should have hung the TV long ago.
It is holding up my 46&#34; LED tv with no problems. The swivel works great. Be sure to tighten the articulating head or the TV will tilt forward.
We have purchased this unit for a 3rd room we are mounting television on wall in.  We have been completely pleased with how it has held a 32 inch and 40+ inch television in other rooms.  Highly recommend this product!
As long as you know how to use a level, a stud finder, a drill, and a wrench you can easily install this mount.  After shopping around at a whole bunch of stores I realized that you couldn't find one for this cheap, so I picked it up and was amazed with how well it was constructed.  Just a note, having 2 people help a lot just to making lining up parts easier.
GREAT PRICE AROUND HERE IT WOULD COST $150 WELBUILT AND IT WAS DELIVER ON TIME IF YOU NEED A TV MOUNT THS IS THE ONE
Used with toshiba flat.  works great easy install.  I inverted the screw on the midshaft to allow for better seat on the wall.  Have had it up for several years and no flaws whatsoever.
its good quality, works great, ez to install used it to hang a 42 in tv, would buy it again
Item was shipped prompty and describtion was appropriate. Holds my LG 47 inch flat screen, and has been holding for 1 yr strong so far.
Product arrived on time and was easy to assemble. Just as easy to hang on the wall and is currently holding a 46" Sanyo.
The product is good and as described.I have a 32&#34; Vizio TV and somehow, this wall mount seems to be a little too weak for my TV. I still managed to mount my TV just fine, but gets a little paranoid that it will give in within the next few months because the mount won't be able to carry it.But the full motion swing feature is amazing! Especially if you are in a larger room.
Works great I just wish it tilted up and down to then it would definitely be a 5 star product
Wanted the monitor off of the desk, so we mounted on the wall.  I would have rather had a vertical adjustment as well, but for the price, this unit does the job.
the arm does  not hold that well when extended. the tv is a little crooked when extended. sticks out at the top of the tv. if you have a samsung this is probably not the best choice.
This flat panel mount is adjustable and very cost effective. This arm comes with all needed mounting hardware. It also comes with a small wrench and an allen wrench for adjustments. One draw back, the mounting bracket base is a little larger than a stud. I aligned two of the holes in the center of the stud and used two heavy duty zip wall anchors for the other two holes. The flat panel I mounted was a Sony 32" and 29 lbs.
This was not the easiest to install due to location of installation but it works super.  I would recommend it for anyone.
We have a 26&#34; TV in our bedroom and no real table-top space for it, so we mounted it above our dresser with this.  The arm tilts and moves smoothly so it's easy to set this however we want, as often as we like.  Great purchase.
This mount was purchased for a 24-in monitor.Primarily because it allows the television to be moved to several different positions. The construction of the mount is extremely sturdy. The included HDMI cable is just the icing on the cake. The instructions are clearly labeled.For the price, you simply can't get a better deal.
This TV mount is easy to install.  Just follow the directions included.  I installed this near the ceiling and I'm using every bit of the 15 degree downward tilt.  Properly installed, the product is rock solid.  I installed a 32" tv on it.  I know it can hold much more.  The articulating arms are easily adjustable and if you want to tighten it down and lock it in position you can do that, too.
I bought this mount to hang a 32" Sony in my bedroom. Like others I was very skeptical because of the price. I read through the instructions and determined what parts I would need and in less than 20 minutes I had it on the wall and done. The only thing I would suggest is for those who plan to mount this into a concrete or brick wall, don't use the masonry anchors. The one's they provide are pretty cheap. Overall I am really happy with the mount, it swivels just like it should and is definitely robust enough for a larger TV.
We purchased 2 of these mounts for the TVs in our master bedroom and game room.  I was a little leery of the low price compared to similar products at brick and mortar stores.  I can't provide any installation feedback because we had them professionally installed.  But, they have been hanging since December and we haven't had any issues at all.  They function as expected and haven't given us any problems.
We purchased this TV Mount for the TV in our motorhome.  Several of our friends liked it so much that they asked us to order one for them.  Works great when changing from analog TV to digital HD TV.
I am very pleased with this mount.  I could probably swing from it!!  Read & follow the directions, pre-drill the holes in to a stud, and everything else falls into place.  Used for my bedroom.
The wall mount was easy to use and only took a few minutes to install. It fit my 42" vizio great
The VideoSecu articulating TV mount is good but could be better. I unpacked the mount to put up a new flat panel TV in my bedroom and it took me about 20 minutes from unpacking to secure the mount to the wall (another 40 minutes to mount the TV). You'll need some hand tools like a drill with drill bits to drill holes in your wall and a socket wrench to secure the bolts to the wall. Having a second person help you hold the mount while you screw it to the wall is very helpful since the mount is heavy and your arms get tired holding it over your head. You should also spray some WD40 to lubricate the joints prior to mounting it to the wall so the arm swings easily. You will also need a stud finder to attach the mount to wooden studs in the wall. Having the other person hold the TV while you screw in the four screws to the TV mounting plate is a must. It took my wife and I about 40 minutes to mount the TV to the wall from start to finish.
People keep saying that this mount is great for the $30 price tag, but it would be great for even a $60 price tag! I expected it to come in an unlabeled box with missing nuts and pieces, but it came in a retail box with everything organized. Installationw as relatively simple. the only 2 things i would critique is that the screws weren't labelled, which is not a huge deal, and that moving the mount around is kind of difficult, but not impossible by any stretch of  imagination. Overall, a great wall mount for my 32" Dynex!
I have been using this for a month or two now and must say that I am thoroughly impressed.  I was not sure if this would be enough wall connection since its holding up a good sized TV.My 60Inch has two LARGE BARS that hold onto the wall...For a smaller TV- I guess more is not required!  I swivel this TV pretty much every day and also needed it to CLEAR the wall bc my wall is 90 degrees from my viewing angle.Clears EASY-Sets up EASYInstalls EASYWill fit MOST Holes on the back of various TVsHIGHLY Reccomend
Part of the reason why I rated this product so highly is because of the extremely detailed instructions. You MUST read the instructions, as hanging a single stud wall mount needs to be more precise than a two stud mount. But the instructions are very detailed, it even tells you which drill bit to use so you are not trying to match the bit to the screw. Each piece is individually wrapped and labeled. I hate when things like this just give you a bag of screws and bolts and you have to try and match the picture on the instructions to the correct piece so having each one wrapped and labeled makes the process much easier. So far, I am very impressed with this product and would highly recommend it.
I bought 2 for mounting 1 46&#34; in my bedroom, & 1 46&#34; in our media room. Easy mounting, kit contained everything necessary minus the drill. TV mounted very securely, & easy positioning to practically any angle desirable. Best bang for the buck of any wall mount available.
Great value and functionality...very pleased with the two I purchased which are both in bedrooms holding a 32" flat screen but will hold a much larger tv if necessary...great swivel and tilt...very good price as well
We used this mounting bracket to mount a 32" flat screen Television in our room. The product performed perfectly for the TV. The installation was very easy. The bracket is sturdy and security to hold our TV.
I was hesitant because of the price but after looking at the reviews I decided to go ahead and purchase one. This is the first time I mounted a TV on the wall so I didn't know exactly what to expect. I put a 32" Toshiba LCD on it. Mount is strudy and has good adjustments. Installed it in about 20 minutes. Works great and I would definately recommend this for a low cost alternative for mounting a tv.
We bought this wall mount a few weeks ago. It is a good product and is very easy to install.
Must be made in third world country to inferior specs.  This holds position kind of like a wet diaper.  I am sorely disappointed but I guess you get what you pay for.
Bought the mount for my 30&#34; Dell U3011 monitor.  It fits the Dell quite well, and I bought it for it's reach from the wall, it's ability to manipulate, and it's weight capacity.  And in all those respects, I'm quite happy.However, there is a noticeable tilt/sag to the monitor when I have the arm extended.  I'm not so concerned with sag perpendicular to the wall, as that was expected, but the rotational sag that I sometimes get.
I gave this product four stars because 1. its weight, which was substantial, not plastic or flimsy 2. Ease of installation 3. Sturdy, there was no sagging or loose parts once TV was attached 4. The price was outstanding for the product received.I would have given this 5 stars, but have only had it for a few days. Time will tell if it is as good as first impressions.Even so, I am ordering two more for the other TV's in our house. Very satisfied.
Nice quality still works great... very happy with this purchase... need to add 10 more words.. so what can I say its a wall mount that I haven't had any problems with
I order about 5 or 6 of these mount and I love them is easy to put together and affordable its a strong mount I this everyone should have one for there tv
I just got this mount to mount my 23 Coby TV. The mount plate covers all of the video and HDMI outlets on the back of the tv. The area for the power is blocked as well. I am going to have to take it to a machine shop and have them cut the plate below the mount holes. The chassis in these tv's should be pretty much the same, so you would think this company would take this in consideration. I am sure I am not the only one to come across this. There should of been a warning when I bought this mount!!!!!
It does everything it is suposed to. swivels and tilts. It came with enuf screws to fit any tv brand, easy to install, just 1 page of instructions
Once we read the directions over and over and over and over it went up well. Hint , loosen the bolts first before you do anything so you can adjust before you try to put it up.
Tried mounting this on a Vizio 28" and a Sony 32". Didn't match up with the holes on the Sony and covered the RWY slots on the Vizio.So it is not compatible with 2 of the most popular brands in these sizes. Seems like a study unit, may be good for larger models. I think it would be good for Amazon to check compatibility and inform customers if unit will not adapt to certain brands since the holes on the back of the TV's do not seem to be universal.
Got this to replace a Peerless Paramount wall mount when I got my new TV.  Let me start off by saying it works as advertised.  But that won't get you 5 stars.  The problem is installation.  Maybe it's my own fault for thinking all TV wall mounts worked like the Peerless I had.  See, that one has a separate TV plate that you screw to the TV first.  Then you have the second piece (the actual wall mount) that you screw to the wall.  Once that's done, using the bracket mounted on the TV, you hang the TV on the wall mount and secure it with a single bolt.  One person can easily put a TV on the wall.Not so much with this one.  Yes, I will admit that once it's mounted, it's a more secure connection, but it's the mounting that's the problem.  You can't do it alone.  Depending on the weight of the TV, you will need at least one helper.  This mount is one piece, which means that you have to hold the TV to the wall-mounted plate while attaching it with screws.  That can get tricky, especially with heavier TVs (I used it for a while with my old LCD TV which weighs 40+ pounds).  They do get kudos for providing all the screws for all VESA types as well as a regular and an Allen wrench.Three stars for ease of installation, five stars for usability, for a combined four stars.  Make sure you get help when installing.
Was very pleased with this product.  The directions were very clear and all of the parts necessary to install (other than the drill to make holes in the wall) were included.  Includes various screws to fit many models and TVs of all sizes.  This price was also cheaper than other TV mounts with the same specifications.  If I had room for another TV, I would definitely purchase this mount for it!
I like this mount because it has horizontal adjustment screws on the mounting plate.  I was able to mount the large screen television in the corner of my exercise room and adjust it to be exactly level.
I no longer have this unit.  When it was used in the past it also afforded a plave to store my transformer and cable bok
this is a good product.  It went up easily.  I did it myself.  I wish I might have gotten one with a little more adjustment.  It's very rigid.
This is a high quality product with a more reasonable price than offered at retail stores. Strong, durable, very practical. Definitely recommend.
Great product I like it very much and it moves my tv to view from several positions.  Great price also
Quality was excellent. Instructions were clear. It was not clear about a tilt feature, but there was enough to level it when I finished. Be careful to get the wall bracket real vertical. (I was using it for a 23 inch computer screen so I really need it to be level for reading.) Everything I needed plus lots of extra hardware for different situations.
Nothing fancy, just decent quality and simple installation.  As may have been mentioned, one must discard the provided Phillips screws that the manufacturer provides to affix the bracket to the wall stud.  Use your own.  The TV I mounted with it is an older flat-panel, so it's a little heavier than the news ones.  This thing isn't fazed, and stays where I put it.
Is easy to install and holds my TV pretty well, it is a 22&#34; and it still sags a little bit so I wouldn't probably be happy if it were a bigger TV.  Smooth, easy motion when moving it around and it has good range.
NOT AS STURDY AS I WOULD LIKE IN THBE A BETTER COLOR.E 3 DIMENTIONAL MOVEMENT, WHITE WOULD BE A BETTER COLOR. .
Purchased this mount for a 40" LCD. Easy setup works perfect for corner mounting. Took 15 min to install. Great product for the price. Recommend highly.
5 stars because it was an excellent purchase. It came with all the required parts, the assembly had clear instructions and was easy to install. I am using it for a Sony Bravia 32&#34;... I've had it for 4 months so far and it works great.
I gave this product a 4 star rating. I used it to mount a 40 inch flat screen TV. The bracket is well built, easy to install and has clean lines (no exposed mounting bolts).  An area of the bracket that could be improved is the swivel joint at the back of the TV plate that is used to adjust forward tilt and level of the TV. It works and is sturdy once adjusted but adjustment is by trial and error. Adjustment is achieved by loosening 4 bolts, moving the TV to the desired TV tilt and level and then tightening the bolts while steadying the TV. After tightening the bolts and releasing the TV there is some movement of the joint. Getting the desired tilt and level took several tries.
This is an outstanding rack for a fraction of the cost of competitors wall racks.  Good instructions, easy to follow.  Providing a solid platform for our new bedroom TV.  I was interested in a small rack for our 24" TV and not a mnonster on the wall.  Well made product, excellent value.
Compared to many of the other mounts, this one was a great value! Comes with a bunch of different parts to fit different sized tvs. Range of motion is exactly what I was looking for and I have no qualms about fully extending the arm forward with full weight of the tv. A bit difficult to install by yourself if you have a larger tv and if you have to keep in mind how much area you need if you were to fully extend it left and right (arm length plus tv width).
It looked great when I pulled the mout of the box. I made sure my tv was under the max weight 68 lbs of this mount. As soon as I mounted my tv. The mount began to bend out of level. I made sure everything was level and all bolts were snug. I remounted the tv again, but no go at full extesion the mount tends to bend out of level. Very sad... think twice.
Very simple to install, even on my older model flat panel tv. Would recommend to anyone who is hesitant on spending alot of money.
I have a 48&#34; TV attached to mine, it supports it well and does very thing it was represented to do.
We needed a wall mount for a 32&#8221; TV that was going to be in the screened in porch.  This was one of the brands recommended by the guy that was going to install out wall mount.  I can&#8217;t speak to the ease or difficulty of installation but it looks great and we can swivel it if necessary for best viewing angle.  It's also pretty sleek so it doesn't butt out too much.  It arrived quickly and it didn&#8217;t take the installer long but of course he was a professional.  Looks great!
I live in a studio condo and I needed something to rotate to see from my bed and my couch on the other side of the main room. Once you figure out which instructions to use (several varieties are included to accommodate different scenarios and tvs), they are pretty thorough. Don't be afraid to tighten specific &#34;joints&#34; and loosen others to get it how you want it.Originally had bought a different one, and be careful of this, but it didn't didn't have near the amount of swing as this one does.
Used this to mount my Samsung UN40ES6500.  It's perfect.  Mounted to a stud, perfect height.  No flex in the arms at all.I did have to use the 30 MM screws with the plastic washers because of the recesses in the back of my TV, but I am extremely happy.  5 stars!
The bracket works great I have a 46" tv that weighs roughly 50 lb. with a 200 x 100mm bolt pattern. This was the only one I could find that articulated and had the propped bolt layout and I'm very pleased with it.
This Wall Mount works perfect for Samsung 45 inch TV which we have wall mounted through our 20 year old entertainment center in the front.  It has rigt long arm and does everything what is described.
Was perfect for our new flat screen. Did take 2 people to get the tv mounted to it.  But we love the tilt feature, it makes watching tv in bed much easier.
Since all of the ones we saw at the store were $99 - $149, I thought this may be wrong for us. But to my unexpected happiness, this works great and is perfect for what we needed. It does take two people to hang the TV unless yours is smaller than ours (50&#34;). It moves out and tilts to either side and is pretty heavy duty.
Nicely packaged.  All screws are separated for easy locating.  Directions were a bit confusing due to many mounting options available for different TVs.  All in all, once it is on the wall, it is solid and movable.  Securely hangs an older 42&#34; heavy LCD with out any issues.
When we moved into a smaller house and were faced with what to do with our 32inch flat screen TV, I realized the only place for it was in a corner of the room.  This wall mount had plenty of play to hold a TV of this size out of the way of a closet, but bring it out to a suitable location for viewing.  It was easy to install.  I would certainly recommend it if you want a movable mount.
Used this for a Panasonic 32" LCD TV.  Mount works fine, instructions were minimal.  I was able to use the supplied hardware to attach the TV and to attach the mount to the wall.  I did have a problem hanging the TV, per the instructions you have to mount the unit and now attach the TV, this was not very easy so I removed the mounting plate at the pivor point and took it off the wall mount, mounted this on the TV and now re-attached to the TV mount, this was a lot easier.
Ordered this for our TV that required a 600x400 VESA mount.The item in the picture appears to be this product...ML563BThe Item received was this one...ML523BThe ML523B only supports VESA 75x75/100x100/200x100/200x200mmThere are apparently adapters which can be purchased to allow it to support up to a 400x400 or 300x300. But never a 600x400. The link below shows the ML523BE, which includes the extenders.[...]The seller needs to correct this product description. We've purchase a cable and a larger tv mount  from them in the past and  both of them turned out to be ok products. They worked fine.  However, this product is misrepresented.If you only need the VESA 75x75/100x100/200x100/200x200mm mount you will be fine, as far as size goes. I cannot review the quality of this product because I was never able to use it. It seemed sturdy, but I can see where some of the complaints about the easiness of the extending the arms and also installation can be justified complaints. You are instructed to attach the tv after it the entire stand has been hung on the wall. The plate does not appear to detach from the mount to attach to the tv as with other mounts I have experience with. This issue could get annoying.
This was perfect for my 24" LED monitor, I had it up in just a few mins and with no problems.  It included a small bubble level and it also came with a 6' HDMI cable which I was not expecting.
The VideoSecu line of articulating wall mounts has become our standard of choice for high quality articulating wall mounts within our home.  The value is such that the convenience of having an articulating wall mount for connecting or reconnecting cables is well worth the few bucks required to mount our HDTVs conveniently to the wall.  Highly recommend this great quality product. This wall mount will secure any of the HDTVs using the VESA 100 or VESA 200 mount pattern. We like to use a mount on the larger end than actually needed so if we later upgrade the HDTV with a larger size there's a much better chance we won't need to replace the articulating mount.
The TV is still hanging from the wall so that's a good thing. The info for this wall mount says it is good for up to 66 LBS. Our old Phillips 37&#34; flat screen weighs 58 LBS (including the stand) and after 3 weeks the TV and mount are secured to the wall via a vertical 2 x4&#34; frame member. The mount came with almost every imaginable combination of nuts, bolts and spacers and straps to fit various size and brand TVs. I had no problem coming up with the right combination for my big and heavy old Phillips.
This product was not easy to fit on the back of my 42&#34; LG tv, however once I was able to figure out the configuration it's been great. It extends far out from the wall, and can turn it any direction I want. I love the product, just not the configuration of making it fit on my tv.
Could offer a little more in flexibility of installation, but once in place the set can be placed in just the right position repeatedly.
shipped on time. and it looks great. mounted it in family room.  but the advantage is it rotates so that i can point it in the kitchen too.
My sister and over 10 of my friends have payed over $100.00 for one of the same mount at many of named brand stores I bought 2 of the same wall mounts for way less then what they paid for one &#34;Great job AMAZON your site is one no the best..
The wall mount came with all the necessary parts to mount either into concrete or a wall stud.  It took two of us about 1 1/2 hours from start to finish but we were using a concrete drill bit that was old and dull.  Once the drilliing was done, everything else went quickly.  Good product!!
hard to install, very hard to move around once installed, need to loosen all the screws to make it move around, and it seems as if it is going to fall off the wall. i would not buy it again.
So far, its great. Easy to install, did it alone (tv is 32 inch) and took about an hour. Would have been faster but friend had borrowed by socket wrench so had to do it with the ol' run-of-the-mill wrench.Holds steady and comes with hardware for any type of mount (brick, concreate, drywall)
I bought this mount to use in an RV with a 32" Vizio LCD.  It seems to handle the weight fine and was a snap to install.  I especially like the mount cover that hides the bolt heads.  Before I bought this item, I read most of the reviews here.  I thought I would address some of the negatives I read and have now experienced.  One review talked about how tight the mount was to move.  There is a simple answer to that...loosen the bolts on those joints!  Others mentioned how it was a two person job to mount.  While it might take two people to figure out where to mount it, I mounted this in an RV six feet high by myself.  Just take the bolts off of the bracket with the included wrench, mount it, then put the bracket back on.  I also read that the TV was hard to put on once the mount was on the wall.  There is a top screw on the middle joint that can be removed.  Then mount the bracket to the TV.  Then put the middle section back together by simply sliding it onto the post it came off of.  I don't travel with the TV mounted in the RV so I take it off and put it on this same way and never struggle at all.  Another review talked about the mount being out of square with the TV.  This mount is endlessly adjustable and the tilt and pitch both of the TV can be adjusted.  All in all this is a solid mount with endless adjustments.  It even includes a small loop to help with cable management.  For the money, I can't believe there is something out there better.  Make sure the bolt pattern fits your TV.
Works good....like the motion. Its hard to put the tv on the mount. Other than that its exactly what its supposed to be
This wall mount is more than we expected. It does exactly what we wanted. We would recommend it to everyone..
I was looking for a nice tv mount for my bedroom. Found this one and am more than happy with it. Great mount.
Bought this mount for my 37" TV(about 30 lbs, secured it to my wall correctly, attached TV and the whole arm sagged a couple of inches.  The hung at the wall just had too much play in it. Wasn't worth the shipping to return it. Got a great mount for the same price on Monoprice.com, hate to lead anyone away from Amazon but they have better products in this case.
The TV wall mount worked just fine for a 22 inch Vizio.  It was easy to mount.  Very happy with it.
for the price you just cant beat this item. I bought it for a house I was selling so I could hang some tv and it worked great. Good quality for the price.
Easy to install and feels very secure. I bought two more for another two TVs I want to mount. Highly recommend it.
This is possibly one of the best mounting kits I've ever purchased. I like the fact that there are pieces so the mounting kit can cater to all models of TV. (Whether they have a rounded or flat back). Mine had a flat back so I didn't need the extra piece, but once that step was cleared it was only a matter of minutes before it went up on my wall.  The adjustable arm is nice, as it is setup in our bedroom. At night the TV is angled towards the bed and makes it super easy for both of us to see up on the wall, and during the day its turned in another direction towards my desk - also making the ability to view the TV while working.The material is very strong, hubby did a pull up on the bar and it didn't even budge.  This thing seems as though it will last quite a long time.  It's already been up for over a month and it was a wonderful addition to my master bedroom, I'll be purchasing more over time for the other rooms in the home with larger model TVs.
Amazing! Exceeded my expectations! It fits snuggly up against my wall then swings out over the foot of my bed. It tilts left and right and swivels up or down as well as swings into various positions. Better than I hoped or envisioned!
Great value for the price. It took a little while to install. The VESA didnt quit line up.  I would recommend it.
I needed a way to mount my IMAC 27" in an RV to be able take on the road.  It mounted with ease and gave me the articulation I needed. I just got back from a 2000 mile trek and the mount did its job. The only thing I had to do was to make sure that I secured the IMAC to the wall so it would not sway. I did this with a bungee cord but I could have tightened the nuts as well.Goode product.
For the price, you can't beat it. Mine didn't come with any of the screws for the TV, but luckily I had some leftover from another mount so I didn't want to bother returning it. Also, not sure what they mean by tilt, but mine doesn't. The arm extends in and out as said, tv swivels left to right, but does not tilt up and down as was my expectation. Otherwise, can't beat it for the price as in Target/Best Buy etc., these are going for $60+.
Look at what they charge out at Best Buy, etc.  Get this and save our $$$$!  And it came very promptly.
This is a really well made and engineered product which should be twice the price. It has every kind of leveling and tilting adjustment you could want, and a nice finishing piece that goes over the wall plate and lag bolts.  The mounting process can't be rushed and planning everything out before you start makes all the difference. Just make sure you find the middle of a wall stud for the lag bolts.It easily managed a 47&#34; led lcd which weighs 35lbs, and it might take the extra 10-12 lbs of a 55&#34; led lcd if it's not pulled too far from the wall. Since it can swing out over 20&#34; I'd be carefull about going bigger than the 35lb 47&#34; tv that I mountedThe only thing which was dissappointing were the two plastic wire holders which are junk (very flimsy, one was broken in the package) and shouldn't be included when simple black wire ties work far better.
works great was pretty easy to put up and does the trick. it is my sons room and really works great.
At first glance, you'd think this product would be flimsy and is just too cheap.  However, once I received and installed it, it was sturday as can be.  The capability to adjust it accordingly is very nice and it only requires you to slightly loosen the applicable joint bolts.  Unless you are positive that you won't need to move/rotate the TV, then don't cinch down the bolts further (though it is already assembled).  Loosen it just enough so that the movement doesn't require too much force.  It didn't take long to install this tv mount either.  It bolts to the wall using 6 lag screws: one at each corner, and then two at the center just above and below the "arm."  It comes with all of the lag bolts neccessary for installation to a stud.  In my case, there were two corner bolt holes that miss the stud because of the width of the mounting plate, but this kit comes with anchors and screws for this scenario.  Definitely worth the purchase!
Have you ever thought about how you met your best friend? Was it normal, or was it wacky - like how Elias met Shohei? Pulling a boa constrictor snake named Mathilda out of your backpack can make a remarkable first impression! This book is about three best friends Elias, Honoria, and Shohei, who are united against "That Which Is The Peshtigo School". Their goal is to make it through the annual school science fair, but things don't always go as planned.Elias is part of a family made up of science fanatics who would do anything to win a science fair. Elias isn't exactly what you'd call the ambitious type, especially when it comes to science fairs. So he becomes like Galileo and "retests" one of his sibling's past projects. Honoria loves to be ambitious, especially when it comes to being a legal counsel extraordinaire. But when she faces a bigger challenge than beating Goliath Reed or getting a piranha to become vegetarian, she doesn't know if she can make it. Shohei is an all around slacker who tries to mooch off Elias instead of creating something on his own. His adoptive parents are constantly encouraging him to start "hearing" his ancestors. His mom has even turned Shohei's room into what looks like a walk-in Japanese museum exhibit!This book is laugh out loud hilarious and the more you read, the more exciting and unexpected it gets. I love the title on this book because it really made me laugh and want to read the book. I also like how people so different from one another can be such close friends. There is not much excitement in the beginning, but it builds up very quickly. So if you like that type of story, then this is the book for you.
The butter dish is serving us well, and keeping the butter fresh and healthy. Couldn't be happier with it, and the color is a pleasing green.
I cannot add much to Toni "the bookworm's review."  The book is gorgeous -coffee table quality.  It is loaded with full color photographs, including numerous examples of different piping patterns. The decorating style is very Martha Stewart:  classically elegant.  The book does not provide pictures of whimsical cakes - there are other books on the market for that.While I did not buy the book for cake recipes (so I can't judge the quality and flavor of the ones provided), I did buy the book to complement a wedding cake decorating class that I am taking.  If you are a baker who is very interested in cake decorating, or need instruction on how to prepare large, multi-layered cakes, "Wedding Cakes" is very helpful.  If you are willing to put the considerable amount of time needed to perfect these techniques, (and believe me, it takes a lot of practice), this book is a wonderful resource.  You will, however, have to be patient; your cakes will not look like Martha's the first dozen times you try!
This book is simply beautiful. There are so many photos of gorgeous cakes lending itself to be a wonderful source of ideas. I keep this book stored in a safe spot and enjoy spending time slowly taking in each delightful photo. There are a lot of recipes as well, but I have yet to try any. This book is a must for those who want a keepsake book for ideas and one to treasure for years to come. This is one of my favorites for browsing through pictures.
Always beautiful, &#34;it's a good thing&#34; Martha.  Pure eye candy inspiration AND so Martha with hints, tips and practical steps.
This is a great book for people doing cake decorating and planning a formal affair.  It has been a great help in planning my daughters wedding cake.
Nice book, but more of a coffee table book than a how-to.  It does have some great photos and good recipes.
My book was delivered in a timely manner.  Condition of the book was excellent.
I just multiplied the Chocolate Butter Cake recipe by five to get 30 cups and it turned out PERFECT!! I spent too much time in the past throwing away batter or cakes because they tasted terrible but this one was the absolute best cake I have ever tried. The batter tastes like chocolate pudding and the cake itself melts in your mouth. I will definitely be trying all of the other recipes :)
I love looking at this book.  It is a great coffee table addition but as an instructive guide, it is too 'light' on information to be effective.  Good for the collector, but don't expect to get too much except for ideas.
I really like this book and the recipes are easy to calculate how much batter you will need.  The pictures are wonderful.
I got this for myself and when my sister saw it, she wanted one as well.For the avid cake decorator, this is a great reference book with wonderful photos and instructions. Not for the beginner or the faint-hearted.
A comprehensive guide to modern wedding cake design that is precise, valuable, and beautiful. I purchased this knowing I could use it both for reference and inspiration. This book has all the things you expect from Martha Stewart and Wendy Kromer- detail, originality, and outstanding content. There are glorious photographs that have captions peppered with ideas for the necessary architectural unpinnings of a multi tiered cake. The guides contained in the book are helpful and detailed. The section on partnering with a professional is especially good - as it  brings attention to some of those things the client should think about before meeting about "the cake". The creations contained in this book are spectacular and the creators of this book have been most generous with ideas, design guidelines, and recipes. I have already used this as a  guide and reference for two couples going through the process of deciding what to do about "the cake". This book would be a tremendous asset on any cake decorators bookshelf - professional or passionate amateur.
I make a real effort to not buy anything by Martha Stewartbecause none of her recipes work but this book are photographsOf cakes by other people!
It's a beautiful book. Wish it weren't so pricy though. It is worth it I suppose.
Martha Stewart's Wedding CakesThis is an amazing book!  Beautiful photos and some of the cakes have recipies and decorating techniques.  I found the perfect cake for my wedding.  I highly recommend this book.
you can see the wedding cake trend and lots of fine designs.Good thing to have this all color nice quality book as a document.
Fantastic book, a lot of good, original recipes. All very nicely decorated. This book will be the best gift for many.
I LOVE THIS BOOK AND MARTHA STEWART!!. If I could give more than 5 stars I would. I love this book. It has some of the most beautiful cakes and I love the thorough instructions given thruout the book. I would love if their was a sequel because I can't get enough of Martha and these awesome cakes!!
I was so happy with my purchase, the book was in perfect condition and arrived promptly! Thanks!
Saw this book in my local library.  Borrowed it and simply loved it.  Couldn't wait to get my own copy.  Just love all the beautiful pictures in here.  Finally got it from Amazon and it's mine!!  No need to borrow from the library anymore.
I really like this book but practice will make perfect.  It tells you all the basic terminology and has recipes and ideas galore.  With this book, most enthusiastic bakers could make tasty well put together cakes but some of the decorating tips are so grand, you won't be able to achieve them overnight if you're starting with only a basic skill level.  I'd say this is a good book though for anyone serious about making cakes, the recipes alone make it worth the money and you can always mix and match the decorations to suit your skill level.
This is a gorgeous collection of wedding cakes created by some amazing designers, and it provides hours of inspiration. Unfortunately, it doesn't walk you through even the most basic outline of how to make most of these cakes.There are some techniques covered in the back (intro to piping and working with fondant for example) but they are not very in-depth.  I think this book is more of a coffee table book, or one that a bride could take to a cake designer, but not very useful for cake decorators looking to expand their repertoire of techniques.I would gladly pay twice what I paid for this book if it had detailed instructions on how to make the cakes pictured.
This book has awesome cakes, some you will have seen but always a pleasure to look at again. The recipes are good and the techniques first class. Any bride will love and every decorator will be inspired.
very good book, good book you should have it because will give inspire. it is worth it! and price is not bad!
Martha Stewart's Wedding Cakes book is exactly what I was searching for. The clear instructions and gorgeous photographs are just perfect. A true cake designer's favorite. This is the first book I will turn to for ideas.And I have over 50 cake books in my library. I couldn't be happier. :o)
This book provides a huge variety of professional wedding cake patterns. It also contains the basic information of popular cakes and their finishing ingredient, how you should choose the style or colour of cakes etc. It is not a full recipe book but rather an inspirational guide of how to select a perfect wedding cake for an event. Most recommended for amateur bakers and bride to be!
I anxiously waited for the book I had pre ordered.  Pics were beautiful, but...If you don't want a cake with fondant your pretty much out of luck. As most guests want something yummy to eat as well as pleasing to the eye, fondant just doesn't do it.  Sure it holds color better and makes a great presentation, it just isn't a pleaseing thing to eat.We did take away some ideas, we did use some fondant flowers on the lower layers (least likely to be eaten), and used butterccream for the really good and most enjoyed layers.Good Job Martha, maybe next time you could show how to make butter cream just as attractive as fondant.MOTB
If you actually want to make and decorate a cake, this book isn't much use. The book is mainly composed of images of wedding cakes, most of which weren't remotely close to something I would consider. Even if they had been something I liked, only a handful of them included instructions, which means I wouldn't have been able to make most of them anyway. The book did have a few good tips and a few cake and icing recipes.
Just love this book!! I got some great ideas from it. It is well written, recipes easy to follow. I did wonder whether this would be just another wedding cake book when I first saw it. I am so glad I went with my gut feeling and bought it. I love Martha Stewart items, this delivered well.
I purchased this book because I was interested in learning how to make wedding cakes.  My first, which wasn't even a wedding cake, it was my neice's 3rd birthday cake, came out so beautifully.  I used the recipes for the Vanilla Bean Sponge Cake and the Chocolate Butter Cake...both were PHENOMENAL and I got rave reviews.  I even had three people inquire about me making cakes for them!!!  Although some of the recipes may seem a little tedious, I truly believe that it is the small things that you do that make these cakes wonderful.  They take time (LOTS of time...mine took about 15 hours from start to finish!!!) and cutting corners does not get you the best results.  I have already recommended this book to many people interesetd in learning to bake like myself!  BUY IT!!!  I know its expensive....but it will last you for a VERY long time!!!
Im an intermediate cake decorator. I bought this book for inspiration and hoping for a few tips here and there. This is a great book. There are lots of really nice pictures, there are quite a few recipes and also quite a few "how to's".  If you are a beginner and are looking for a book to learn from, this is probably not the book for you, as it's not very instructional in my opinion. The authors do not show decorating processes from start to finish but assume you have some previous knowledge. I would recommend this book to anyone interested in it. Also the price on Amazon beats the bookstore price . I almost bought it in a big retail bookstore but decided to look here first. I saved more than $20.00
As a caterer, I found this book to be a good guide for those who create cakes for special occasions. Many of the cakes in this book are ones that have previously been in "Martha Stewart's Weddings" magazine, and I have made several of them over the years, but it is nice to have the collection all in one source. For the inexperienced, some of the instructions may seem a bit vague, but that is the martha Stewart way, as mostly she assumes that everyone knows how to do the basics. If you've never done this type of baking/creating before, this book is not for you. I do recommend it for those who do this professionally or as an advanced hobby.
As with anything Martha Stewart, this is a thorough how-to book.  I purchased the book to get more cake decorating ideas, but the book goes far beyond that.There are about 14 cake recipes and more than 15 recipes for frostings and fillings. The suggestions for frosting and filling flavors opened my mind. Pistachio buttercream?? I'm all over it.For decorating ideas, I don't think this book has an equal. There are 111 gerogeous cakes for ideas. There are sections on piping, working with fresh flowers, gum paste, marzipan, chocolateThis is a strong reference book -- 255 pages of solid information.  It is a worthy addition to anyone who bakes and decorates more porfessional cakes.
This book is everything I have ever hoped for in a wedding cake book.  I have just started my own wedding cake business and this book is solid gold!  I'm a HUGE Martha Stewart fan!! I love her amazing photos in everything she publishes! This book has some awesome recipes and oh, so many ideas for all of those who want to take their cake decorating to the next level, this book is for you!
Definitely superb in precision of recipes, therefore a reliable reference. A lovely and clean presentation. Photograph quality excellent as is always the case with Martha's books. Would rate higher if possible.
This book is very inspirational if you're looking for a cake that is unique or if you just don't know what your style is. The front portion of the book helps you choose your style and the back half features specs on the cakes they show. i.e. how many people they serve, recipes, ect.
I love this book, thank you so much Martha Stewart .... I made the marble cake and it was delicious cant wait to make more of the delicious recipes, yummy
I have bought a lot of cake decorating books but if you are looking for a guide to decorating cakes I thouroughly recommend buying a collette peteres or peggy porschen. Even though this book has a lot of  photo's it provides some information not much and honestly for the price I would prefer to buy a wedding cake magazine. This book was a dissapointment not very helpful or useful really.
perfect for the future bride or any cake lover. Stunning pictures and a large range of recipes. Very inspiring to look through. Keep it by the bed and look at the large lush pages as you fall asleep and dream of these amazing cakes..
I recieved this book for Christmas.  I found the pictures in this book to be absolutely gorgeous and inspiring.I also made a wedding cake for my brother-in-law's wedding.  I tested out two cake recipes from this book; white butter cake, and yellow cake.  They were both absolutely delicious and not at all too sweet or dry.I also made the Swiss merengue buttercream which also turned out delicious was was a perfect complement to the cakes I made.  Not too sweet, and a nice smooth texture.I will definitely be referring to this book again and again and again when making any cakes.
I gave it four stars because the cakes were ones that were in the magazine at one time or another.  I was hoping to see some new ones.  Great quality book and beautiful pictures!
Can't wait to try all the amazing techniques. I just browsed and I can say that this is the book I am looking for.
I thought this book was quite expensive when I bought it. Now I have it, I would say it was worth every bit I spent.
I've been on the search for the perfect wedding cake recipe for over ten years.  You can call it an obsession as I personally love the way wedding cake tastes and I'm not even married!  I bought this book as soon as it was published and the recipes are incredible - as well as the photos.  For anyone who bakes wedding cakes this is one recipe book worth the investment.
I just couldn't wait to get this book! If you love to create cakes, and not just bake them, this will feed your appetite for cake baking and decorating, and you will place this alongside your other prized tomes of cake education. It's a wonderful journey of the wedding cake, aka "a good thing". If you purchased Martha's "WEDDINGS" book, this is the expanded and transformed chapter on cakes into this book.Martha has outdone herself once more in her passion to give us every possible idea, and instruction, to create the wedding cake of our dreams for the day of our dreams. And to join her in this quest is Wendy Kromer, master baker, who worked for Martha for many years, on both Martha's former TV show and for Martha Stewarts "Weddings" magazine; she now owns and operates her own bakery.While this book was made to help engaged couples decide on what type of cake they would like for their wedding, it also gives instructions should you wish to bake your own wedding cake. For those established bakers and caterers that are looking for ideas and concepts, this will be certainly be a well-referenced tool. The "Album of Cakes" section offers 111 official photographs of cakes, but if you add all photo's of cakes from other parts of this book, you will have well over 135 delectable wedding delights in which to choose.Martha and Wendy do not hold back on any instruction and it begins with the incredible photography of each cake, frosting, filling, and detail of these stunning cakes. These cakes come from both Martha's former TV show, Martha's "Weddings" magazines, as well as some new ones from collaboration with other cake artists.A hallmark of the Martha brand is that she is quite detailed in everything that she wishes to teach, and that is never more seen than here. There are some techniques that will require a professional to do such as the "bubbles" or "pulled sugar ribbon" for some of these cakes, and rightfully, she has not included those instructions in this book because they are labor and equipment intensive, as well as for safety reasons (you are working with intense heat with one, and need specific equipment for the other, let alone the need for specific training).If at all possible, try to obtain of copy of Martha's VHS tape called "Cake Decorating". It is the visual form of instruction on making some fabulous cakes, from simple 2-layer party cakes to actually assembling a 4-tier wedding cake. They were segments taken from her former TV show in which she, and guests, demonstrated this art of cake decorating. I am hoping that she will consider bringing that out again in DVD form. It is an excellent teaching tool and my copy has been well-worn out!This is a very big book, coffee table size, so along with excellent photography, the photos are large and show detail such as brush strokes of hand-painted fondant or delicate designs of rubber stamps used to imprint fondant. The use of gumpaste flowers and marzipan helps to complete certain dimensional and visual appearances desired.The journey begins:MARTHA AND WENDY'S INTRODUCTIONCHOOSING YOUR CAKE:Finding Inspiration: What style are you looking for? (modern, rustic, etc). What season? Location? Motif? (fabric, fruit, flowers, etc).A Cake's Components: Superb index with 14 cake flavors and 18 fillings and frostings along with recipes for each one.Icings and More: There are all types of ways to cover your cake and here are all of them, along with "special considerations" due to season, temperature, etc.Presenting the Cake: How do you want th cake to be displayed? Formal, relaxed? What type of bride and groom cake topper? Which cake board in which to rest the cake?Partnering with a Professional: This section is THE key for any bride and groom to read regarding choosing a qualified baker, along with sidebars  of other cake details to keep in mind.ALBUM OF CAKES: prepare your eyes!  :)Lemon Grove CakeDaisy Garden Cake7-Tier Classic CakePink Lusterware Cake Creamware CakeBahama Orchid CakeSweeping Monograms CakeMatelasse CakeButtoned-Up Cake7-Tier Coconut CakeCherry CheesecakeRose basket CakeLadyfinger Charlotte CakeDrifting Petals cakePink Macaroon CakePetty Piped Bows CakeTowers of Truffles CakeBeehive CakeApplesauce CakeIronstone CakeCitrus Celebration CakeFlower Hat CakePretty Pleats CakePearl and Shell CakePrimrose Cake (simply stunning)French Confectionary Box CakeApplique CakeHomespun Cupcake TowerCorinthian CakeRobin's Egg CakeMeringue Monogram CakeDotted Petals CakeCrewelwork CakePetite Piped CakesWhite Chocolate Tower CakeTuscan Grapes CakeChocolate Mint Cake (colorfully stunning)Woodland Nut CakeTransferware CakeHandcrafted Hellebore CakeMeringue Mushrooms CakeColorful Hydrangea CakePerfect Pear CakeGarlands and Wreaths CakePicket Fence CakeBubble Cake (the "bubbles" need to be made by sugar professionals)Pulled-Sugar Ribbon Cake (sugar ribbons are labor intensive)Eyelet CakeSugar Hydrangea CakeBeribboned Bouquet CakePink Cherry Blossom CakeBeaded Bouquet CakeTrio of Shells CakeChocolate Chestnut CakeRoyal Icing Reliefs CakeMegeve Chocolate CakeTreasures of the Woods CakeBlushing Dogwood CakeFaux Bois Cake (chocolate bands made to look like wood grain)Wedgewood CakeShimmering Candy CakeSilk-Cord Accents CakePaper Ornament CakeMeringue Chrysantheum CakePatterned Nonpareil Cake (remember those candies as a kid? Wow!)Darcy and Andy's Cake (the editoral director of "Weddings" magazine)Button-Topped Boxes CakeTrio of Freesia Cakes (so, so pretty)Chocolate Petal CakeCandy Sampler CakePlayful Paper Flower CakeMini Cupcake TowerStately Springerle CakeChocolate and Geranium CakeCharming Calico Cake (the joy of gumpaste)Devil's Food Finale CakeRose Garden CakeGarden of Sweet Delights CakeLemon and Latticework CakeDelightful Daisies CakeCandy Straw CakePink Madeleine CakeWedding Band CakeRustic Roses CakeSweets and Sentiments Cake (small cakes w/ tuille cookie messages)Strawberry ShortcakeFarmstand Fruit and Buttercream CakeIvory Dots CakeParrot-Tulip Quartet of CakesBlooming Branches Cake (so very delicate)Cascading Orchid's CakeChocolate Charlotte CakeLily-of-the-Valley CakeRuffly Rose-Petal Garland CakeLovely Licorice CakeChocolate Kumquat CakeCitrus Basket Cake (beautiful basic basket weave example)Cherry Almond CakeRibbons and Bows CakeRed Velvet CcakeDamask Cake (the scrollwork is not as hard as it seems)Vintage Monogram CakePin Tucks and Ruffles CakeSnow-Flecked Pinecones CakeShowered in White CakeBamboo Wave CakeTower of Roses CakeRustic Basketweave CakeScalloped Bands and Bows CakeRich Brownie Cakes (individual brownie wedding cakes)Marbelized CakeMAKING A WEDDING CAKE:Planning TipsBaking the Cake LayersDecorating and Assembling the CakeTransporting the CakeEquipment GlossaryCake 101Working with FondantPiping 101: monograms, glossary, piping tips w/ photo's and examples, piping a rose, piping basketweave patterns, piping scrollwork w/ examplesWorking with Fresh FlowersCrystalized FlowersEdible FlowersWorking with Gumpaste: flowers, blossomsWorking with MarzipanWorking with Chocolate: transfer sheets, chocolate bands, dark & white chocolate leaves, wood grain (faux bois)Additional Techniques: mushrooms, icing damask, monogramsRecipes: every flavor and taste for batters, icings, fillings, croquembouche, tuilles, spun sugarBakers Guidleines: An EXCELLENT guide to determine the amount of batter needed to fill specific size pans as well as the time needed to bake each one PLUS the amount of frostings and fillings needed for each size panSourcesAcknowledgementsIndexI realize that I am a Martha-groupie but even so, just perusing through this book, a novice can see that every aspect of wedding cake (or any party cake creation) has been thoughtfully considered and explained. You will be placing this along side a very few select cake books that are as complete, well-presented, and detailed as this one. Thank you Martha and Wendy!
This is a wonderful reference book for anyone with a wedding on the horizon; or anyone who just needs a beautiful cake. Fabulous pictures and recipes.
Everyone that dreams of designing beautiful cakes, should have this on their night stand.  I don't know how many nights I have studied it pages before going to bed, what an absolute treasure this book is.  It's like the Holy Grail of cake books. You won't regret it.
Beautiful in every way ,well written , superb photography , and fantastic instructions.... make this book a " must have".......whether you use this book as a coffee table, or as a reference book, it is definatley "Top Shelf".......... I also gave one as a gift...... the receipient was overwhelmed....
Book in new condition.  Perfect gift for my daughter, the cake baker!  We have a family wedding cake to do !!!
this item is a good buy for me for my daughter, it was delivered fast.it a educational item that give a child fun as she learns.
Price was less than others producing the same type of demo.  Book is outstanding, DVD is outstanding, patterns are perfect.  Really nice job!!  Even sent the author a question and he answered same day.  All I can say is WOW.
This is a great deal.  The bundle will help most woodworkers make their dream chairs.  The instruction is detailed enough to build the chair while enjoying the process.
The poster itself measures about 26" x 34". If you want your poster to fit inside a 20" x 30" frame (like I did), you'll have to trim off the white border to get it down to size.Other than that, good color, nice paper stock, carefully packaged.
this is  a simple poster and not a print so if yoru buying it to frame and keep as something you really want to focus on looking at for a while, you may want to check into a higher quality of print.
Great customer service and very prompt shipping. A high quality poster at a very good price. Would purchase more posters in the future.
I love, love, love this poster. It's adorable and pretty large.  There are several Fashion Frocks posters available, but I liked this one because of the style of the dress and because it's got some pink in the poster.  It's really vintage looking and just really cute.  I bought a white frame mat and a black wooden frame for it, both purchased on Amazon, and it's a really nice piece of art that I didn't pay very much for.
Nice piece.  Turn of the century photo of Cape Arago lighthouse being built.  Looks the same as it does today, so if you've been to Coos Bay, you'll recognize it. Good quality canvas.
The kids received an Elf On The Shelf for Christmas; and this is the perfect compliment for a mid-year reminder.
My little girl loves this blanket. She took it to a sleepover as her &#34;special blanket&#34; and said it was very soft and warm. It's cute, and for the price it was just right.
I enjoy reading about dive trips and advanced diving. These were great stories that educated me. If you want to read something that will educate you on diving but not bore you with facts and figures try this book.
I was most disappointed in this highly touted (by Ben Davison, et al), supposedly humorous anecdotal collection of diving experiences.  Instead, it was a rehash of articles written in the clinical, unfunny style of the originals.  I did not need another primer on the hazards of getting bent, or the psychology of why we dive.  The articles, by and large, were written in quite a humorless, clinical style, reminiscent of the DAN publication "Alert Diver", which I expect to be clinical and fraught with medical terminology (although the latest iteration of this publication is a significant improvement).  I've gone over "Cockroach" several times looking for the wild humor and crazy anecdotes hyped for it, but could find none.  Shame on Ben D., et al!
I am sure this book was assembled the best that could be done. Its just that it is only a collection of short articles that are random in subject matter and timeline. Some of them are not that interesting. I liked maybe ten percent a lot. Undercurrent seems to think they really have something here, but it probably should have only been posted on their website.
I couldn't disagree more with the first reviewer.  I sometimes wonder why people think it's necessary to make such unkind and disparaging remarks.I know nothing about diving, nor have I ever participated; and I never subscribed to the magazine.  So I found the compilation of articles positively mesmerizing; this book was a real page-turner for me.  It's easy to read; the quality of writing is top-notch.  To have so many enthralling stories in one place is a jewel.  Captivating, funny, sad, scary, riveting and informative.  I am in full support of, and will be looking forward to, the second book.
I thoroughly enjoyed reading this book; it is well written and hard to put down.The book is a compilation of short stories, vignettes and even limericks sure to capture the imagination of divers and non-divers alike. The reader benefits from the writers access to over 35 years of contributions from the diving community all over the world.This is a great "arm chair traveler" book for anyone on your gift list, but first sit down and treat yourself to this wonderful and delightful book of scuba diving tales. I very much look forward to the next book..............!
I got this as a gift fori wife. She recently got  Zoku Popsicle maker and we LOVE it. We have two kids and we can give them Popsicles that are actually good for them for a fracton of the cost of buying them at the store, and they are 100% natural ( no preservitaves). I would recommend this book and the Popsicle maker to anyone who has kids.
I got this for my 10 year old who loves making healthy pops. We had to modify recipes a bit as we do not eat dairy, but its still a great book with many ideas and choices.
I bought this zoku quick pop for my daughterr with her zoku quick maker. She loves it and have fun to make her own ice cream.
I got this for my daughter-in-law for Christmas so that she could make stuff with my grandson so I am looking forward to hearing how it goes!  Recipes looked interesting!
Really, it's impossible to live without this book anymore. If you bought a ZOKU, YOU NEED to have this book. It is complete, detailled, well explained. Everything is inside from all the techniques to all the great idea for making your own pops. BOTTOM LINE: Absolutely no pops in this book can freeze in 7 minutes. you have to wait AT LEAST 20 minutes for the creamy pops. The trick that we found playing with the ZOKU is to keep it in the freezer while the pops freeze. It helps a lot and work well.
This book is so beautifully illustrated and easy to follow. It helps you to understand the Zoku better. It might have been even better if they made the recipe units for different sized molds. These recipes produce too much for a single mold unit. It would have been nice if they used a matrix for the ingredients like on a box of rice. I am just math lazy and bought a single mold Zoku. Dividing 3/4 of a cup, 3 tablespoons or 3 1/2 tablespoons is kind of dicey in my kitchen.
The Zoku accessories are pricey, but the recipes have the exact amount you need to make the pops.  I have made it through 15 varieties so far, and I like them all.
I bought this when I bought the pop maker. I think the recipes are fine, but there really isn't much in the book I wouldn't have figured out myself.A couple of good creamy recipes that are now available for free on recipe websites. As for "pop embellishing" well, that wasn't too hard to figure out, either. I'd save the money and spend it instead on extra pop sticks, which seem to disappear the way socks do....
Purchased to accompany the Duo Quick Pop Maker. Great guidelines for successful pop making, as well as lots of recipe ideas.
Lots of chocolate recipes.  We like making the fun brightly colored ones. It's been great to have the book with tips and tricks but I'm sure I could have just looked it up online.
The recipes in this books are tedious to make. I found that easier and simpler recipes can be found online. I had no problem with the recipes online working in the Zoku maker.
This book is not absolutely necessary for creating interesting and tasty popsicles, but it does provide inspiration. It makes an excellent companion gift to the pop maker.
I did not realize that recipes needed so many ingredients to make Popsicles.  I am still undecided about this item so I will give ok rating
This book is a must have if you get a Zoku (which I also highly recommend). There is a large variety of recipes from simple, to fancy. The flavor combos are creative, and it gives you ideas for decorating the pops too. They turn out as beautiful as they are tasty. After reading it you will be inspired to create your own recipes too.
The recipes in this book are kid friendly and parent acceptable for the most part.  It's possible to create pretty healthy popsicles with fresh fruit and other ingredients without too much sugar.
I really enjoyed having this recipe book for our Zuku frozen pop maker. There were not many recipes that were included in the manuel. The ones in the recipe book are awesome, can't wait to try more.
My first thought was that I don't need a cookbook to tell me how to make pudding.  However, after making several batches of pops I now realize the cookbook is worth it.  Had I just dumped pudding in the pop maker I would have been very disappointed with the results. Additionally, it has some very interesting recipes that I wouldn't have thought of on my own.
These Popsicles look awesome. I have not tried any yet, but can't wait to, especially now that spring is here.
I loved having the book for more tastes and ideas..gets your mind thinking to also help create your own. Definitely was worth it to me! Great ideas and yummy recipes!
I have made about 4 recipes from the book so far.  They work if you follow the measurements precisely!  Also, as with any recipe book, I make notes after making the recipe to adjust for our personal tastes.  Like the Mint Chip Pop - the peppermint extract measurement was too much - it tasted almost like mouth wash.  The ideas are all very nice and the pictures are beautiful to look at!
There are some really good recipes in here.  This is definitely a must have for current or future Zoku owners.
High quality book. Clear and helpful information, and then some superb recipe suggestions clearly outlined. I can highly recommend this product.
Making such small pops requires precise measurements, while you can be creative and make your own, it's good to have a base measurement or recipe to start from. I like the recipes in this book and the tips take the guesswork out of making bad pops. I deviate from the recipes often, but glad I have them on hand to use as references and inspirations for what I actually have in the fridge. I love my Zoku! So does my toddler!
I've only tried on recipe but these pops take some time, exact measurements and lots of love. Mine didn't freeze right away, even though I left the base in the freezer for 24 hrs. I poured the mix and had to put back in freezer for a little bit. Be prepared to use exact measurements and don't sub out ingredients.
Very amazing zoku pop cookbook, just love it, very easy to follow.  Would recommend to anyone to make fun pops.
There is no shortage of pop recipes available for free on the web, but I purchased the "Zoku Quick Pops" book, because Zoku has some good recipes for fruit pops on its blog. I was hoping there were more where those came from. This book emphasizes very sweet dessert pops, however. There are 41 recipes in total, only 13 of which are fruit pops. There is a "Fresh and Fruity" chapter, followed by three chapters of dessert pops entitled "I Scream for Quick Pops!", "Bake Shop", and  "Coco Loco". As you might guess from the last one, there are 15 pop recipes that contain chocolate.Chapters on "Tips" and "Techniques" are useful. There is more detailed information about ingredients that don't freeze well in the Zoku than is found in the instruction manual. The book lists options for dairy products and sweeteners, tells you how to do different types of layers, how to add decorative fruit slices, how to do a quick shell, and how to make core pops. The pages about core pops are especially helpful, as they include recipes for pink, purple, and orange outer layers for brightly-colored core pops. The book recommends using Zoku accessory kits, but you can do without.The pop recipes tend to go out of their way to be as sweet as possible. Many, including the recipe for a vanilla base, call for vanilla pudding, where vanilla Greek yogurt would do just as well. I've substituted it with no ill effect. On the bright side, many of these recipes may appeal to children, whereas most pop books that I have seen are geared more to adults. There are flavors like "Cookie Dough", "That's a S'more", chocolate peanut butter, and peanut butter and jelly. All 9 recipes in "Bake Shop" are inspired by cake and cookie recipes.As a resource for light, fresh-tasting fruit pop recipes, "Zoku Quick Pops" is very limited. Most of the fruit recipes are gimmicky and contain too many ingredients. The recipe for Lemonade pops contains orange juice, which is fine, but the addition of vanilla extract kills the fresh fruit flavor. The recipe for mango pops includes orange, apple, banana and lemon, which are too many competing flavors. Mango and orange together make a terrific pop. The book is great for chocolate lovers and those looking for dessert pop recipes. Tips and techniques are also useful. For fruit pop recipes, "Top Pops" by Emily Zaiden is far better.
Have made a recipe out of it and they are delicious .  Like knowing what is going in my food rather than buying at the store and having to weed through the labels.....
The recipes were good, but had too many ingredients sometimes for me to make.  It was very hellpful in showing what would freeze well in the popsicle maker.  I would highly recommend it as it has the directions on how to remove the popsicles from the maker with the tool that comes with the maker.  Without it I would have not have had the directions to remove the popsicles as the freezer pack seemed not to have enough directions to use properly.
Though you don't have to buy the Quick Pops book to make great ZOKUs, you'll find some of the best-tasting frozen recipes in this book.  Since they were tested out specifically for the ZOKU Quck Pop Maker, I've had no trouble with over or under frozen pops.  The Key Lime Pie and Marble Cheesecake are creamy and full of flavor.  After making a few of the recipes, you will want to try combining various recipes to come up with your own favorites.  I plan on making a strawberry swirl cheesecake pop using parts of two recipes from the book.There are plenty of recipes that you can search for on the Web, so you don't have to buy this book, but it has been worth every penny to me.  So much fun, so much flavor.  And by the way, if you have any difficulty with your ZOKU maker, their customer service is very helpful.
The Zoku Recipe Book starts with an introduction to their company and why they decided to make the Zoku Quick Pop Maker. They mention that "the process of making ice pops at home hadn't changed since the first pop molds were invented back in the early 1900's", even though almost every other technology had advanced significantly in that same amount of time. Zoku is an innovative company that was able to figure out how to make ice pops, not only quickly, but beautifully as well. Some of the stunning effects that can be achieved with the Zoku Quick Pop Maker include layers, marbling, angles, and waves. You can even add extras, like sprinkles, chocolate chips, cookie pieces, nuts, marshmallows and more. The pops can be made striped and cream filled, with fruit slices or chocolate covered and the Zoku Recipe Book tells all the details of how to create them.There are tips, tools and ingredients that work best in the Zoku Quick Pop Maker, all detailed in Zoku Recipe Book. Artificial sweeters (not enough sugar content) and melted ice cream (too soft when frozen) are a couple of the things that don't work well in the Zoku. The Fresh & Fruity chapter has sweet, fruit flavors, like Caramelized Banana Coconut, while the I Scream for Quick Pops section has milk based icy treats, Cookies and Cream, for instance. The Bake Shop area has bakery goodies transformed into frozen delights, my favorite is the Carrot Cake Pop, it even has a cream cheese frosting layer! And, of course, there's the ever popular Coco Loco area, I can't wait to make the Nutty Chocolate Pretzel flavor. I loved the clean, modern style of Zoku Recipe Book and I really enjoyed all the brightly colored and delicious pops!
This cookbook is great.  I have really enjoyed reviewing all of the recipes.  Sure - some are more difficult than others, but there is a nice variety in this book.  For me it was totally worth it just to get the quick shell recipes alone.  We have only tried the chocolate so far, but it is so tasty.  A few of my favorite recipes in this book are the banana from the strawberry banana one, and the raspberry/blackberry ones (but I used mixed berries).  Also, it has great instructions for tips on using the Zoku.  Definitely recommended.
My granddaughter and I had fun making Ice Cream and pop sticks. We go very creative and she loves doing things with here grandpa
The pages wipe off easy and it has a lot of yummy ideas really fun to enjoy. I recommend this to anyone
My daughter wanted this book and the price on Amazon was the best.  She has already tried one recipe a day after receiving the book.  She seems happy with it.
If you have a Zoku Quick Pop maker (or two....I have the original one-slot and then I bought the double-slot here at Amazon), I recommend you get this creative little book, which will inspire you.
It has a lot of recipes but because my daughter has multiple allergies,I was expectinig it to have more fruit options with not dairy ingredients!
I like to color even though I am 69 and being able to color flowers is so much the better.  The flowers are true to nature thus is instructional also.
While these books may appear as simple children's activities, they are instead detailed and complete guides to college level work and textbooks, giving a new initiative to learning material.  The color, details, and careful explanations included within these books complement work done in the classroom and in the field.  Before paying out large sums for study guides, outside tutoring or online help, try this book.  The colored frames are a great help.
,Arrived quickly, in good condition.Photos Included for color appropriateness.  A good guide for wildflower identification. Will look for more from this source.
The Peterson Field Guide Color-In Books are meant for older children and adults who have a love of learning and of nature, as well as a love of coloring. They are a great way to learn field marks and identification in a way that you will remember them when out in the field. The Peterson Field Color-In Guides are not meant as a replacement for a regular field guide, but they are an excellent supplement for them. With the winter months coming on, you will really enjoy having these Peterson Field Color-In Guides at home to color and learn when the weather will not allow you to get outside and hike, kayak, or explore nature.I purchased the Peterson Color In Book Wildflowers during a visit to the Bosque del Apache Wildlife Refuge Gift Shop last week. (Actually I had quite a little coloring book shopping spree, so I will be reviewing more of them later this week!) I have been wanting a copy of one of the The Peterson Field Guide Color-In Books for a while, and this gave me a chance to make the purchase in a way that benefits a wildlife refuge that I use and enjoy. (I will be writing a blog entry for my main blog about our visit to the refuge later, and will be sure and link to it here in case you are interested)What I like about this coloring book for adults is that it has detailed drawings to color of the wildflowers, along with a few facts about each of them. There are four pages of colored stickers at the front of the color-in book for reference. You can place the stickers next to the line drawing for reference, as they suggest, or leave them where they are and peek back and forth (that would be me) or even use them to decorate something completely different.The book overall is divided into four sections by environment. Three related wildflowers are featured on a page, with some facts about each of them, for several pages.  There are followed by a two page spread to color showing the flowers in their natural environment. The pages are good quality, but printed front and back. Like many of my coloring books, I will probably scan all of the pages and print out and color the ones I want to work on at any given time. I can't wait until the people who print coloring books figure this out and start giving us a CD-ROM of the pages along with a printed version of the book. The fine line, detailed and intricate drawings beg for colored pencil to work them, although the introduction suggests you might also want to use watercolors. Crayons can be used, but are probably much too blunt for many of the smaller details.In conclusion, I am really happy with this coloring book for adults. It is an excellent way to learn to identify the wildflowers, shells, or animal species, while also being fun. I think it would be a great addition to a home schooling program, or for any older child or adult who is very interested in nature.
We bought this book, along with several others, for our granddaughter who has a developing love of nature and all outdoor things.  This book is a great way to get her started in the garden, not only can she learn the names of the flowers, but she can color them as well.  I am looking forward to an exciting adventure this spring when we hit the flower beds!
Well, I must confess: we got this because it's hard to read while you eat, and so we usually tuck the pages of the book under a plate or something to keep them open.  Sometimes we use clothespins, etc.Read-eating is a common enough occurence in my house that I sought a solution.This cookbook stand is good for holding open very large books (Tom Clancy tomes, Steve Jobs' biography, etc) but for smaller volumes, it does not do the job.The stand itself is nice -- made of wood, adjustable angle, stores flat, little page holders that flip up.I'm sure it would work well for cookbooks.
As I write this review my bag is going through the wash because this mug is NOT leak proof, it was 'closed' and still leaked everywhere.
This mug was very cheaply made and it shows.  Not only does it leak, but it looks and feels cheap.  I sent it back.
My mother really loves these mugs, and I wish that I could purchase this pattern for her as a Mother's Day gift (she loves paisley). The current patterns being sold for the Vera Bradley Mug w/Lid collection SUCK! This would have complimented her &#34;Very Berry Paisley&#34; mug so well!
I love this product because it is an easy way for my daughter to know how much I love her every time she drinks from the cup while in HS and off to college.  This is my second cup because I accidentally broke the first one.  Felt terrible.
Tried to contact vendor about this, but they were unresponsive.  Caveat Emptor.  They are beautiful and I enjoy using them.  When they arrived the box had a huge dent in it, it was so poorly packaged with those flimsy air pockets and not enough of them to prevent the internal product box from shifting toward its doom - luckily five of the six didn't break.  The vendor hasn't written back in two weeks and counting.
These are exceptional quality hard-fired porcelain bowls. The form is beautifully conceived from Sung chinese and japanese tea bowl heritages. The foot to rim dimension is perfect for holding with hot foods. The only things I wish was different is the texture of the interior decoration which will be unpleasant when touched with a fork or spoon (no problem with chop sticks), and could present an ease of cleaning problem. It would have been better to put the decoration on the outside. But I recommend these highly compared to other choices.
We received these salad plates and bowls from our wedding registry. They are absolutely beautiful BUT NOT FUNCTIONAL. It seems that they are meant to be used only with wooden utensils or chop sticks because any metal utensil used on the surface leaves a gray mark and makes an awful noise that is completely unbearable! Enough that we have to purchase new dinner ware.  I really wish this was not the case because I love the design, just be aware before you buy!
Very good value for stoneware.  The contoured cherry blossom motif inside the bowls are very pleasing to view while eating or when the bowls are presented on a table.  The volume is ideal for soups and noodles.  I do find it odd that it comes in a set of six and not four or eight.
So, I made a huge order through Amazon for several people's Christmas gifts. Somehow the entire order was sent to another address in another town. I was very distraught because I just spent a lot of money on many gifts that some stranger randomly got and I paid for!I contacted Amazon and it took them about 2 seconds to apologize and refund me what they could.They advised me that they would have to request help from this company because they aren't directly affiliated with Amazon and that Lucca would have to process any return or refund themselves. Ok, fine. Amazon is 100% amazing with their customer service and offered to send the request to this company on my behalf.After several e-mails back and forth with Lucca about this issue I was then asked to file an additional request for assistance through Amazon, which Amazon cust. service had already done for me. Lucca had apparently no record of it. I have a copy of the e-mail that was sent on my behalf as all requests for refunds or w/e have copies sent to your e-mail so I know for a fact that the request was already sent. So, I sent yet ANOTHER request and they said thanks and that they would take care of the matter asap. Its been over a week now and still nothing. No refund, no denial, no correspondence whatsoever.I have no other option at this point than to call Amazon and file a complaint about this company with them. Outside of not dealing with the issue they seem like nice people, just not very helpful when you have a real issue.
I ordered these bowls for someone else, but when they arrived they were too beautiful to give away! Unfortunately, upon arrival, one of the bowls was broken, but the seller was able to send me a replacement at no charge.If you are looking for a great addition to your kitchen, I highly recommend these bowls. They're deep enough for a soup or stew, and they add the right amount of electic flair to the dinner table. I have a penchant for stoneware, and these bowls do not disappoint. They're good quality, but light-weight, dishwasher safe, and microwave safe. Plus, they're authentic Japanese - not imitation. Each bowl is hand painted, and the slight differences from one bowl to the next makes this set extra special.I recommend buying a set of soup spoons to compliment the set. Enjoy!
This cup worked well. It is not entirely leak proof but was a good office cup especially if you were like me and drank your coffee within an hour or so. Simple stainless and worked.I think someone stole mine to be honest I don't know where it took off to.
right size, attractive, keeps it hot, fairly easy to clean though it has that little hole on the bottom that travel mugs always have allowing small amount of water to leak back into the cup. Saw it recommnended on American Test Kitchen, otherwise would not have purchased it.
I love this mug. It cleans easily and keeps drinks hot. The red is REALLY red; I might have chosen another color, but it's a great mug.
This mug is a great size, keeps chai tea hot and is a good investment.  Great gift, which I have provided for others.
Like that this cup is stainless inside and out (which is why I bought it).  But the price is a little high.  Not lid is not leak proof but does a decent job of keeping the liquid inside.  Other than that, your basic mug.
Overall it is a nice mug. it is easy to use and comfortable to hold. I wish it had better insulation. If you are looking for your coffee to stay hot for a long time, this mug is NOT for you. If you want a nice mug for short trips, this mug is perfect.
I purchased two of these cups for camping but I like them so much I use one daily. Unlike other thermos-type cups, this one actually keeps the beverage hot for quite some time, especially if you place the cap on it. The cap itself is really unique in the way it works. After filling with a hot liquid the cap fits rather loosely in place. But, after a few seconds heat expands it and it wedges itself in place very securely. You can still pry it off but not easily when it's hot which is just what you'd want. Also, that cap has a neat little sliding anti-splash tab on the top that actually works.The cup is wide enough to be stable sitting on a flat surface - with or without liquid in it - yet fits easily into a car tray cup holder for travel.After using the cup for a few days I decided that I didn't want the nylon handle. I simply used a heat gun (on low) to gently heat it up and just pulled it down and off of the cup.That handle is secured to the cup with some glue and a slight ridge running around its inner circumference. It was easy to clean off the remaining glue from the stainless steel and I could - if I wanted to - re-glue and reattach the handle.This is a great insulated stainless steel cup with or without a handle and well worth the price.
This mug does only a fair job of keeping coffee hot.  It will absolutely NOT protect your shirt, pants, carseat, or anything else from spills and drips!  The lid does help to keep the coffee hot in that without the lid it is exposed to the air.  That slight benefit and it's attractive appearance are the only advantages I found.  If you have NO concern about leaking/dripping, this mug is sufficient, however, the Contigo Autoseal West Loop is a much better product, and for essentially the same price.  I have returned my Timolino PABLO-46GREmug and purchased 2 Contigo Autoseal West Loop thermal mugs in 2 of the many colors available (I like lilac & gunmetal).  This Timolino thermal mug, in my opinion, should cost only $10 due to it propensity to leak!
Comfortable to use for with temperature beverage and fits in all my car's tiny cup holders without tipping. Not dishwashing, though. Handwash only.
This cup keeps your drink cold or hot and fits the holder in my car, only down side is if it falls over it leaks and at 89 I am good at knocking any cup over.
So much better than plastic mug types--keeps coffee warm and doesn't stain. We bought it because Cook's Country rated it tops.
Been using this model of insulated mugs for years. It's a tank that can be dropped and be no worse for wear. Meets my needs but wish it would keep coffee hot longer that 45 minutes.
Have not used it often enough, but does what it is supposed to do, ie, keeps drinks hot AND does NOT leak. I am looking forward to giving these as gifts next Christmas
This mug comes in a variety of colors most of which are hard to find on Amazon, easy to find on the seller's website but not easy to order. It's worth the effort of figuring out how to place the order though, as this mug keeps tea hot for a good couple of hours, and even longer if left in a sunny car. I have tried a variety of different travel mugs of similar size and this one is by far the best for not retaining the flavor of the previous cup of tea thanks to its metal instead of plastic interior. Additionally it is better designed, fitting nicely in the car cup-holder and having a flat lid that doesn't poke your nose every time you take a sip, and allows you to close the hole in the lid by sliding the cover with your teeth so you don't have to take both hands off the wheel while driving. The only minor quibble is that the sliding cover is a little hard to clean underneath - this is not a problem for black or fruit teas, but if you take milk, a gunge can build up once in a while. Timolino addressed this problem in their version 2.0 mug by making the cover un-clippable for easier washing, but unfortunately also modified the rest of the lid so that now it has a big lip like other mugs, making it hard to sip, and also added more weight to the top of the mug with unnecessary extra plastic and a thicker handle. The best would be to revert to this version 1.0 mug and just make the sliding cover un-clippable.
I like my coffee hot; borderline scorching but drinkable.  About 10 years ago I purchased several Avantro coffee mugs that are very similar to these.  Those have been able to keep my coffee at my preferred drinking temperature for well over 4 hours even on the coldest of days.  I work outside so hot coffee is crucial in these nasty New England winters.Well, day one with this new mug and I am quite disappointed.  This mug barely kept my coffee warm for an hour.  That is quite unacceptable seeing as how this company is the one that bought out Avantro.
Convenient shape, good handle; but doesn't hold temperature as long as I would like on a long trip.  Good for short commute or errands around town.  Fits cupholder well.
Convenient with a handle on the mug, keeps my coffee hot/warm for 2 -3 hrs, easy to wash and clean the lid -- these are expected from reading reviews.But it leaks from the lid while walking with it in my hand -- major inconvenient.  Also, the mug feels hot when the coffee is hot.
These mugs do what they are designed to do, i.e., keep liquids hot or cold for hours, don't leak, easy to clean and attractive to look at.  But, do not put them in the dishwasher as they lose their magic!
LOVE these cups! My husband has hand one for 10 years and it's still going strong. This particular purchase was so he'd have a cleaner, newer one. The only thing we suggest is hand washing. After it's been washed in the dishwasher it leaks water like crazy from the bottom.
My 3 month old loves this book with it's bright colors and sparkling butterflies, it's perfect for this age.
This has been a favorite of my toddler's for a long time.  She adores watching the butterflies and seeing the beautiful illustrations and colors.  It's a book I feel good about reading to her, and it flows nicely as you read so kids can "read along" with you as they memorize!  I really noticed her language development improving as we've read her books like this.  Best part of all?  She sits HAPPILY through the whole book and asks me to read it again!  I'd give it ten stars if I could!  I also highly recommend 10 Little Ladybugs and 8 Silly Monkeys, also big hits!
I bought this book for my 1 year old daughter because it has some beautiful illustrations.  Little did I know, we would be reading this book daily at bedtime.  Now she's 17 months old and she knows all of her colors, but not just the color pictures in the book. You can ask her to bring you something red and she will bring you the nearest red toy she finds!  I attribute much of her progress to this book.  Mom likes it too!
This is the story of a group of butterflies looking for a place to sleep. Each one is a different color, and each pair of facing pages (color-coordinated, of course!) tells the story of where each of the butterflies found to sleep. Each of the butterflies is shown as a brightly-colored, foil-looking toy that your little one will not be able to resist touching.My little one absolutely loved this book, and it did go great as a preparing for sleep read. The colors and the butterflies, and the cute story all were a hit. We both highly recommend this book!
My 15 month old daughter adores these books; The entire collection of them! She loves books as is but really enjoys these ones. They are so cute and I love them also! Perfect for her and her age as well as older age too I am sure! Collect them all- they are worth it!!!Enjoy!
What a lovely book, the illustrations have very bright colors and a lot of detail. My Grandson saw one in the doctor's office and tried to bring it home, he kept looking at it over and over. I bought this one for him, it is beautiful and he loves it. I thought if it could stand the abuse at the doctor's it would do fine at home.
Someone gave me this book at my baby shower. Five years and two kids later, it's still a favorite! The text offers a sweet, rhyming lullaby, perfect for bedtime rituals. The die-cut pages and 3-D glittery butterflies provide counting fun and visual appeal. It teaches numbers, colors and subtraction. And it's sturdy! At first glance it seems feminine, but my very rough-and-tumble son enjoys it as well.This is a great book -- the only gift I received that day that isn't collecting dust.
Perfect little book. Snuggle up with your child or grandchild at bedtime and read this lovely book. It is a sweet and colorful story, a wonderful way to finish story time and tuck a little one into bed.
The pictures in this book are so lovely.  Short easy to read text for those kids who would rather look at the pictures than listen to the words.  We spend most of the time pointing out all the things of like colors on each page (i.e. pink pig, pink possum, pink butterfly, etc.).Both my girls enjoy this book.  It has been a favorite of my younger child for over 6 months (she's 21 mo. now).  Whenever we sense an impending meltdow/temper tantrum, we pull this book out to distract her.
We have the whole series of these. My daughter is 8 and still likes to pull these out. Very colorful and fun to read.
Reading this book is our bedtime ritual since when my daughter was 7 months old. We would make up stories and talk to the animals/bugs/flowers in the book and sing to them.  My daughter loves it. It's a beautiful book to read before bed and it probably will bring sweet dreams to the little sleepy head, who knows... it's an excellent book to each babies colors as well.
This is a beautiful book. The butterflies are cute, and illustrations are fabulous. My son loves it. Unfortunately, the text doesn't flow very well. It's quite hard to read. I like Buzz, Buzz, Busy Bees and Ten Little Ladybugs much better, and my son loves those books, too.
I bought this book for my daughter well over a year ago and it is still a bedtime regular. She LOVES it! It's a book she doesn't mind "reading" by herself, and she will over and over again. It's cute, simple and calming.  She also loves the ladybug book by the same author.
Our little guy loves this book and I enjoy seeing such beautiful colored pages as the story progresses from day to night.  Beautifully designed and layed out.
This is a good size for toddlers to hold and look at on their own. The little plastic butterflies are cute and coordinate with the color page. The child can work on recognizing colors, counting backwards, rhyming words and matching colors on coordinating pages. Fun little book.
My 19 month old daughter's favorite book it the Ten Little Ladybugs, so when I saw that this book was created by the same people I grab it without taking time to really read it.  Little did I know, the author and the illustrator are not the same.  The book kept my daughter's attention but it does not have the same rhyming sceme as the first book.  After paying closer atteniton I realized it says that the book is by the "creators" of Ten Little Ladybugs not the same author.
My daughter is 2 and loves this book.  It has helped her learn her colors and she loves to touch the butterflys.  The pictures are fun and she finds new things to look at every time we read it.
ISBN 0689856849 - Whether or not you enjoy this book will probably depend on what it is you expect from it.  It is easy to become confused by the cover statement "From the creator ofTen Little Ladybugs".  The creator/author of that book is Melanie Gerth, and she is also the creator of Good Night, Sweet Butterflies - but she is not the author here.  The text in this case is by Dawn Bentley, illustrations by Heather Cahoon.  That information, intentionally or not, is hidden away on the back cover in small letters.  Ladybugs fans might find themselves disappointed.Nine glittery plastic butterflies head off to find a place to sleep.  One by one, they choose a place, until there are none left.  It is time to sleep until another day arrives.While technically a Board Book, the pages here are much thinner than the usual board book binding.  That and the small, not too hard to remove butterflies (a potential choking hazard) make the book unsuitable for children under 3.  There are cut-outs on the cover for all nine butterflies and each succeeding page has one less cut-out, which is a nice way to learn to count down from 9.  The places the butterflies choose to sleep are color-based (the blue butterfly chooses a blue stream, the red on red roses, etc), so colors are introduced as well.  The negative comes in two parts, both in the writing.  The text is in rhyme, but the rhyming pattern is clunky, with long lines and no evident cadence to it.  In addition, some lines are tongue twisters ("with a pink piglet and three playful pink possums"), which only makes reading the rhyme more difficult.  If your child is likely to spend a lot of time on the counting, you'll take so long between pages that the rhyme issues won't matter anyway, but it's an annoyance that what is essentially a poem doesn't flow the way you expect it to.  Really a nice book and a super cute idea, Butterflies is just missing something in the text.- AnnaLovesBooks
I have twin daughters (11 months old) and they LOVE this book.  Each night we read together and they start smiling and giggling as soon as I pick it up.  They love touching the butterflies and flipping through the board-book-style pages.  Each page is full of vibrant colors, which seem to jump off the page.  The only way this book could be any better is if it glowed in the dark.  It truly is a wonderful bedtime story for sweet little butterflies. :)
Each page has a color theme that is comparible with the color of the butterfly. Lovely.
This is one of three books my daughter (11 mos) really loves.  Her Fav is the Busy Bees.  But this one, 10 Little Lady Bugs, amd Busy Bees, I've had to tape up from being read and played with so much.  I think, because I really don't know, that she really like the vibrant colors - I know I do.
I expected the "good night sweet butterflies" book that I had in a largerformat. Because the book is small, some pages have been cut off, and the text is completely different and much worse than the text of the large book.I am very disappointed with this purchase.
The kids love it.  It's short, colorful, and the kids love touching the sparkly butterflies on each page.  It's a great addition to their little library.
I had to read this book to my son every night-- sometimes twice a night. After about 3 months, he had it memorized and he would recite it with me.  It's great for learning colors as well as animals and flowers.  Read in the right tone of voice and it becomes so relaxing, YOU'LL struggle against yawns yourself!  We love this book.  :)
This is the second time I am buying this book because my 22 month old daughter loves it so much the first one got worn out. The colors are brilliant and my daughter loves butterflies. It is a great way to settle down for bed. first the butterflies go to sleep, then my daughter.
My daughter loved 10 Little Lady Bugs so much I purchased this book for her as well.  It took her a couple of reads to get into it, but she soon fell in love.  It is now read as often and the Lady Bug book.  The story is short, simple and fun to read, although when tired the last couple of pages can be a bit of a tongue twister for mom.  It is an excellent story to teach color giving it a good educational value and the nice thing is it is a good bedtime story.  It is very calm and relaxing so we now alternate this book with Goodnight Moon, which I was tired of reading.  Really a very good choice for a toddler book.  Note however, this is not a board book and the pages while thick are easily torn.
My daughter 1 year old really likes this book.  I bought it because of its similarity to the 10 little ladybugs book.  It has the same sort of colorful illustrations and I like it better as the ladybugs are not as pretty as the sparkly butterflies.  This book teaches colors as each of the butterflies finds a place to stay for the night.Update - My daughter is now well grown but this book sticks in my mind still - we read it so many times.  I would say it was one of her very favorites when she was young.
My daughter loves this book so much.  When she finds it she gets really excited.  Sometimes she just carries it around the house with her.  If I put it with the rest of her books it will be out when I go back into her room later.  I'm going to have to order another one because its not the strongest book and she is pretty hard on it.  Its a great book though, really cute.
This book is absolutely beautiful. A brilliant bedtime story with vibrant colors and gorgeous illustrations. Each page teaches a different color and the illustrations boldly burst with that color. ..., is how the book starts off and we are then led all around this color dreamland. ...The butterflies in the book are popped out and sparkly. As we turn each page the color butterfly we are reading about disappears. Each page mentions the color twice and an animal. The last page reunites all the butterflies and the colorful animals as we say goodnight...My daughter loved this book since she was 4 months old. The colorful illustrations keep her interested and she likes to grab at the popped up butterflies. A delightful story I enjoy reading again and again. I sometimes even read it to myself. The purple page is MY favorite.
I bought this for my daughter for her 1st birthday. She ADORES it! She loves touching the butterflies with her fingers and staring the illustrations (which are pretty and very well done).
This book is so delightful. The colors, the story, the quality---mommy and 36 mo old approve!! Two thumbs up
I bought this book for my daughter because she loves the Ten Little Ladybugs so much, but althought the colors are much more vibrant and I personally like this book, my daughter doesn't care for it nearly as much as some of her other books.  The storyline doesn't flow as well in rhyming.
This beautifully illustrated book featuring ten colorful,glittery butterflies is a favorite at our house. The nana-babies like to count the butterflies as they flit off! The book is also good for learning colors, discussing the activities the butterflies do and the plastic butterflies are great as the babies and toddlers like to touch them!
*wife here* I bought this book for our daughter when she was about 3-4 yrs old and kept it because it was her favorite for years. Now I read it to my son (2) and daughter sits in and she is 8. Its a dear book that does help with colors and counting but more important it fills their dreams with soothing images after a day of excitement and adventure. (daughter use to tell me she dreamed of butterflies sometimes after reading that to her at night) I think this is a must have for all families with young children. Im sure Ill be reading it to MY grandchildren.
Good Night, Sweet Butterflies is a hit in my home. I have a two-year old girl and four-year old boy who both love this book. Kids love the dimensional butterflies, and the text is simple enough for my boy to memorize and "read" aloud.
This book has the most spectacular illustrations I have ever seen in a book. It is a favorite for both my daughters and the butterfly's make it even more fun. I am yet to find a book greater or as good as this one. Heck it is my favorite too :)The story has such a sweet soothing tone to it as well. I would recommend this book to anyone with children. It is so great I even took time to write a review on it. that is rare!
My grandchildren put on their happy face when they see this book. They love to touch the glittery butterflies and follow them through the pages. The colors are awesome!
My daughter just received this book for her first birthday, and it has quickly become one of her favorites.  The sparkly butterflies really get her attention.  The book teaches colors with wonderful illustrations and rhymes.  My only concern is that a baby's eyes may have trouble distinguising different objects that are all the same color.  But my daughter does often bring it to me for me to read to her, and she enjoys looking through it on her own.  This book may be too fanciful for little boys to appreciate.
This is one of my 3 year old little boy's favorite bedtime books.  It's a rare night that we don't read this.  Not only is it a good read with beautiful pictures, it has sparked many wonderful conversations.
The book was supposed to be like new, but each page had a hand written page number. It was very obvious that this was not part of the original book and nothing was mentioned about it in the product description.
I was very disappointed with the condition of this book. It was listed as very good, but it was very very used. I was unable to give it as a gift to my grandson, and had to put it in the thrift shop pile. Of course I could not consider returning it because the book price was less then postage
Ever since I read j.singh's The Butterfly to my kids they've been obsessed with caterpillars and butterflies and just about the entire insect kingdom. So, undoubtedly, I've been cajoled into buying pretty much every butterfly book on the market (i plan to bill Singh!). Now having read all these books I consider myself a sorta self-proclaimed authority whose mission is to save parents time and money. And so here are the winners according to me and my two wonderful children. The gold medal goes to GOOD NIGHT SWEET BUTTERFLIES (for the illustrations color and content); the silver medal to FROM BUTTERFLY TO CATERPILLAR (for content and pictures); and the bronze to WAITING FOR WINGS (for content). There are plenty of others but these are a good place to start. Hope I've been helpful.
This is my daughter's favorite bedtime book. We got it for her first birthday and we still read it every night. She loves the sparkly butterflies and it helps teach her colors. She's 2 and she can point to each color of butterfly! The illustrations are great because there are a lot of things to find. Ours is so worn out now, that I have to purchase a new one.
I got this as a gift for my niece and she loved it. It's a super cute book and ill be getting it for any other nieces that may come along.
My 20 month old daughter loves this book. The illustrations are very clear and vibrant, and she loves the touchable butterflies.  It's held up well from some abuse, too.
Its an ok book but what I hate about it is the butterflies have glitter on them. My one year old touches them and gets bits of glitter on her hands. I stashed it away and I don't know if I will take it out.
This story is one of my daughter's favorites; she learned her colors listening to this book.  The raised butterflies are a great tactile addition to this already interesting book.  Bright, colorful illustrations are appealing to little eyes as well as big.
My 1 year old loves the ladybug book, so I thought I would buy her similar items so that she could have some variety.  It didn't work as I planned.  She still loves her ladybugs and I don't like this story as much.  It's very pretty, but I feel like it has too much going on.  She may be more interested when she is older.  Never a bad thing to have too many books.
This book and 10 little ladybugs are WONDERFUL books - no complaints!
These recipe cards are adorable and perfect for what my sister wanted. She wanted a way to organize and file her favorite recipes away and this was exactly what she wanted.
This is such a great product. I keep all my coupons and receipts in here seperated into different catatgories. Really helpful!
Don't lend the coupon organizer to your husband. He will forget it in the store.
I love this book. I bought this one as a gift. It came very quickly and is as good as  it was described.
We use this book as a supplement to our homeschooling curriculum.  It's easy to read and descriptive without being overly involved, therefore allowing the parents to fill in some of the blanks in adolescent development in their own way.
very good material for study in this field and supplies  need studies in this field of growth and acceviements fr his 8th grade corriculum
Very easy to understand Christian curriculum that covers everything the student needs for health at each grade level.  It is written for a classroom setting but that is very easily modified for at home use.  Love it!
Received exactly what I requested for this Calvin and Hobbes piece.  The color is great and the frame is simple and doesn't take away from the comic strip.  Perfect!
It was nice. The printer used to produce this colour print out could have been nicer and the scan of the copy could have been a little better.
Totally satisfied with this purchase.  The matting & framing was perfect, as was the cartoon itself.  No marks or flaws.  Would recommend to anyone.
Absolutely love Calvin and Hobbes and so does my boyfriend. I got this as a gift for him and he loved it. It was printed on high quality paper and the colors looked amazing. It was even shipped nicely. Very pleased. :)
Large. Clear. Nostalgic. Passing immense effect on to my daughter . She loved it!  Look forward to getting other ones
The framed comic cell came beautifully framed. It was a gift for my 15 yr old son, a huge fan of Calvin and Hobbes.
This comic plate came shipped in a sturdy package.  My wife put this on her Wish List and I bought it at Christmas.  After I had it framed she chose to display it at home instead of hanging it on her office wall (which is what she wanted it for).  She claims that it was too nice to leave at work.
Very expedient delivery time and quality of product was amazing. I order both the First and Last Calvin & Hobbes prints framed and gave them to my boyfriend as a Christmas gift -- he LOVED them!! I will consider this vendor again in the future.
Nicely printed and packaged for safe arrival. Had it framed with a bright orange mat and black wood frame. Looks great!
Very happy with the quality of the print, but feel I was overcharged on postageOrdered 2 prints which arrived in the same package however I was charged as though they were shipped individually
I bought this for my brother's 31st! He adores the cartoon like me and was holding this like it was precious. I didn't buy the frame though. I think I can find my own and save a bit of money on a great gift. Was very carefully wrapped and packaged. That's always appreciated. :-D
Calvin & Hobbes always has been and always will be my favorite comic strip!  I bought this for my son-in-law's 35th birthday.  He knows how much I love Calvin & Hobbes and he is the only male in our family besides my dad so it was a very personal gift from me to him.  The only downside of the order was the high S&H cost.
I bought this for my dad for Christmas. He's a big Calvin and Hobbes fan, and this is the perfect addition to the cool stuff that already hangs in his garage. The quality is excellent and it arrived nicely packaged to protect it from damage during shipping.
Paid extra to get the framed version of this artwork for my son's room. Love the cartoon itself. But was disappointed that the matting of the frame was a different color from what was depicted in the item's photo. I sent an email to the company (Andrews McMeel Art) about a week ago and so far they haven't responded.Update -- the company has responded to my email with a very nice note that indicates they'll make things right. I may end up a completely satisfied customer after I'll. If so, I'll update again.
Gave this to our 11-yr old son (a huge Calvin & Hobbes fan)for Christmas, and he really loved it.  It is only about the size of a regular page in the rectangular paperback books(about 11x14?), and I was hoping it would be larger, but the color is very good, and we had no trouble finding a mat and frame for it ourselves.  He could not wait to get it on his wall!
My son loved the Calvin and Hobbes picture. It was the perfect gift to celebrate his new apartment and job.
This was a present for my GF who fell in love with it.  I did not get the frame as it seem like I could get even a custom frame for the same price as they wanted for the famed print.
I'd thought about getting this as a gift for a couple years, but it seemed  expensive.  It is nicely printed on good paper and looks really nice framed (I bought my own frame, not sure how the pre-framed one looks).
Very expedient delivery time and quality of product was amazing. I order both the First and Last Calvin & Hobbes prints framed and gave them to my boyfriend as a Christmas gift -- he LOVED them!!
This is an aweseome print and loving it every minute of it so glad  I got this as fan of Caliv and Hobes :D
I bought this for my sister's birthday since she is a huge C&H fan (got her the full collection for Christmas last year). It came in a heavy duty envelope with a stiff cardboard backing to protect it while it was being shipped. Delivery took a little a bit longer than anticipated but it made it with some time to spare. It is the size of the original printings back during the Sunday comics so take careful stock of the specified size.
After reading the reviews from dissatisfied customers on the mat color of the framed version of this item, I chose to purchase only the art and do the framing myself.The art was delivered in a very secure packaging, carefully rolled in paper, in a crush-proof tube. Shipping was very fast.The art itself is a very rich print on heavy paper, the kind that will last for a long time. I'm happy with the quality and I feel as though I got my money's worth. Now I am looking forward to choosing a great frame and hanging this in our new home!
Opted out of the framing option after reading other reviews. The picture arrived in a timely manner and was well-protected. Colors were vibrant and the printing looked great. I purchased my own frame for it, and my boyfriend loved the birthday gift!
The final Calvin & Hobbes is a classic. My wife got this for me for Christmas and I have it hanging beautifully in my home office.
Very happy with print but feel I was overcharged for postageI purchased 2 prints which arrived in same package but paid for separate postage so paid double
I believe Christmas is the only part of the year where also bossy children like Calvin expect the magic and sincerely smile at the entire world. I think that just for one night like this, Calvin is the real child that everyone would be...
Very clear print, and it was easy to find a frame for it. It's a beautiful reminder of this wonderful comic
I love Calvin and Hobbes therefore, this is wonderful!  I adore it, it's hilarious and framed simply and nice.  Would love to see more.
Works great. Easy to use. Just follow the instructions.If you buy one at the weight watchers meeting, you could get it cheaper.
This scale is used primary for  soap and lotion making. My friend has one just like it. Great product. Recommend it highly.
Great map of GB if you plan on a driving vacation. Its clear and easy to plan a drive. The price is right the shipping cost is more than the Map which is not so good.
This atlas is very easy to use and is not heavy.  I like the full pages.  The lesser roads are not all shown but the places to see are marked and will be easy to find.
I bought them for my classroom and absolutely love them! They are big & pretty and make a wonderful addition to my high school classroom. I am very, very happy with the merchandise!
These are fine, but I'm not sure they're worth the money. I ended up using them in my college beginning level Spanish class and some students probably got a kick out of them, but if I were to do it again, I'd have students make their own as a project, esp. for younger (high school) kids... Younger than that, I'm not sure they're completely appropriate (but kinda funny).
I love these posters.  They really give the students a better understanding of what different types of sentences look like and how they are used.
Great poster with some fun insults from Shakespeare.  It's laminated and 24 x 36 inches.  Will keep students entertained--but not so cluttered that it will drive students away.
Large, expensive map.  The map isn't large enough for a tremendous amount of detail in the smaller regions.  Some of the rivers have names but most do not.  Basically, if it's on your wall, you'll look at it and that's why you want it, right?
Well-packaged (came rolled in sturdy tube) at which point I had it framed for my father-in-law.  The colors are very nice - not too bright nor too dim - and the framed product looks gorgeous.
The map is almost good. Disapointing as it does not detail important regions .  Where does one get a really good wine region map- I just don't know.
The map is colorful with an easy to read legend. It is large enough to be hung on a wall and still be viewed from a short distance.
This advent calendar is beautiful. However, I was disappointed slightly because I thought it would be a little more substantial. It is simply a piece of cardboard, a thin one at that, so it doesn't stand up on its own. But each little picture is so adorable, I almost don't really mind.
I use these for mouthwash cups....you know, small, disposable and inexpensive.  But, they don't stack well.  I keep them under my sink and they fall over easily.
The supplier delivered the product promptly and in good condition.  The price is competitive.  I'm slightly disappointed, however, with the quality of the product itself.  The cups seem to be made of a thicker plastic than what I remember about our previous supply (from another company).  I spend more time separating the cups from their nested positions than before.
These do the job - we were just looking for inexpensive cups for communion.  However, they are very thin and to pull them apart from each other is sometimes hard to do.  They end up breaking in order to pull them apart.  I would say about 5% get thrown out through breakage.  Otherwise - they work fine.
Have bought other brands from other companies these are a little smaller and a lot thinner, not as high quality as I am used to. Wouldn't buy again. Seller and service were good.
They make the best &#34;mini&#34; shot glasses when you have a large group of people. Oh boy, here it goes...we call them &#34;Holy Hell&#34; cups! Fill them with exotic shots, topped with alcohol infused whipped cream and they are the perfect size!
We use Broadman Communion Cups all the time (for years), but in our last order, we have encountered cups with rough, untrimmed edges and even some that leak.It isn't convenient to return a half used box of cups, but it is disappointing to get a bad batch of cups, throwing away those that are defective and cleaning up after they have leaked while sitting in the cup tray.
As a clergy person. I am constantly buying these cups. It is very helpful to be able to buy in bulk. Last batch lasted me 1 year.
good product, no complaints. I recommend it as it was offered at a reasonable price and good quality. Go for it!
We order these several times a month. They fit our needs perfectly and come in a large enough batch at a cheap enough price to be something we order all the time.
Keep up with the good work.  It was a present to a church and they love it and were very grateful for the making communion day better.
Better than others we've used.  They did not stick together causing breakage when pulling apart.
Much easier and more hygienic than handling then washing and drying the glass cups. Much praise from congregation when we stopped passing a common cup and returned to these individual servings.
Delighted with the purchase and service.I would certainly consider buying the communion cups for use in our church again and using this supplier.
The cups are packed tightly and do not separate well. We are breaking 2 out of every 15 trying to separate them.
Product is as advertised.About the packaging: the cups come in plastic sleeves (50 cups in a sleeve) that are sealed at both ends. At least one other brand uses tape that ties off the end of the sleeve; with these, the sleeves are simply sealed so you would just tear open the sleeve. The sleeves are extremely easy to tear open, in fact, a couple times the sleeve opened up as we were picking them up so the cups spilled into the box.
I am here to answer all your communion cup questions.Yes, these fit the standard communion trays you can get anywhere.Yes, these are reusable (but that's gross. Just throw them away, they are cheap)Yes, they are clear.Yes, they look just like what you think they will look like.That's it. No more questions. They are just little plastic cups. Buy them now.
This is what we were looking for and we are very satisfied with the product as it will save us some time in the kitchen not washing the glass cups.
This product is a great value and our church will continue ordering them. It's a real savings to by them in bulk like this.
This product works well for large or small congregations and is priced for either as well. One reminder though: KEEP AWAY from infants and toddlers! Severe choking hazard.
They are pretty thick and they do not break, also, the edges are really smooth, I've seen others that were rough. We threw them away when we saw how good these were...
No more washing communion cups. These are too cheap to wash.I have ordered these communion cups three times, no complaints.
These communion cups from Broadman are a very, very good quality.  The material is very good and quite smooth with no rough spots.
These cups are perfect. They are standard for communion trays. And the availability of the small box was exactly what we needed since we are a small church.  Affordable, and delivered quickly.
One box came in bad shape but only a couple of broken cups.  Minor issues with cups sticking together.  These are heavier wall cups than other suppliers.
Churches...listen up.  I have used this product for 25 years.  Affordable and functional.  Make it easier on your deacon by providing a disposable cup for communion
Great quality on these cups.  No sharp edges and easy to pull apart.  Much more affordable compared to getting the cups from the local Christian book store.
These are very nice, good quality plastic communion cups. They are uniform size/depth, have a very smoothly beveled lip and are a thicker plastic. They do not 'stick together'; they separate very easily, allowing you to fill your communion tray quickly. This factor alone more than compensates for an extra $1 or so per box - you don't have to wiggle and coax the cups apart so it cuts your prep time literally in half.
Easy Clean up.  This is what we needed at our church, much easier clean up and much faster than the glass cups.
They comes in a good size and they are good quality.  It is convinience to use it because they are no reusable and no need to washed.
I have been buying Broadman communion cups for three years and never had a problem. The last two boxes had approximately one third of the cups with cracks at bottom of cup. Poar the juice into cup and it leaks out of the bottom of the cup into communion tray. One cup had a hole in the bottom. I have about two hundred cups that we have to discard from one box alone. We inspected every single cup for cracks. It look like quality control was not present at that time. Will have to try another company.
These cups work fine. They are just typical clear plastic communion cups.
This book is an excellent read and has such beautiful photographs. The inspiration is endless. I purchased this book for techniques to better my skills.
Great book and a new style, which is welcome!Kumihimo Wire Jewelry: Essential Techniques and 20 Jewelry Projects for the Japanese Art of Braiding
I bought this book because I loved the project pictured on the cover and inside the book, but these projects are not included in this book at all. Very misleading! Wish I could return it.
I have been doing kumihimo for years, with fibers, and am also a jewelery maker who uses various media. I have read about and seen Giovanna's work online and always wanted to take one of her workshops. Well, this book, which arrived today although I ordered it last summer, was well worth the wait!!!! She is an incredible artist and this book is a must have reference for anyone wishing to work in kumihimo with wire. Her techniques are clearly illustrated in this book; the projects look fantastic, and this is the first time I have seen kumihimo taken to this artistic of a level. In most circles, this technique is practiced more as a craft; pretty but not out of the box. Giovanna gives solid instruction on the various braiding techniques possible with both the round and the square disk (that in itself is a rare treat!), plenty of good advice on wires and tools to use, and loads of inspiration on how to take this braiding to any level of creativity you desire. Wow! Her examples look completely professional in execution and finishing and she gives clear instructions on how to accomplish that yourself. This is the most exciting book on jewelery making I've seen in ages!!
I am still practicing the techniques with string but I am looking forward to weaving many gorgeous wire items using this book as a guide.
What makes for a good "how to" art book is that it has clear instructions for how complete specific base projects.  What makes a GREAT "how to" art book is that it does all of that, PLUS it introduces skills that help other creative artists form their own relationship with the materials.  This book is a GREAT "how to" art book.  Not only are Gioviana's instructions clear, but she guides you through a learning process that helps you to see how the materials work and enables you to create your own relationship with the process and materials.  If you are advanced in your creative process, but new to kumihimo this is a great starter book.  She works through basic weaves first, THEN introduces the same work in metal...which of course is a different beast.If, however,you are looking to make simple projects that yield beautiful results quickly, you might be disappointed.  This is a book from an artist who seems to be interested in introducing those inclined to beginning their journey with new materials and processes.  She also has clearly defined projects to complete, but the interesting thing is that all of these projects build your skills and relationship to the work so that you may create your own work afterward.  No dead ends here....all great learning.
I like all the step by step projects.  I haven't tried any yet but look forward to.  It is a beautiful book.
I bought this originally to expand my kumihimo weaving options, but after reading the patterns, they proved to be above my skill level.  I ended up giving it as a gift at Christmas to a friend with more skill than I have.
information about braiding.  lots of it.  beautiful illustrations and examples.  will attempt one of these. Good source list. glad i bought it.
I also was very disappointed with this book. I admit I am a beginner but usually can figure things out as I am a good visual learner.  But this book was sorely lacking in directions or good visuals to assist the reader. Book assumes you have a lot of knowledge regarding the art form.
I got this book mainly because I wanted to make the necklace pictured on the cover. Guess what it mentions that the artist made the necklace, but doesn't include instructions on how to make it. It does include lot's of instructions on braiding, I already have those books. I don't need another. This one is going back. If you want to make wire Kunihimo, Don't buy the book because I can tell you in a couple of sentences. Use thin gauge copper wire, then just braid, see no wasted $14 for you!
Would recommend this to everyone wanting to know more on this subject. Easy to under stand. Great pictures, great deriction
I bought this book as a newcomer to Kumihomo as I usually pick up a new craft pretty quickly.  The book is lovely and I think it has pretty nice instructions, but you have to know more than nothing.  I found some other very basic instructions online so I knew the really basic stuff, such as how to make a knot in the beginning, how to take the finished product off a loom etc.After I had done several beginning braids from instructions on the web, I read this again and it made a LOT more sense.  Still not sure I will be able to use this book for a while, but the pictures are lovely and I can't wait until I can make these.  I was going to take off one star because the author says that this book is for beginners and it really isn't, but as long as you go in knowing that, this is a lovely book.
If you are new to Kumihimo braiding this book is a must. The photos are wonderful and inspiring with very clear instructions on how to achieve the various patterns. Many books show pictures of various works but, the instruction were not as user friendly on how to make the patterns happen. I am using cord and beads. The Kumihimo weaving method works well in different mediums. It is just as versatile with cords, yarn, wire or thread manipulation. It is also very portable and requires minimal supplies. It does require a degree of concentration in the beginning. I have looked at several other books on Kumihimo braiding; they lack the thoroughness of this book.
This is a great book, it has many different types of braids, the instructions are quite clear. Just be sure to read through all steps before starting a project.  It is a good resource for venturing out on your own designs.
This book was recommended to me and it was everything and more.  Good information and guidelines. Great ideas.  I highly approve.
This was purchased as a Christmas present, so I didn't get to read it through.  Nice pictures, clear suggestions, some very advanced projects shown in here.
I love this book. It takes Kumihimo to another level. Besides being beautiful, the designs are very creative. I recommend this book to anyone who wishes to do the extraordinary with Kumihimo.
Beautiful designs, but some obscure materials, so I haven't tried to get them yet. Can't wait to try some designs.
Wish directions for the cover necklace were given in book. That is what grabbed my attention when I was looking for a kumihimo book. I know the basics, but wanted more ideas.
Excellent Kumihimo text, even if you don't work with wire.  It has AWG American Wire Gauge conversion charts to measures used in other countries.  Interesting that British 30 gauge is thicker than American.  I have been doing Kumihimo for awhile with fiber, and was interested to learn that all my favorite patterns are technically called 16 bundle Kongah braids in Z spiral.  (You can actually make diamonds and flowers in addition to spirals with this pattern, depending on where you start your threads. Diamond - put 2 thread bundles at each of the 8 compass points. NE and S should be color B as in background, all the rest make color A a large diamond)  This is a book for beginners in this art, and she shows photos of pieces that attain effects well beyond the scope of this book, but I like that it gives you ideas.  Aim high. Many other patterns clearly illustrated.  Excellent Further reading and resource section.  The more I work with this book, the more I like it.  Not only is the table of contents active in e-book, but the index is as well.  More square disk patterns than I've had before.  Some new to me techniques of cord finishing with metal tubing and tinted epoxy will certainly look better than my Tandy leather crimps
It was exactly what I was looking for, a detailed guide on how to make the jewelry.  It included simple to use diagrams and a detailed history of the art.  If you are new to this or you are looking for a variety of patterns this book will serve well
Other reviewers have already written about the terrific projects, tools needed, and materials. I agree with them. The most appealing thing about this book to me was that the author made the disc correlate exactly to the maru dai. The maru dai is more appealing than the disc to me but for take along projects the disc is more convenient.  The author's advice on using the disc made me take another look at the disc and become a happier occasional disc user.  The advice on handling the wire plus the gorgeous projects gives first time wire braiders a jump start on the learning curve.  The projects are also rated beginner to advanced which reduces frustration--you can choose a project with a difficulty level suited to your ability to try.  The instructions for finishing the pieces are also excellent.  A terrific start to finish book for beginners to advanced braiders.
What a beautiful book with lovely photography and clear instructions.  It certainly peaked  the curiosity of my friends and my craft teacher
I purchased this book but I was very disappointed.  First the directions are not clear even the beginner is very hard to understand. Nice picture's but not enough detail.Kumihimo Wire Jewelry: Essential Techniques and 20 Jewelry Projects for the Japanese Art of Braiding
Author, Jeweler is generous with information inside her book.  This and the samples she gives show an exciting and new way to put the work together.  Because I can see what I will get, I am buying this book.  I can add more after I actually work with the book.  Thanks
Yes the book is great, thanks a bunch. I will be working on my project soon can't wait to get started.
The book shows many ways to work with the disks and multiple designs that mightpresent possibilities for future art.
I am a beginner at Kumihimo braiding.  After learning how to braid with beads, I wanted to learn something new.  I have taken two classes on making jewelry using Kumihimo techniques and was totally lost while reading the book.  I love the pictures in the book and what it teaches you to create, but since I don't know some of the terms used in the book the directions are not helpful at all.  This book is great, just not for beginners.  The seller was excellent and shipped the item right away. Great seller and book, just not for beginners.
This is a good book with some great looking projects, but the instructions are fare from being clear.  I read a d re-read and studied the diagrams and still am having problems following along.  They seem to skip details that are very important to making the project a success.  I would suggest that a buyer have a decent degree of proficiency at Kumihimo before purchasing this book.
I am not as thrilled with this book as i am with others that illustrate Kumihimo.  Sorry i got it.
I bought the book for one particular weaving technique.Disappointingly, that particular instruction is not showed in the book.But it is still a good reference book.
I had taken kumihimo clases before. This book gave some really creative ideas for projects. Very artistic photos and easy to read directions.
This is a great book for anyone looking to expand their horizons in the art of Kumihimo. I simply can not wait to make every project in this book.  It has great pictures and direction and is very easy to follow for the novice and the experienced.
I got this book because I took a class on how to do Kumihimo and thought I would try to learn more about it.This book is the best thing for anyone doing Kumihimo. It details everything you need to know about Kumihimo on the round foam disk, square foam disk and the traditional bobbin thing. It details several different patterns showing the placement on the disk and what it would look like plus different finishing techniques using wire, glue, etc. I really enjoyed the many step by step instructions of what you can make and the pictures are amazing! I can't say enough about this book.You can apply these principals with any medium you desire but the metal wire is a nice way to visually see it so you can learn to replicate it. Well worth the $13.Because of the book I was amazed by what the square foam disk created so I went out and bought it immediately!I am planning on adding wire to my Kumihimo because of how amazing this book is.Buy this book!
There is no argument about the inspiring nature of this book.  But the instructions are full of errors.  For example, in the set of three red silk and gold wire bracelets, two of the three braiding instructions are wrong, as is the estimate for how long to cut your materials for the three, which are all braided on one warp.  Furthermore, the finishing instructions are very vague: although an instruction will tell you you need end caps, it neglects to tell you what size.  The publisher has no errata sheet.  The author's website offers corrections, but doesn't respond when contacted.
Kumihimo is the ancient Japanese art of braiding. I have done kumihimo before with various strings, ribbons and yarns and have come up with some great results. This book takes this art form to a whole other level using wire. Doing Kumihimo with wire is a bit trickier of course, but CAN be done. The instructions in the book are very clear and accompanied by tons of illustrations and photos. This book is appropriate for all skill levels. There are simple, basic designs great for the beginner and there are more complicated designs for the advanced braider. There are 20 designs in the book. 14 of them are made using the round disk and 7 of them are made using the square plate. Kumihimo is a great art form and does not require a lot of tools and supplies, making it an ideal "on the road" craft to take with you when you go on vacation. (almost everything you would need would fit nicely in a small box)I bought this book because of the fabulous necklace on the cover. The rest of the projects in the book are beautiful as well, but the one on the cover is still my favorite.
Not exactly what I wanted; however it gave me some alternate ideas, and so I will incorporate that into my beading.
This book has tons of stuff in it, stuff I never would have thought of myself (and that's why I bought it, of course), and it will keep me bust for a long time
This is a great book for me. It may not appeal to everyone or to those who are just learning to do Kumihimo. My interest is mainly learning how to make the wider bands that are in the book.I have some other ideas in mind for the wider bands and some of the smaller ones than just jewelry or the typical cords and things that Kumihimo cords are made for.I would recommend this book for probably someone who is a little more experienced than a beginner. But then everyone has their own level and speed of learning. I still consider myself a beginner, but I just couldn't resist this beautiful book.Overall it is a very nice book and to help understand some of the moves on the Maru-dai or a Kumihimo disk, watch some of the people manipulating the cords on YouTube. That seems to help me understand things better that may not be so clear in a book.  I do google the names of some of the cords that are in my books and then look for a clearer explanation or video to help me see what has to be done to get the look of the cord or project I am working on if I can't quite understand a book explanation or direction.Hope this helps.
Clearly set out,with lovely photos.  All directions are clearly described with accompanying diagrams.  Clearly demonstrates how the craft of Humihimo can be combined with the skills of jewellery making to create wonderful pieces of art.
I loved the book and ideas however its in not a book for the novice Kumihimo Braider. I am pretty sure when I get a hang of it it will be more enjoyable.
Amazon verified purchase.  Interesting book.  Probably won't use any of the patterns for awhile since I am new on doing Kumihimo, but liked the history of the kumihimo braiding and may use some of the suggestions with other materials.
I'm not haPly with this book at all.  Very disappointed.I wish I got from the library.Do not purchase
If you are serious about Kumihimo this book is for you.  Beautifully illustrated and well written this book provides challenges for the beginner and experienced alike.
This is a very good cookbook for the price. The instructions are easy to understand and the illustrations are nice. The book also makes suggestions for serving and gives healthy examples.
Loved it because it was everyday ingredients that most people have in their cupboards already. The food was very good when it was prepared from the recipes.
Although I got a nearly new copy, and in that sense I was pleased, the book overall was very disappointing. Not the sellers fault at all.The book on the cover in Huge Letters says " Slow Cooker". However only a small portion of the book is slow cooker and the rest is miscellaneous recipes. I mean I will probably try them as well but just bought a slow cooker and that is why I bought the book. Also, the few recipes for slow cooker are either non existant ( only 1 for pork chops ) or they are such elaborate recipes that I wouldnt have the prep time or money to cook them. I bought the slow cooker for conveinance for me a single guy and was looking for easy recipes I could cook and last me a few days.This book seems to be geared towards the gourmet chef with a limitless budget and time. If I wanted to precook all my food for an hour, why would I need a crock pot. I guess I will be more selective of the next book I buy or just get the recipes online.
Did not realize the course that I signed up for will provide this material so I don't need this one.
This book was a Christmas present . Arrived in plenty of time and was in great shape. What else can I say.
I purchased a few of the older (2011 and 2012 and a 2009) yearbooks and like another reviewer, found that most of the designs are for fondant. I'm new to cake decorating and haven't had Wilton course 4 yet.  I'd like to make some easier cakes just using the basics.  I also noticed that the back portion of the books have the same information on tips and etc. I would like to think that Wilton could do a better job.  I don't think I'll purchase the 2013 yearbook.  Guess I'll have to look it over at Walmart before I spend the dollars.
I really like the Wilton Method courses. I do have some background in cake design, but this really helped me take it all to the next level. I still need lots of practice with flowers so this is perfect for me. I would have liked a few more tips and a bit more direction, but on the whole it was worth the money.
The pics are nice, however, the techniques are no different from those published in other wilton books.  Its nice for beginners searching for ideas.
My 10 year old daughter got interested in cake decorating. I got her this book along with a beginner set of decorating tips. She has graduated from this book, but not before making everything in it 2 or 3 times. This is a great book for beginner/not sure if this is what I want to do. Would definitely recommend it for a beginner.
I'm new to cake decorating and I love this book it gives good pictures and step by step instructions for all their cakes I've done 3 of them and the one on the front is my most requested.... I recomend it to anyone who has an interest in cake decorating
It was a good book, but not as informational as I had hoped it would be. It will be usefully as I move on to learn flowers for decorating.
Love the book, for a beginning decorator like me it is perfect and has step by step instructions. Wilton always delivers GREAT quality!!!
This book was very informative, within an hour we were decorating like pros :)  I would definitely recommend this to others
This is an ok book for a new cake decorator. It recovers a lot of the stuff already covered in the instruction booklets (beginning cake decorating and flowers and borders) and gives some full cake ideas.I like the instructions and have been using them as a supplement to the instruction books to have ideas of decorations to practice. However, the cakes themselves are nothing super exciting.This is the sort of book you buy when you're starting out and use until you have the skills down pretty well - then you would probably never use it again. I just can't see myself pulling this book out for "cake decorating ideas" when there are so many better idea books out there.Honestly, if you weren't getting this on a 4-for-3 promotion or it was on sale for about 10 bucks I wouldn't bother with it.
For a novice cake decorator who got talked into making her son's wedding cake, Wilton makes lovely cake decorating accessories to help with every step.  This book gave me so many great ideas and wonderful recipes as well!  This cake had a 16&#34; square base, 10&#34; sq middle layer and 6&#34; top layer all set 90 degrees.  For a first wedding cake, it was amazing with Wilton's help!  This book is a must have for newbies like me.
A good basic book to see what the course will cover. We need to get the course kit and tools.
The reason I gave 5 stars this decorating course is excellent. it shows u step by step and you can refer to it anytime. eExcellent
We gave the book as a gift.  The recipeint of the book really loved it and thought it was well written.  It was a used book but looked almost new.
Let me start by saying this is an excellent book.  It has many detailed images and a ton of great steps.  That being said, it is a bit pricey at $15.  There are other &#34;how-tos&#34; that sell for about $3 and many of these things are online for free.  I think $9.99 may have been a more appropriate price.
This was my first time at cake decorating and I was determined that this summer would be the summer for this project.  I searched for several books, but in the end the cheapest book I bought (this one) was the one that I turned to when I wasn't sure about the process.  It also gave me the confidence to get creative.
This was not what I expected. It is a short, basic book. I would say you are better of just going online to see the techniques. However, it is probably very helpful and extensive if you go to the class.
I was amazed and inspired by the various designs, and have already made a few flowers based on the ideas provided.I would recommend the book to beginners who want some ideas and inspiration without being intimidated by complicated instructions. This is a great purchase.
This is my favorite recipe book for sweet treats ever! Absolutely love it!  It is well worth the dollars I spent on it.
helps first timers learn how to make decorations for cakes step by step. Would recommend this book for new comers!
Its wonderful. I own all the others cake manuals from this group, and they are really simple but concise. I've learned a lot with those. A great purchase.
The book is filled with great pictures and ideas.  The information is presented in an easy to follow format.  It has lots of fun cakes I want to try.
this book us a must for beginners or experts. gives great ideas and perfect how to instructions. The books are a great addition to any cake lovers library.
I can see now that I would need a lot more items to work with to utilize this book=  Wish I had known that.I will put it up for now and wait until I know what I am doing in just icing and decorating with icing.
This book helped quite a bit in my cake decorating class- to the point where I probably could have learned all I needed from the book and skipped paying the $500 for the class. I even got a job as a cake decorator, so this book has definitely improved my skill to the point where I can make money off of what was once a hobby.This book is good to show you basic skills- there are flowers, basic borders, and basic fondant instructions. It's good for starting out, and getting a feel for cake decorating before trying more advanced cakes such as tiered or completely fondant cakes.Note: You'll need THICK frosting for the flowers in this book. Follow the Wilton recipe, and you should be fine.There are also some very good ideas for cakes in this book. Not only the cake on the front cover, I showed an idea to a woman getting married from inside the book and she wanted it for her wedding (yes, that good.)I would highly recommend getting this book if you want a good overall idea of how to start decorating cakes. But remember- always make sure your cakes are level, and ALWAYS get a good smoother comb. The book may say to use a spatula, but... it's so much easier to use a smoother.
I just recently started a passion for baking, I've read so many books, this book in particular is a must for novice bakers! It will answer all questions you may have about baking. I LOVE this book!
Good reference "pamphlet" but a little short on number of pages and ideas. More like a pamphlet than a reference book. Not so sure it was worth $10 but that is Wilson for you! Paying mostly for the name and not for the value of information.
Having taken Wilton's candy course years ago, I wanted a refesher course.  That's about all this is good for.  Someone just getting started for the first time may find it a bit daunting.  I wish that Wilton would re-offer their home study courses.  They were helpful, instructive and well worth the price.
I thought this was ordering something else.  I need to read the descriptions of the things I order better next time.
I bought this book for my husband who has just entered the world of fondant cake making.  He was having trouble forming three dimentional pieces.  So this book really helped him understand what his problems were and how to make things work.
I'm hoping that I can learn how to make gum paste flowers to perfection for my daughters wedding, and maybe a few other cakes.
A few years ago I read "Omelette Originals" by Irena Chalmers in which, after ten detailed pages describing how to make an omelette, she advises "be a big spender, go out and invest in dozen eggs -- by the time you have made six omelettes you will be an expert."  With this book, I expect to spend more time practicing, but I feel most of the brownie treats in this book are attainable with some work.  Unless you already have experience with cake decorating, many of the treats will be more suited to be after-school snacks than desserts for an adult party.  A big plus is that a decent range of decorating techniques are described to a greater or lesser extent.A caveat for the buyer of this book (like every book on cake or cookie decorating I've seen) is that without additional pans, ingredients, and/or tools, you're stuck.  I purchased threeWilton Round Brownie Pop Molds, and a bag ofWilton Dark Candy Cocoa Meltsin order to make the "Fun-filled Pops." (pg 49)  The directions underestimated the number of brownies produced, and overestimated the amount of chocolate to melt for the frosting.  I particularly would have liked a hint on how to get  no-stick baking spray into the mold without making a mess. Still, see my customer image for my first try.Overall, a good source of ideas for decorative brownie treats, but some frosting experience, particularly using different decorating tips,will be required to make the results look "pretty."
Found for a teenager who is interested in cake decorating.  A little more basic than what was expected but a good source for how tos.
I did not expect such a small book. Very helpful, but not what I thought I would get for the money.
This book shows you how to create beautiful flowers in both fondant/gum paste and royal icing.  If you have the course book from the "old" Course 2, you probably could figure out how to make the flowers in gum paste/fondant on your own and don't need this book.  I bought it to see the difference in the two and I'm sure I'll use it...but creative minds can usually figure things out on our own.
given as a Christmas gift and was big success. So many fun projects, glad I ordered the feet with the book.
GREAT FOR BEGINING!! has all the things you need there are very few things i dont use from this kit !! would recommend!
I received the item a few days after ordering. The item was just as described and the contents were just what I was looking for!
Like the title says... it was a lot smaller than I thought but the its weird cause it doesn't look exactly like the product info states... not sure if it was an out dated version or not but my mother loves it (aside from the crayon drawing.) Yet I'll still trust this seller.
The book was given as a gift so I didn't read it. Looking through it though, it seems to be good reference material for learning about cake decorating, which is what it was purchased for.
Lots of technique.  I have one.  This one was for my daughter who is starting her own business. Recommended for those with experience and beginners
I had gotten all the other Wilton books so I cld teach myself how to these decoration ideas and lets just say that these books helped me so much.
Best to use it with an instructor and a groupLoved this class and moved on to the second course
Great idea book, you will need to purchase the pattern book if you want to accomplish projects in book. But the book does give instructions on what tools and icing to use for each project.
&#12575;(&#8807;&#9671;&#8806;)&#12559; is very helpful. Love how easy it is how the instructions are easily readable. The flowers and everything in this book is beautiful and great. I would love to buy the next book.  This is perfect for.both  newbies and pros. It also fun. The pictures and instructions are clear makes it great and fun to follow every step.  (*&#65078;*)
I learned a few tricks from this book. I am new to baking nice looking stuff. This helped me become a better decorator and got courses 2,3 and 4 as well. I wouldn't have picked anything else. Wilton hasn't disappointed me yet.
I was in shock when I got this book!! I paid $10 for this puney little booklet.  It's work about $3....THEN today I notice that they are charging $3.99...more like it.  I would have NEVER ordered this book if I knew that it was a stupid little booklet.  What a rip off!  Very disappointed!
i loved it. don't use it much but when i had it's been useful. I recommend it to all who wants to learn how to decorate cakes
Great idea book! Very helpful for cake decorating! Lots of ideas for every occasion. Step-by-step instructions are easy to follow!
I have always wanted to learn how to decorate a beautiful cake, and I purchased this guidebook along with The Wilton Pastry bag kit.  I appreciate how this guide gives tips on how to bake the perfect cake, and also gives detailed step-by-step instructions on how to use the pastry bag to make many different designs. I do, however, agree that this book did appear to be an advertisment for thier products, but the guide was helpful nonetheless.
Nice book with some good  wedding ideas! NIce color photos of each cake listed. Not quite as many as I thought there would be but they do list what you need for each one and it has the wilton techniques as all their books do. Also has wedding cake supply order numbers. Overall a nice book.
well dis is gud enof for wat i want it n spected, it is wat really dey show u on d pictures, it is really gud
I bought this book to help me out with decorating cakes and cupcakes as a beginner. I have found this book to be an excellent reference for the first time decorator. I ended up buying two different tips that did not come with my cake decorating set, that I have found very useful. I bought the cake curved spatulas, from Amazon,that work very well. I also bought the bench knife, and found a 16" cake lifter, and a 18" cake leveler. I got all these great ideas from this book. I bought other things in the book from Amazon, however, the list goes on too long to keep mentioning everything. Buy the book, great starter outer! Oh yes, I always take a look at all of the good and not so good reviews for every product I purchase from Amazon.comSincerely,Super Chef David
Cute ideas my daughter is into baking and decorating This was a great book for ideas. Thought it had more ideas then it did but still had cute ideas
Any person that wishes to learn the art of making beautiful, real appearing, fondant/gum past flowers - this is the book for you!! I promise your flowers will look SO real that it will surprise people. Each and every little hint that helps you to make your flowers appear real is in this book! You cannot go wrong with this book. You will find yourself reading it over and over, makign flowers over and over. You will see that your self-esteem will roar! People, co-workers, family members, friends will be dazzled and amazed -- and so will YOU.  This lesson book is extremely valuable. It cannot be purchased from Wilton (which is a real crying shame). I think Wilton is afraid that if they sell the book, they will miss out of selling classes, but not so.  I, myself, took 4 classes. Having bakes/cooked since the age of 9, I really didn't feel it was necessary but boy was I surprised. I learned more in my first class than I had in years of teaching. Wilton honestly needs to sell these lesson plans.  Not only will receive money from the classes, but they will also make money from the books.  Why would a company prefer their customers buy their books from someone else??? I've not figured that out.  Getting back to this lesson book...you will be extremely, extremely happy.  Your family will brag on you.  Your income will increase for making beautiful live-appearing flowers that you sell on your cakes. Please try it...you cannot fail!!! Best book ever on making and decorating flowers!!
A great book for delicious ideas. But, some ideas do not have recipes... Don't worry, my family have a big smile.
i like this book i can brush up on my cake art.this is great for me at home and personal
Note, this is a small booklet..not a book. It's maybe 6 inches tall by 4 inches wide and about 15 pages. The pages are in color.It's not bad but I would not pay more than $3 for it.
i learned how to make butter cream roses out of this book, very nice step by step instructions, easy to follow.
Just what I wanted. I have been baking for a little for family, friends, kids school events, etc. Just decided to take my decorating skills to the next level. Simple and easy instructions
Ok so I got this book for my dads gf as a late Christmas present, she loves to bake and decorate cakes! The shipping was quick and I got this in REALLY GOOD SHAPE! She loved it and it just made me happy to know she loved it :)
I bought this because I haven't found time to take the class and found it's pretty easy to follow along and teach yourself everything in the book. There is step by step instructions for different designs and ideas and lots of hints and tricks for working with fondant and gumpaste.
I bought this book thinking it was a cake decorating book WITH recipes of cakes and icings.  Unfortunately it didn't have any recipes at all, and just methods.  Wish I had known that.
This book is the outdated version. Do not buy it for your class. Otherwise you will have to buy another and spend more money!
this was exactly what i needed for my class, and at a fraction of the cost of local craft stores!
This book was recommended by my cake decorating instructor. If you want to get started on cake decorating this is the book for you!
My youngest daughter requested this as a gift.  She was very happy with it and I may buy another one for my middle daughter.
Love this book. Wilton gives the how to on using many different decorating tips. Beautiful color illustrations.
I have never been a good cake decorator. It has always been just out of reach. This book made me say &#34;duh&#34; in my head so many times it's embarrassing. It really breaks it down and simplifies some of the basic techniques for noobies (like myself).
i wanted this dvd for cake decorating  it is nothing i dislike  i would recomed this dvd to anybody for cake decorating
great companion to the course, and great help for home studies. I would get it if you are starting to cake decorating.
THIS WAS EYE CATCHING AND WHEN I ORDERED IT I KNEW I HAD TO HAVE IT. IT IS QUITE HELPFUL
This is a great book full of lots of wonderful ideas and plenty of detailed explanations of how to execute them!
I was surprised at how little information this video provided. The cake decorator in the video wasn't really that great. She was very sloppy and went way too fast. :( Disappointed in wilton.
I liked this book for the price. I'd recommend it to whoever is interested in making cakes. Instructions are good.
I love Wilton books they are always so attractive and enjoyable to browse through. I do believe over the years they have reduced the contents so you don't get to see as many examples of lovely cakes as the first books I bought back in the 70's. Still I have learned so much about cake decorating from them.
Well...this is book 1 and it is basic, which is good for someone just starting out. I hope to buy the others.
this item was purchased as a gift. the person that recieved it from me love it! it was put to great use!
I have to say that I was expecting something more from this book . . . . more like a "how to" than a "see what you can do".  It is still a helpful reference for aspiring cake decorators, but I'm still lost as to how to make the beautiful designs with the specific tips.
Exactly the same book you would get if you went and paid for the class. I just saved money by buying this book, cause now I dont have to pay for the class for the book. So glad I found this
I was a little disappointed in this book when I first got it. Since all you see on the cover is some "clown" cupcakes using the silly-feet baking cups (which I also purchased) I was expecting more uses of the silly-feet (I counted five), but it really covers whimsical cupcakes of all sorts, many of which would be suitable to make with children (easy to make).It's really just an idea book and a catalog of Wilton products and what you can do with them. There is a helpful section called "The Perfect Cupcakes; How to bake, ice and decorate", and there are about six pages of recipes. Most cupcake instructions are from 1/8 to 1/2 page long, right next to a big, clear picture.After getting over the "it wasn't what I expected" part of receiving this book, and seeing that my boyfriend seems rather enthusiastic about making really whimsical cupcakes and loves the silly-feet, I like this book more and more. Just don't expect anything sophisticated looking in it OR that many silly-feet ideas. If you are familiar with the typical adverbook that Wilton puts out, you shouldn't find any surprises here, and some of the recipes, which are a blend of from-a-mix and from-scratch, for the most part look very tempting.There are six pages of really cute Halloween cupcakes, including a vampire in a coffin, and some skeletons/ghosts/tombstones.
This DVD is exactly what I was looking for.Something that could teach me the basics of Cake Decorating.With my work schedule I am unable to take the Wiltons class at this time.I really wanted to learn some basic Cake Decorating.I have been baking a long time but I had no decorating skills,I wanted to have a nice finished product.So I researched Cake Decorating DVD's and choose the Wilton's,and now I'm on my way.I've made some very pretty Cakes that have suprised me.This DVD really deliver's it's easy to follow and I've learned alot.I highly recomend this DVD to anyone that wants to learn to Decorate Cakes.
This is for me a must have because I love cake decorating. This magazine has very easy ideas for every single occasion.
this was really helpful for me, because I love to bake and want to start decorating cupcakes; good for beginners
Was exactly as stated. Very pleased with my purchase. Will order the rest of  the set. Great product. Very useful.
This  book is good for some one that has taken the Wilton class it has some useful  Tips  not really what I wanted yet it's not bad it can be useful
Compre la colecci&oacute;n de estos "libros", y todos est&aacute;n geniales, si se lee con detenimiento se encuantran muchos buenos tips...
This is a good video if you have never decorated a cake.  It is very,very basic. If you are familiar at all with cake decorating this video is not going to be very much help for you. The lady on the video is not very good at decorating, but she can still show you the basics. It is very short.
Everything is step-by-step and very easy.  The first cake I did went very well.  I would totally recommend this to someone just starting out into semi-complicated cakes!!
the first copy was damaged and the second was wrinkled. dont buy. it was not new like he said it was and blamed it on mail man.
Excellent Book and great for self starters. Easy to follow instructions with or without and instructor.  Used to learn flowers with my son who is 13 years old.  Great Family Fun and really good cakes to boot.
I got this for my daughter in law. She loves it. Is shows how to use all the tools in the kit.
This product is of great quality. The product was very easy to use and it will have you making some beautiful decorations of flowers and other decorations. I highly recommend this seller for their speedy and excellent product.
My husband and I love this cupcake book so much that we have bought it numerous time to give to our grown up children so that they can have the fun of making spectacularly whimsical cupcakes for their friends and children. The recipes for muffins and cakes are great. Every year wilton updates the creative aspects of a cake form and this one is just spectacular. The designs are doable by those with almost no coordination or cake decorating experience. The key is always to make your own frosting so it is thick enought to hold shapes, or add a LOT of powdered sugar to commercial frostings to thicken them. Anyway, there are literally 150 full color cupcakes. There are your hilarious farm animals, awesome swimmers for whom the cupcakes are inflatable innertubes, wedding cupcakes, floral, clowns, fruits, bunnies, seasonal and more. You will need to get some tips you may not normally have, but the ones you need are in the directions. I highly recommend the 24 cupcake stand Wilton makes for displaying your cupcakes. I use a 3 tiered dessert rack that is also a carousel that spins because I already have it for cakes. But there are some beautiful cupcakes that look awesome displayed on the top of any stemed goblet that has been turned upside down so the base become a litte table for the cupcake. The angel, penguin, and Christmas themes are just adorable, but there are sophisticate cupcakes too. If you buy the silicon cupcake holders you will be thrilled. Thoughful almost effortless fun for a loved ones special occassion.
I loved the book, very complete, detailed, clear instructions and easy to learn procedures. It is a comprehensive guide, useful for success in the art of pastry
i thought it was all the supplies for course two,but its just the book.You could get this book for free if you sign up for classes at your local michaels.
Easy to understand, great tips.  Learned alot and looking forward to creating the wonderful creations they show on the book.
The Book is very easy to read and follow it breaks down working with fondant and Gum Paste very Simple
THis book has been real helpful to my daughter.  She is just starting out and has made some really good flowers with this book.  A must if your into deco-ing.
I received the lesson today. Its just the book but still is ilistrated very well. It will be very helpful.
I had this book and lost it. So glad I found it on amazon, it was in great condition. I love baking and decorating cupcakes and this book is great. Fun ideas and pictures for almost each recipe.
You cannot read carefully enough to see, because it is not there, that this is not the book that you will get and when you call, you are sent to someone who barely speaks english, but doesn't understand it very well. So if you want this book, it is available at other places cheaper and you will get what you ordered. STOP supporting companies that don't care if you have a problem after they get your money. Since the bulk of their business is in the U.S., you would think that maybe they would hire some english speaking help, but you see, they really don't care.
It is a great way to learn baking in an easy ang interesting way... love it and will recommend it to friends.
I chose this rating because it has everything that I need. I would have no hesitation in recommending  any of these products to family or friends.
I didn't know that it was the first book of a whole course, but is really cool and helpful. :)
I got this book for my daughter as the local craft store wouldn't let her take this class unless she took the other two first which she doesn't need. The book is full of color pictures so very well illustrated and the directions are clear and easy to follow. I also bought the class kit to go with it and it works great. would recommend for people wanting to learn how to do this on their own at home without a class.
As a beginner, this book has given me a lot of ideas. The step by step guide is very helpful. After doing a cake decorating course my tutor had this book, and i knew that i had to get one of these.
This is an absolutly wonderful book.  It's very informative and is good for people who are just starting out because it goes into a lot of detail about how to do some basic designs.  I thought the cakes in the book were also very nice,  there were very few that I did not like.  There are step by step instructions on how to do all the cakes pictured in the book.
Good book , explain every step for make flowersbut I like more the number one of this books , come on time
Cake decorating has always been a hoby for me.  This book is excellent for us self taught decorators.  The pictures and how-to steps are great
recieved on time and in the description I ordered. I am pleased with my order
This book is packed with so many ideas and they include instructions. It also shows you everything Wilton carries as far as supplies go. The seller was prompted too!
Good for all beginning cake decorators and some new tricks for experienced cake decorators, my daughter loves it and uses it frequently.
I've always loved cake decorating, ever since I took my first Wilton class.  Gum Paste and Fondant seemed beyond my capabilities but when I saw this book I decided to give it a try.  The book is very easy to follow with lots of step by step pictures.  It's a lot of fun but, I admit, a bit frustrating.  No matter how closely I follow the steps, my creations never turn out exactly like the pictures.  I think part of the problem is that I'm a perfectionist at heart but....grrrr.....I can't fault the book, as all Wilton Lesson Plans, it's great.
I really do love this book. It is an excellent source for some beautiful cake designs and has very clear instructions and photos. It is one of the best "summaries" of basic cake decorating that I have found. In fact, I lost this book and had to order it again!
I love love love this book!! Not only does it give you ideas on how to decorate and what colors go good together ...it also shows how to make the decorations.
This book made me buku points with my daughter in law. She makes the best cakes, should start her own business
This short-but-sweet (ha) book gives all the basic information you need to get started with cake decorating.  It shows how to make a number of shapes with the icing, an icing recipe, and has lots of helpful illustrations.  Between this book and how-to videos found online, you could probably get enough information to be able to make pretty cakes without having to attend lessons.
Really pleased I bought the set of these. They are easy to follow and have great decorating ideas. Must buy the 4th one.
Wonderful to have a reference book handy with step-by-step instructions -- I used when I was covering my first cake in fondant and it was so easy!
I bought this and the 2012 a the same time, only to realise half the book has the same info. It's more a catalog than a book of ideas. It does have some picture but it is basically the same as the 2012 year. It has a couple of recipes, but the are the same on both the yearbooks.I bought it because I wanted to learn how to make things with a step-by-step guide. It is not that.
I bought all 3 wilton lesson plan books , i feel that there should be more pictures to follow as i am self teaching myself i feel that the book do not provide enough material for me i had to look at youtube videos to really know the exact steps of icing a flower. There is simply too much advertisement for wilton but well its their book :) so it should be done that way. I was only hoping that they would provide  a recipe for a cake but it wasn't provide .
I am sorry, I know there are people out there who probably LOVE Wilton and all it does but personally I find their work cheap and unprofessional looking.  I sold these books quickly as I was embarrassed to own them.  The work looks cheap and shoddy, fine if you're a stay at home mum looking to jazz up little Timmy's second birthday cake, not fine if like me you want to be a professional and you want your work to pop.I gave this book two stars because 1 means I hate it and I don't I just don't like the Wilton method at ALL.I bought all three books and feel the same about them so I have copied and pasted this review on all of them.
This is more of a packing review than a review of product.  The book does what it's intended to do. However it came all folded up the packing was real bad the book is folded vertically and horizontally!!!! I bought it because the store I go to was out of it. It came in 24 hours so I was grateful for that. Again the packing was BAD!
makes decorating so much easier!  No more guessing and get exact same size pieces. Well worth the money for the ease in use.
I had questions regarding fondant decorating and this book answered them and had additional ideas for making pretty cakes. Nice price too.
This book has some great decorating ideas and how tos.  I got it for my daughter for Christmas and she loves it.
the book mostly talks about making royal icing and regular icing, and not so much about creating gumpaste or fondant flowers. However, there are a couple pictures at the back that show you how to decorate a cake
I am a beginner cake person so I felt this book was way over my head to use, plus it was ordered in error.
It arrived quickly and in great shape. I got it just in time for a cake that I was doing, that is the cover picture. It turned out great.
Even this is the 2nd course, it is easy to follow. I love the results. I don't sell cakes but make them for friends and family. This is only a hobby so I don't make cakes everyday. I can pick this book up and follow the directions and get great results.
This is a small simple book but tons of basic information on baking. I really loved the graphs regarding the piping tips - I have so many of them but never knew what exactly do they do. So that was really nice to figure out everything on the chart with the pipe tip number!
This booklet wasn't expensive. I purchased it as an add on item but it's just not worth the money. It's extremely thin......thinner than a magazine! I would not recommend this booklet as it doesn't contain much as far as decorating, nothing you couldn't find elsewhere.
I have only had time to thumb through it, but liked what I saw. Purchased through Amazaon and book was as described and shipped very expeditiously .
I needed this for my third Wilton's class, and it was cheaper on Amazon.com than in the store. It's part of the curriculum, so it's required. Whether it is good for skill development or not, I take my classes very seriously, and get alot out of them. I also believe in checking prices everywhere for the class supplies. Amazon was cheapest, and I received it in 2 days, free shipping, Amazon prime.
My daughters 14th birthday was comming up and with the trend she was wanting cake decorating supplies. This is a great book for them to help them learn and work with. The bad part is, is that I also purchased the 50 peice Wilton Cake Set for her as well and well it also came with the book. So I did end up with an extra book, but at the price it wasI was not to concerned
IT looks just as described, I have not installed yet. I will add another star if it works Thank you
I am very happy I purchased this book as it containes so much great information and time saving tips. I highly recommend.
It was a gift I gave for a friend and she loved it, it has very useful things inside, I recommend it to everyone
Quick shipping and the book is good for beginners. Haven't used it much as my kids don't like fondant. Found that out after the purchase lol
This book shows you how to decorate different items. It explains the in's and outs of doing it.  Covers how to do different items.
Its always nice to be able to actually see how something is to be done, instead of just the written word. I am very pleased with my purchase!
This book is okay, but I was expecting a much larger book than this. This book is the size of my hand and hard to see the small writing when you're trying to prepare and read it at the same time.
This DVD is very short, i really thought it will have more techniques using alot more decorating tips.But what disappointed me the most was that 2 chapters of this DVD did NOT work!! it got stuck, i played it on another DVD player and the same thing happened...  (u.u)
Beautiful ideals!  I want to make everything item in the book, but someone has to eat it! Your will love it!
I just wanted the new lesson plans for the updated techniques. Great information on how to make icing flowers from buttercream and  royal icing. Has the recipes for both!
It is really helpful in learning to decorate cakes.  It came in very good condiction. I would certainly buy again.
It's just a good book with nice ideas for cake decorating. My spouse loves to bake and I got her this book.
I purchased this as a gift and was pleased with the contents. Very easy instructions to follow to create cute goodies!
This book has good reference & pictures to help with the instructions.  It offers icing tip sizes/numbers & shows what piping design they create.  The book has several recipes to try & gives many cake designs.  It is a great reference book for new to experienced cake decorators/bakers.
You can learn just by reading the book. Teacher not really necessary, except to watch you and guide you. She gives you a few good tips and tricks. These books are going to be outdated in June. Wilton is updating their courses to the match the new trends.
I have owned more and more about cake,cupcakes book and also added the cake decorating books.And I also have gone to the Wilton classes.It might leave out some details but just think this book cost only $4.99 at craft store but give you more than the price.This book will teach you 6 flowers.Talking about the details,I think it depends on your experiences and skills too.
I really like this product--I have taken the first three Wilton Methods Courses and the instructor had this book and recommended it. I got it.  It is a great book to use as a reference and build upon your existing skill set.  It gives you clear, detailed and easy to follow instructions.
Wilton Decorating Basics was a fun purchase.  I've taken the wilton classes and wanted to update myself with learning some new ways of creating different types of flowers and shapes with fondant since I got more into fondatn.
This was included in a Wilton decorating kit I bought from Michaels priced at around $32.00. I was dissapointed that the book was so small. I am suspicious about the 5 star reviews...I bought the 53 piece Cake Decorating set which included this "book". First of all the book is 40 pages. I will give it credit that it DOES have decent instruction on trimming and icing a layer cake, as well as good instruction on using piping bags. Where it starts to fizzle is in the actual using of the tips and creating designs, flowers etc. ALSO it comes with disposable bags, and touts in the booklet that all students beginner to advanced use these disposable bags, but in the instructions it shows someone using a real professional bag. I note this because their technique for filling the bag with icing is MUCH MUCH more difficult in using the disposable bags (in fact, I have vowed to buy only real professional bags from now on)! There are literally 7 1/2 (TINY) pages of decorating instruction. Weak. very weak. There is a recipe for royal icing... but I wouldn't recommend you use it.I did... and it was not good. Anyway... the book is.. not a total waste of money, but I personally wouldn't be happy paying more than $4.00 total cost with shipping for it.
This product was informative, instructive, and arrived without any problems. I was, and I am, completely satisfied with this purchase. Thank you.
Celebrate with Fondant is a little missleading , it's just basic cover cake with fondant , cut strips and shapes and put cut fondant on cakes , repete in diffrent patters and ways , I would have liked to see maybe 2 or 3 pages of thows basics , but the rest i would have love to see how to mold shapes , they did show how to make little "pebbles" and a bird but thats about it , I really expected for 11.00 less then something I Figure out on my own , to cover a cake and cut out pretty colors and attach in pretty ways. I expected some more fancy things ... but I got it half price so i'm not complaining , just a warrning that if you know how to put shapes on your fondant covered cake , then you might want to serch for a more complex book ... The lession book for the Wiliton fondant and gumpaste seemed to have more intresting things , flowers , bows , swags , ect , i'm sure i'll still enjoy it .
The product is exactly what it says in the description, great cake and cupcake decorating guide..My girlfriend is a cooking fanatic so this really blows her mind
Every year each magazine fulfill my expectations. Wilton is the best. I recommend that you buy this edition every year!!
I bought this as additional information to the cake decorating class I am taking but I have found the information to be very limited and sometimes different from what I am told in class.  I am still viewing all the sections but I viewed the decorating ones first.  I would recommend it for &#34;extra&#34; information but certainly not enough that you could watch this video and then decorate a cake.  Information is very basic as the title says.
It took me about 40 minutes to read this lesson plan thoroughly; while it is inexpensive at under five dollars, I still don't know if that is necessarily a good value. As some reviewers have pointed out, much of the book focuses on advertising Wilton products; without all of this the useful material in the book could have been condensed down to a couple of pages. I did like the photographs and the techniques for making different consistencies of buttercream for different uses. I had initially planned on getting the subsequent lesson plans as well, but I don't think it will be worth it. If you have any skill/experience with cake decorating at all, I'd recommend skipping this book.
Absolutely loved this step by step instructions and tips for decorating. I feared the rose, scalloped edging, leafs etc when icing my cakes, cup cakes and cookies. Very detailed for the beginner to feel empowered. Woo hoo! Look out now, no more store birthday/holiday iced caked for me!
It is a basic book for beginners and it is easy to understand.  It has a lot of ideas and I recommend it.
Good book to lear some basic things of the paste and fondant if you are trying to lean new cakes decorations this Cain of book is good because is very easy to understand
I love Wilton!  I bought all three lesson plan books and they are great. I haven't started using fondant yet but can't wait to start.  You will need a few cake decorating tools such as cutters/embosser etc.  You will find step-by-step pictures and easy to follow instructions.
This is great for people wanting to learn the right way. I love it and got it for a friend.
helpful information on decoraing basics. Good book for beginners who need step by step instructions and guidance. Good for all age groups.
This product was a waste of time.  I bought it for 3.99, which I thought was a good deal.  Little did I realize it was just too good to be true...  This is a small pamphlet-like booklet that is the equivalent of something you would get free with a cake decorating kit or something.  I bought this as a gift for my sister who just started to decorate cakes, and am so embarrassed... I don't even know if I can give it to her...
Easy to use, step by step instructions for the beginner like myself. I was going to pay a lot of money for a class but this worked fine instead - perfect for the do-it-yourself kinda person.
This book deals only with tiered designs but it updates the classic looks. Tiers range from pearl coloured balls to ribbons and other artwork. Also in typical Wilton styling, it shows how to do the various designs and recommends all the equipment needed for each project. Probably not a beginners book though.
I purchased the Wilton Course 1 guide a few weeks before I took my class, I found the book very easy to follow and easy to understand.  The only regret i had was my copy was different than the one handed out in class; the page numbers were different and it slowed me down a bit.
I purchased this lesson plan because I'm making my own wedding cake... I wanted to review somethings before I spent $150 on supplies. After reading through the step my step instructions, I feel comfortable purchasing my tools and getting started. I recommend this product to anyone who is interested in learning something new. Cake decorating is another great medium for people like me who can't get enough of arts & crafts.
I found the Lesson plan easy to use and well layed out.  I liked how it told you at the beginning of each section what you would need to complete the lesson.
I absolutely love this book. It goes way beyond what the Wilton instructors offer in the classes. The techniques are easy to follow and the images are beautiful. A great addition to my cake decorating library.
If you want to get into cake decorating, you must buy at least one Wilton book. It teaches you how to do some really neat things with the tips. I have to say, however, that the yearbook is not what is seems. About half of the yearbook is filled with ads for tips and bags and other Wilton products.
This book isn't much help if you are not taking the wilton cake decorating classes. you can get the basics but its really just a visual for the class!
This is a great book filled with ideas for cake decorating.  Covers all ages and easy to read. Must have.
Finally a wilton book that isnt just redone old ideas and lame projects! nice step up wilton! more than worth its price.
On the whole, I like this book very much. I have to say, however, that some of the instructions in it were contradicted by our instructor and she said she was instructed by Wilton to do so. I certainly felt that her way was better and, since it involves such basic instructions, I wanted to share it with you.For all the projects in this book other than covering the cake base and the cake itself--that is to say all the flowers, the bow, the leaves, and the borders along the bottom--wherever it says to use just gum paste, you should use a 1/2 gum paste and 1/2 fondant mix. Sure enough, it made it easier to do everything, there was less hardening and bumps, and everything looked prettier. (I had previously worked with gum paste on my own and wish I'd known this).Another thing that I noticed is that, in some cases, (especially the bow) the final product would have looked MUCH nicer if we'd made them thinner rather than as instructed in the booklet. It may be that, since this is an introductory course to forming decorations by sculpting rather than by piping, maybe they thought that thinner would have been harder to work with.But, all in all, it's a very nice reference (as well as an effective advertisement for countless Wilton products!)
I have almost every Wilton Yearbook since 1977. I still use them and review the back issues frequently for ideas. I do do not like the newer issues as much because I do not care for fondant, so I love the older books.
didn't really care many of the cakes at all. not up to normal standing for wilton yearbooks of the past. the best cake is on the cover.
Perfect for novices. Pictures are amazing. Very well done. Just bought the tools to start decorating my cupcakes. Condensed book on decorating everything from cakes to cupcakes.
Since I dont know much about decorating cakes this book was perfect for me because it is very detailed with showing multiple steps on how to make each design such as a group of flowers or a very detailed bear.
This lesson plan is a great companion to the Wilton decorating classes. I personally took the other 2 levels of classes in the series, but couldn't fit this one into my schedule, so I bought this lesson plan and theWilton Flowers and Cake Design Student Kitthinking I could learn on my own. I would consider myself an intermediate level decorator, and very good at self-study on many topics. But there were still some things in this book that it would be helpful to watch someone else do instead of teaching yourself - fortunately there are plenty of videos on the internet that helped me get through this. Overall, this is a great guide to decorating, but be prepared to do a little more searching on your own if you want to learn to perfect everything.
Very helpful book that shows a lot of the basic cake decorating tips.  My 11 year old daughter was making flowers in no time.
I purchased this for my niece's birthday and she was thrilled. I looked through it before I gave it to her - I didn't try any of the techniques to see how good the instructions were.  This book gives instructions on quite a few flowers to create (most of them are popular flowers you would find on a cake).  Truthfully, after looking at them, I wanted to try myself! Great supplement to the "basic" cake design book I bought her.
This is so remedial.  Buy a Wilton magazine for less money and get more ideas and instructions for your investment.
I bought this for my daughter, she has really enjoyed the dvd She is just starting out and enjoying it alot
As someone who has taken the Wilton classes I was very happy to have received this. It helps to keep everything fresh in your mind that you learn in class. It is a very helpful video. Being able to rewind and pause is a huge help for working through mastering the flowers.Even if you had never taken the Wilton classes this would be an effective teaching video.The only down side is that it is filmed from across the table from the instructor not from her point of view. It's like seeing everything backwards.This is a good buy in my opinion.
This booklet is ok. I just need to find out some technicality stuff that is explained from the book. Having said that, one must indeed practice and not just read the book, like me...
Lots of interesting and helpful information for a beginner.  My daughter loves to bake and this will give her a opportunity to create much more.  Thank you!
My daughter says she likes the book and it arrived in good condition. Lots of cute ideas in the book.
Fondant is the best for elegant and pretty cake decorating.  I use it in all my cakes.  I make my own. No problem.Rita M. Tomas
I cant really give a honest review because i bought it for my daughter as a gift but i do know she wanted it real bad
For the price, this book can not be beat!  There are wonderful photos in the book as well as great tips on how to create your own amazing decorations.  It is fun to learn using the book.
I use to cake decorate as a kid in 4H, this book was a great refresher. Helps me make gorgeous cupcakes for friends and family.
Got this for my girlfriend who runs a baking business and she said it was handy to have for a reference book. She said it is handy to have when thinking of decorating ideas.
A pattern book, nothing else.  There are not descriptions or any kind of help for the beginner, maybe is o.k for who has some skill on decorating.
Great book needed it for a class about to take in a couple of weeks. The book itself is over price in store and online.
I got this because I plan on taking the class, but have already put it to use! Great tips and ideas!
Like every other Wilton yearbook, this is as much a product catalog as a cake decorating guide.  The cakes featured, like the one on the cover, look pretty amazing and provide a lot of inspiration for those of us who like to decorate cakes and cookies.  I personally don't think that rolled fondant tastes very good, however, and it is used in mass quantities in this book.  Much of the cake on the cover, for example, would be inedible. I still found it very visually appealing though, and will try to create a similar effect in a tastier way.  This yearbook features a lot of treats made with Wilton's new "Sugar Sheets", which are basically edible papers that you can use decorative punches and other papercrafting techniques on.  If you like the idea of applying your scrapbooking or papercrafting skills to your baking, you'll enjoy this book.
I bought this for my daughter.  She likes to do cupcakes for parties.  She said it has good instructions and pictures and was helpful.
This 128 page book contains pictures and patterns for 38 tiered cakes.  It gives you instructions on how to assemble cakes on stands, pillars or stacked construction.  It also contains recipes for basic scratch cakes in white, yellow, chocolate, strawberry, and banana.  It also has the recipes for standard Wilton Icings, fillings, glazes, fondant (not the tasty marshmallow kind), color flow, gum paste, and candy clay.  There are tips for baking, leveling, torting, filling and icing the cakes.  It also gives some instruction on how to cover a cake with fondant.  There are suggestions for transporting tiered cakes, calculating servings per cake and cutting guides.  The book also includes patterns and instructions for various decorations.  As with all Wilton books, the last few pages detail products you can buy from them to duplicate all the designs in the book.  The problem is that some of these items don't seem to be available on their web site any more.  The book was first published in 2005.  Still, it's a great idea book and I'm sure you can find acceptable substitutes for a lot of the items.  The book contains ideas for cakes that could be served at weddings, anniversaries, and showers.Also, I'm not sure if it's offered everywhere, but I'm currently enrolled in a class taught by a Wilton Instructor called "Tall Cakes".  It is taught in two sessions.  The first class is a demonstration by the instructor on how to put together a tiered cake.  The second class is where we bring in our own cakes and learn how to stack or pillar them.  It's less expensive than the other classes, no kit is required and the items needed are this book, one six-inch and one ten-inch layer cake, the plate/pillars, and our decorations.  It's a great way to top off the other four classes.
One of the best Wilton Tier cake decorating books I've ever purchased.  The cakes are spectacular.  Would recommend it to beginners for inspiration and everyone.
This "book" is more like a brochure.. or one of those checkout cookbooks. It does have some basic tips in it but I surely wouldn't pay more than $5 for it!!
I took course one at our local Michael's store.  When you buy the &#34;Kit&#34; for the class, the books DO NOT come with the kit.  It sort of forces you to take the class and then on the first day of class you are handed the book.  I'm on a tight budget and didn't want to take course two.  The book is the SAME one you get when taking the class.  I was very happy with it and can go at my own pace and use youtube videos if need be.
Great set of lesson plans. I am thoroughly enjoying being able to learn at my own pace. Also, not ordering next book until I finish each book. Very motivating and thoroughly entertaining to all who are subjected to guessing what I actually made. LOL.
Very good information for getting started in cake decorating.  Clearly explains about different types of frosting/icing and their properties, and more.  A very good beginning. Has details I never saw anywhere else.  Very helpful to have a visual presentation of techniques.  Conveniently set up so you can just click on the section you want - if you don't want to watch the DVD all the way through.
I gave it to my daughter who has 6 grandchildren and loves to bake their birthday cakethey are more special when she decorates them  for each child'd request.
This is a good purchase if you like cake decorating and sometimes need ideas. Most of the book showcases cakes with fondant, whereas in the past they did fondant and frosting. But it gives me great ideas when I'm short so that's a plus. I do wish that instead of only having cake ideas for half the book then advertising wilton products for the other half that they only did cakes or at least more cakes less wilton advertising.
Thank you for this helpful dvd.It was great color . It was helpful for beginners. She teaches you very well.
Product arrived very quickly in new condition no pages bent or anything.  Cant wait to be able to use this!
We needed this edition and happy to find it, but not happy with paying full price.  Thanks anyways, gotta have it.
I'm not expert baker but, the video was very basic. I want to learn how to decorate a cakeand I think they focused to much on the basics then teaching how to actually decorate the cakeand maybe show more examples of her decorating. not bad, but if you are looking for something more advance onactually decorating a cake. this is not for you. but if you are new to baking, this is perfect for you!
had no idea about decorating cakes,by this booklet ,now i can say that following the instructions and have the will and patience plus practicing,one day i wont be ashamed ofmy cakes. i added an image of a cake i made according to this book lessons, which i advice anyone who is interested; to get this book...
Es un libro muy practico, para aquellas personas como yo que estamos innovando este mundo de la decoracion de pasteles.
I ordered this lesson plan because I took the first two courses of Wilton's Cake Decorating, and I didn't want to sign up for the 3rd course only because I didn't want to spend so much money for the classes. So I bought the kit in Michaels figuring I would teach myself but this time the lesson plan wasn't included in kit like the first 2 kits were. This lesson plan is great and if you have some experience with working with fondant and gum paste this will be a piece of cake for you, no pun intended. But this definitely isn't for a beginner.
This is great for all cake decorators or someone looking for a certain design for a cake. Ilove it.
item was as described. Was helpful to review book before workshop started.  Found similar items at Joann's Fabric and Craft store.  Same cost but did not have to wait for shipping.
Finally, I am taking the third (and most fun!) Wilton class at my local Joan Fabric store and I am loving this book!  One look at the cover, and I was "in."  This book explains the gum paste and fondant techniques beautifully, with very well photographed examples.  I recommend this book most highly with its inspiring and easy-to-follow instructions.
My last Wilton yearbook is from 1992.  I bought this 2011 version because I wanted to see some new ideas.  I'm very disappointed with this version.  Almost all of the cake decorating ideas involve either cake pans that are shaped like cars or animals and colored in with little stars; or the regular cakes that are made in regular pans but are all decorated with rolled fondant booth covering the cakes and used as cut outs for flowers and shapes (as shown on the cover).  This is not the type of cake decorating I was expecting, at least not exclusively. There is a big difference between piping out shapes, lines and designs with icing and using edible play dough and sticking your creation on a cake.  I would have thought there would be more than 3 or 4 regular icing cake decorating ideas.  Why do they even bother selling decorating tips and turn tables?  I just purchased a turn table and a set of devices that make designs on the sides of the cake, a cake that is decorated with regular icing. Come on Wilton, did you run out of ideas for using frosting tips?  I wish I could have flipped through the book before I bought it.  If anyone knows which of the books between 1992 and now that have more cakes decorated with icing please let me know. Since I already have all of the recipes in my 1992 version and there are only 3 or 4 decorating ideas that I can use, I basically I paid $13 for a catalog showing all of the accessories and pans that they sell.
This seemed to me to be more marketing/ads for Wilton products than useful decorating instructions.  Maybe my expectations were too high.
with four kids I'm really getting into doing their own cakes for their birthdays.... along with doing some side work... this book is awesome for ideas!!!
I was pleasantly surprised to order what I thought was 1 book and receive a 6-pack of these 40-page booklets.  These would make great gifts for friends interested in learning the basics.  It covers baking, leveling, stacking, icing the cakes; preparing the cake board, making and coloring buttercream and royal icings, preparing bags, filling with icing; bag position; decorating with various tips (round, star, petal, leaf).  Then it gives instructions for specific projects including a bear cake, fish cake, swirl-topped cake, lettering, cupcakes, clown cake, balloon cake, star cake, castle cake, flower/heart cake, baseball cake, big cookie.
this was the worst dvd i have ever watched...dont waste your money...if you have ever baked a cake then you probably know more than the lady doing the video...i am shocked wilton put their name on this one
I purchased all three of the lesson plans for Wilton's three courses.  In my opinion, as an educator, they are excellent.  I'll use them to instruct myself and keep them for future reference.  The price is great! $4.99.
I really like all the helpful information in this book. It even has a recipe to make your own buttercream icing. I'm glad I purchased this item on amazon.com
do not buy this book if youre taking the classes, they are old edition and everything is different!!!!!!!! Had I know I would never have brought it!
Just trying to teach myself how to decorate cakes and cookies. This is a very concise and clear lesson for the beginner. Love it.
I thought the book will contain tips for fondant decoration, but it didn't. It had nice illustrations and designs for butter icing, with tips for baking good punch cakes.
The book shows a lot of beautiful designs but leave out a lot of details.It doesn't help you with your skills at all.
Perfect! not bad of a book. I would recommend this item to anyone! Works great for baking! I would buy again.
Itr was fine  I was hoping for more  but it was as promisedI was purchased as a gift and they enjoy it
this wilton cake yearbook doesn't have many ideas for creating. you can  find some ideas for different events but it's more a wilton product's shopping book.
Great pictures in the book thats all. was hoping for some instructions or recipes won't buy another book like that.
I love every summer when the next year book comes out so that I can see next ideas. I don't use all of htem but great for ideaas for upcoming parties
My 9-yr-old daughter received this book as a guide to her 4H project of cake decorating.  The pictures and explanations are very detailed and simple to understand.  As it turned out, a cake decorator friend of ours uses this same book for her elaborate cakes.  I would recommend this book to anyone looking to get started or to expand their collection.
The woman in the video can't even do half the techniques she's trying to teach.  I'm surprised that Wilton even put their name on this and mass produced it, it's honestly that bad.
I purchased this book without taking the course. Cake decorating classes in my area are almost nonexistent so I have to be self taught. Lots of pictures and detailed instructions will guide you through the beginning of cake decorating.
I decided to purchase this book with the student kit so that I could make a more professional looking cake for my Mothers day, which also happened to be on my mother's birthday this year.  The first thing that I noticed is that you do have to buy about a third of what you need to complete the lessons separately.  I was expecting the kit to have all the tools that I needed to do the lesson plans. So I was a little disappointed in that.The book however is a great starting out point.  The pictures make it easy to follow and I love the practice board.  It makes it easy to try out the different patterns.  If you mess up just wipe the frosting off the board and try again.  They give you the frosting recipe, which is good, but I have had problems with it staying together as it should.  I had to find a different recipe on wilton.com, to get the results I wanted.The only down side to the book is that sometimes the author forgets that this is a beginner book and says something that gives pause and makes you ask "What?"  So I did have to do a little "google-fu" to understand what was being asked of me.But all in all a great book.
So I actually bought this thinking it was the entire Lesson 2 kit. However, I've found through experience that having the book without having to take the class is a good thing. I've taken the Wilton Lesson 1 class and the number of Wilton items you have to purchase ALONG with the Lesson kit is a little ridiculous. I've worked my way through Lesson 1 and now I'm working my way (by myself) through lesson 2. I recommend anyone that likes to work on their own time to just purchase this book.
doest have any pictures to explain how to do those tiny figures, &#304; do not recommend to a fondant beginners
Este libro es una buena gu&iacute;a para saber manejar los "decorating tips".Nos ayuda a conocer cuales dise&ntilde;os logramos con las diferentes boquillas. Es una buena orientaci&oacute;n.
I saw this book at Target and flipped through it.  I was amazed at all the ideas to do with a simple brownie!  Granted what I make won't ever look as good as the pictures in the book, but I'm okay with that.  If I had sat down and thought about it I might have come up with some of these same ideas, but some of them are really clever.  I have had fun looking through the book with my kids and we are making brownie pops for my son's b'day treats at school and his party.PROS:- You can buy most of these supplies (including the book) at Michael's Craft Supplies or Joann's and like I said, I saw the book at Target with some of the molds.- creative uses for brownies.  Great way to have an easy-to-make but fun treats for all sorts of occasions.- there are suggestions for b'day's, sports, holidays, gifts...CONS:- You need to buy the molds or supplies to make any of special shapes so it's an investment up front.  Once you have them it's all about Brownie Fun!I think this book is a great resource (or a fun gift!) for any parent or person who likes to bake and be creative.
A must have. Really good book for a beginner. A basic step by step guide, tips and ideas on the icing craft
I should not have bought it because it comes free from my cake decorating class. Oh well, at least I gave the other copy to my sister.
I ordered this book for my course 3 obviously and even though it's an older book, it still works just fine for my class
I was disappointed with this book.  Was hoping for more information and pictures on how to use the tips. Not certain if I would recommend this book.
great book came on time and as described.  My daughter and her friends after watching a few baking shows have gained interest in cake decorating, and want to use all the new type products.  This was a purchase for them so they can get the feel of this product.  They liked it!
Arrived in a timely manner. Does not include the kit. Only the book, and the teacher gave us a free copy, so this purchase was wasted.
I thought I was buying a real book but this seems like a supplement to something. Not much content. Very disappointed
I enjoyed all the clear and concise step by step directions, however I would love more applications, especially in the area of piping decorations. that being said, this is the best book I have on the subject of piping decorations on cakes and things. I recommend it to everyone I know who wants to learn the art.
I'm retired so I'm not some lovely new bride learning a new skill.... this book was really so basic and wonderful ... and even inspirational.  User friendly photos ... good purchase. I'd recommend it to 10 year olds and up.
Finally I know all the fun things you can do with all those tips! I love it!
This is helping my wife to create new looking cake. Easy to learn. Not recommend for professional but work just fine with housewife.
This book is very helpful and useful for beginners. This product arrived within a timely manner.
I bought the large kit as suggested by my instructor because I am taking all the Wilson classes. The problem. No books. This was the perfect solution.
I'm definitely a beginner in cake decorating and wondered if a book would be enough to get started.  I ended up ordering this DVD anyway and I'm so glad I did.  It's very easy to use (each lesson is only a couple of minutes, easy to watch a few at a time) and full of helpful tips that I don't think I would have found in books alone.
pix are great, descriptions great, even though some are the basic things, you sometimes need to go back to basics in order to do the great projects. I love it
I was hoping for IDEAS for  little girl's birthday cakes, and using icing...I did not find this book to be inspiring... Lots of cakes  with fondant icing, which is not a fav of mine.  BUT, it does have a great step-by-step decorating guide & mixing colors for icing,..lots of good, useable information.  I thought it fell short on cakes with decorative buttercream  icing that could be used for little girls or other occasions. This book had lots of holiday cakes and cupcakes and several wedding cakes.Book was in great condition and would use this vendor again.
This book has lots of tips and tricks and is an excellent reference for cake decorating. I don't care for the buttercream recipe with no butter but that is an easy substitution.
I got this for my wife and she loved it.  She was really inspired by the various examples and said that it had some really useful tips she was anxious to try out.
I absolutely love this book! Before purchasing, I found myself gathering bits and pieces of information from the wilton site to make the flowers and borders that I wanted, but this book puts them all together neatly without leaving anything out. I recently purchased Colette's Cakes which is also wonderful, but so much of it is advanced, and I'm just not there. I only decorate for fun. This book sticks to basics which, for me, is essential to focus. If I see to much detail I tend to become frustrated and over anxious. Then I end up giving up. So, with this book I can actually follow the process and learn step by step without the frustration.The only small disappointment was the weight of the cover. The paper is a bit thin and will need some support or will probably not hold up very well. Nothing a little clear contact paper can't cure though, so no big deal.
A good tool for home use.  Shows several types of simple, easy to perform techniques.  Would recommend for beginners and home bakers.
GREAT begginers book and had alot to offer, gave me some good fundamentals to go on and improve my little knowledge of backing.
Great Yearbook as always with a lot of pictures and fun!It is a must for the baking-crazy person and collector!
I use it quite often for frosting, haven't had a chance to use the entire book yet or might have given it a five.
Easy and very informative on all cake decorating ideas. Easy to follow pictures and great refereace book. Breaks down the tip guide
It is very useful if you want to do flowers mostly.I was expecting more than just some pages, maybe I got it wrong but it is useful.
great product! Came in fast shipping and as described. Step by step book to make your baking a lot easier and fun! Thank you so much!  i will order from here again.
There was very little this dvd taught me and I'm by no means a seasoned decorater just a novice. I did however learn some better techniques and tricks that I was unaware of before. This would be good for a true beginner.
the book as part of the kit costs around 30 bucks but this alone just costs around 5 bucks which i think is a great deal.
Very detailed instructions. You'll need this lesson plan workbook if you're going to take the #2 Wilton class. It goes along with the Wilton Flowers and Cake Design Student Kit... HOWEVER, for the price you pay for the kit, this lesson plan book SHOULD be included. You shouldn't have to pay extra for it.
This lesson plan is perfect for a beginner and definitely helped introduce working with fondant in a user-friendly way.  Thanks, Wilton.
"I REALLY LIKE THE WILTON CAKE DECORATING YEARBOOK FOR 2013"  It really gives you wonderful cake decorating Ideas..  I got this for a good price..  I am now looking for the PATTERN BOOK FOR 2013 for a FANTASTIC PRICE also....  Ladies & Gentleman enjoy CAKE DECORATING the 2013 year...
I bought 2 of these books as my daughter-in-law and I love to bake and we both LOVED it! So many cute ideas and we love the visual pictures.  Thanks Wilton
Good and useful in providing step by step instructions,  decorating ideas, and examples.  Good book if you 're a beginner.
Good guide for beginners.  Helpful resource.  Clear pictures and instructions.  If you can learn from just looking at a page on a book with a few written details, it will teach you without expensive classes.  But if you are using in addition to the class, all good too.  Keep it handy to look back at once in a while as a resource.
I gave it a four star because it wasn't what I expected. I was hoping or more information about gum paste and fondant but this book teaches you only how to make whats on pictures. It's cool lesson though.
I loved all the information I found in this book, very good ideas and pictures I recommend it to new beginners
What a great book to help you get started on learning to decorate cakes. Very usful! Highly recommend buying this!
i purchased this for a friend who enjoys cake decorating. it was just what i needed thanx so much :)
this is a very informative book. it has step by step instructions of all the basic techniques needed to get started in cake decorating. Definitely a book to add to your cake decorating library.
Not really what i was expecting, seems a little outdated but its not.  Easy to uase and understand, was helpful
First and foremost I must say Wilton is my number one choice for most tools and products.  They have my respect for holding years & years of teaching standards above most in the industry.  However, that being said, this DVD probably should have not made it past the first stage in the Marketing Division. It somewhat baffles me why Wilton didn't set a higher standard for a *professional* to demonstrate procedures in a longer DVD (or a series of DVD's) that you see the technics Begining to End with a professional look.  I actually feel sorry for the women in this video and am very dissapointed in Wilton.  I seriously wondered at one point if the cakes she was showing AFTER her short demomstrations of *sloopy technics* were actually cakes SHE did and not ones a professional did.  If I didn't know better and this were the first time hearing or seeing a Wilton presentation, I would be looking elsewhere for my baking needs.  What a shame.....One would only hope that if Wilton considers doing something of same again, or if they have and I have not seen it, that it's presentation and professional standards are as notable as the Wilton name has been for years.
This book is amazing! I love how Wilton publishes books for every stage of baking! This book is a must have for beginers!
I like the ideas that they use but I'm not much for fondant and they use it quite a bit in this book.  There are also lots of cookies, more than I would expect in a book marketed as a "Cake Decorating" book.  Pages 129 thru 248 are all catalog which I can see for free on Wilton.com.  My biggest issue is that they show a cake that you need a pattern to make.  Is the pattern in the back of the book under the page they referenced? NO.  What is on that page is an additional pattern book which you have to buy separately for $9.99.  For 30 pages, no thank you.
I love everything of Wilton's. I bought this book to find out that I have the same one with just a different cover! But, it had a couple more ideas that I didn't have, great book, very simple to follow.
I BOUGHT THIS FOR MY DAUGHTER SO SHE & HER GIRLSCOULD HAVE FUN BAKING BROWNIES.
It is a good book for beginner, but the it is not detail enough. If you want the detail, it is the best to take a class with it.
SO GLAD I did because there is a LOT to learn. Made notes in it. Kept the one I got in free class to cover in page protector sheets and put in binder like teacher had. Book I bought got a bit messy in class. Students who take Wilton Class in other craft stores may need to purchase a book anyway, so I highly recommend Amazon, unless you have a half-price coupon for less at a brick and mortar store.
This item arrived today,15th August 2011,earlier than I expected. When I saw this book, I got really excited to try decorating and dreaming of making my own designed cake.The book showed me how to use the different tips.I would love to order other volume of this book.Thank you again..
As always, the variety of cakes, the simplificy of instructions and materials, and the quality of photos, make this a must in your decorating libary.
I used to decorate cakes quite a bit in high school.  Let's just say I'm out of practice.  This is a good review/beginner book.  Highly recomended.
This item shows the older version to the book, and as I couldn't find the newer one I settled. However to my joy I was actually sent the newer version!Although the book does contain a lot of advertisements for Wilton (as it is there product) I found this book to be of a brilliant addition to my cake items. The advertisements aren't off putting and don't take away from the tutorial aspect of the book. I will be teaching myself, with this book and the student kit as unfortunately I live in England.The book is very brightly coloured and straight forward, giving you everything you need in a list before the "lesson".I'm very new to cake decorating and find the instructions very simple, the picture aids are well appreciated, and I will be purchasing book 2 and 3 off the credit of this one.Please be aware that if you aren't new to cake decorating that the book may lack for you, its simple instructions and quite basic cake design ideas (which do look amazing still).
very helpful with different things about decorating cakes. thank you so much. i will recommend to all of my friends
Great tool for beginners, great tips on all the basic essentials of cake decorating. Great tool to have to review and refresh what you learn at the Wilton Class.
I attended a cake decorating class conducted by a Wilton teacher several years ago and I was very disappointed  with the experience. The class was much too crowded and I did not receive the personal attention I needed.I am extremely pleased with this video as it covers all the basics that I require plus I can review it any time I so desire!
J'adore ce produit et sa qualit&eacute;, et la livraison a &eacute;t&eacute; tr&egrave;s rapide mais ma meme surpris. je le recommanderais a tout le monde.
I bought this as a gift for my daughter. She found is easy to understand with simple instructions unlike some previous books she's tried. I will be purchasing more Wilton books for her.
there ARE LOTS OF PICTURES IN THIS BOOK WITH LITTLE INFORMATION ON HOW TO PRODUCE THESE DESIGNS.  MAYBE IM A BIT SLOW...LOL
Great book for beginners or for anyone who needs to brush-up on the basics or more advanced decorating techniques.  Easy to follow guidelines.  Arrived quickly.
This dvd is a must for any cake decorator.  It is presented in short and easy to understand segments.  It works great for the beginner or as a quick refresher.  The instructor did an outstanding job of both explaining and demostrating?
This is a great beginner book. My daughter loves it.  She is just starting to decorate cakes and this book is very helpful.
ok for beginners...i wanted more ideas for cake decorating, not how to make .just so-so for me.I will use a couple of ideas from the book
This book containes a variety of information on how to make flowers, use tips and how to create designs. I have taken the Wilton classes, but this book had some things we did not learn in class. The book also containes the tools you will need for the projects, as well as cutting guide information. The plus in buying the book is the recipes for various types of icing and the icing chart. It is an overall great book for beginners and even for those of us with a little experience.
a very good books to learn more style even they have been here for Years but as a decorator and won couple of contest a new Secret weapon as for me.
This Wilton book is awesome.  My local craft shop did not offer the fondant course when I wanted to take it so I decided to teach myself.  I followed the lessons in the book and my fondant cakes have improved greatly.  In my area the Wilton Method instructors are not so great so I am happy I was able to save the money on the class but still get all of the wonderful Wilton advice.  I would definitely recommend not only buying this book, but seeing how much you can teach yourself before spending the money on the class.
THE BOOK IS VERY USEFUL AND EASY TO UNDERSTAND.... UNBEATABLE PRICE AS I SHOPPED AROUND QUITE A BIT.... SIMPLE SITE NAVIGATION.... ONE GREAT EXPERIENCE!!!!
I added this book to my cake decorating library. It is filled with beautiful cakes. Some of which I can make, others that I won't but they are all a joy to look at. I love Wilton products.
Maybe this one was an earlier print, but my classmates and instructor's course booklets were a few pages different.No biggie though. Same material.
Great book, price is right, I recommend this book as easy to follow step by step instructions. Another thumbs up!
I ordered this for a Christmas gift I thought I was getting a BOOK this is more of a magazine and someone said they got 6 in their order I only got one which is what I expected but I would rather it have been an actual book not just something that looks like it came off the shelf at Safeway
Product arrived in great shape, just what she had asked for Christmas. She seemed very interested in it and has read it and used it in her cake business.
This is a nice book.  The book has some very good decorating ideas.  It is not a big book, but ok for beginners
so frustrating...where is the recipe for the fondant?  googled some recipes...you need to point out the recipe is not included
The patterns in the 2013 pattern book really helped out a lot in making the cakes I seen in the 2013 Wilton cake book.
This book is great! it has lots of ideas and a cake for every occasion. I really love this book i even ordered the 2011 book. Whats great is that it even has every single product wilton have.
I am very pleased with this book. I have used many wilton publications over the years and have always been satisfied. Thnaks for the sat shipping.
Bought this for my wife's use.  She really liked it and two other Wilton books I purchased for her.
Took the Wilton classes and this kit was a required buy.  It had all the items one needed to do the class.  Instructional book was excellent.  Tools are of good quality.
I am pleased with this book since I like Wilton so much.  I was impressed with the price.  I was able to order several books at the same time!
I wanted to enroll in the course, but since I have a little baby and not much time on my hands to do a hands on class, this book is perfect for me to learn basic decorating skills.
I bought this book at Walmart for 3 bucks.  Its not very big, more like a booklet. However its very informative.  It takes you through the steps of making the cake from start to finish with full color photos of each finished cake. I've already picked a few of the cakes to make for upcoming birthdays! Great bargain.  Definitely pick it up if you're just getting started.
this book is GREAT for especially beginners ... it shows all the TIPS you could ever want and what designs ~ flowers ~ leaves etc you are able to make with each .... i now have a WISH LIST of tips i want to get .... easy to read ...
Bought this book when I was hyped up and excited about baking and decorating cakes.  Although the designs are very outdated, it is very informative and I enjoy taking it out to view on occasion.
I bought this as a gift for my daughter. She says it deserves a 5.
I bought this to get decorating ideas. Book provided good ideas and directions. Would recommend to those beginning cake decorating.
I've only taken one Wilton decorating (basic one). This booklet has greatly helped me get acquainted with fondant/gumpaste. I've been able to make 4 fondant cakes already (and have not taken the fondant/gumpaste course). Highly recommend if you're interested in learning these techniques by yourself or if you don't have time to attend class.
I ordered this book when I first started decorating in 2006 and I was a great tool to help me with techniques and even starter recipes for icings.
great book, so many fun ideas..can't wait to get startedgreat product, fast shipping.I love the Wilton books and will keep buying them
I am a novice at decorating and this is good for starting out. I do not want to get complicated designs.
This is very easy to understand and it is a necessity if buying the Wilton Kit to match
this book is handy with learning to make different type of icing flowers and shows step by step instructions also. just what i was looking for
I bought this book for class It is the one that they use to teach ou how to use the gum past and fondant, it was easy to follow, i would buy from this seller again.thanks
If you were ever hesitant of making your own chocolates and candies, this book will remove that hesitation forever. It is packed with step by step photographed directions and lots and lots of ideas. Great for the first timer.
Mostly advertisements at the back , however overall I found this a good informative book and recommend it. It has ideas for different technics
Easy to follow even for a clutz like me! Very informative and the instructions are straight forward. Im new to cake decorating so I have really enjoyed this book.
This is a good guide book for someone just starting out, has good tips and some really cute ideas! Enjoy!
If you've ever looked through a Wilton year book and said &#34;I want to make that cake&#34; then you need this pattern book too!  This book includes patterns for many of the cakes in the yearbook.
every beginner should get one of these. lots of helpful tips . I especially found the colour chart helpful and it makes a big difference to my cakes
Unless you are a professional cake maker, I think this DVD shows all you need to know about cake decorating. The segments are short and easy to understand. All the basics I could think of are covered. It is very user friendly to watch and comes with a nice booklet that summarizes the main points.
Purchased for our 12 yr old granddaughter (at her request).  She loves thebook and has enjoyed decorating cakes with ideas from the book.
For [...], this 10 sheet manual was hardly worth it at all! It is the kind of really basic user manual type of book that one would expect to come for free with a [...] cake decorating kit. I think it was a complete waste of money, and I dont know about the user that got 6 booklets, coz all I got was one really skinny booklet that [...]
Photos were large and instructions easy to follow.  Techniques as relevant today as they were when book first published.  Glossary terms helpful, especially for the novice.
It's an okay book. It's very short and the designs are a little dated. Also, I was hoping for some recipes but it just tells you to use pre-made, pre-rolled for everything. They don't even sell pre made fondant in Australia.. so I didn't find this book very useful at all.
This book is great for beginner fondant makers.  I was able to follow the instructions and tips and they helped a lot.
Some thing for everyone in this book of cupcake ideas. Want a party? Just get out the cupcakes, frosting and have at it!
This book has great instructions for decorating cakes and the price was great.  You don't have to take the classes to use this book.
Fast delivery. Lots of ideas. Love it!
I bought this book for my daughter and I to spend more time together.  Can't wait to teach her about how to decorate cakes and different designs she can do.
It had lots of ideas. All the stuff you would need to make the cakes.  Step by step for the instruction.
I needed a Spanish version of cakes and ideas for cakes and this was just what I needed. It had great ideas for cakes for parties and weddings and some how-to-do its as well.
I love this booklet! It is light and slim so its easy to have around and it has great pics to reference to in a hurry.
I saw this book in the store and it was much more expensive...once I got it I was thrilled!  Simple and easy directions.  Pictures are great..I love Wilton teaching methods.
it was a very interesting bookit has a beatifull picturesit has an original ideas ti make an interesting cakes o cookies
Liked this very much, directions were very easy to follow, great pics to help one get started.  Not a bad price, love it.
If you are trying to learn cake decorating at home this is the DVD to start with.
Nice but too short. I expected for that price much more- ideas for decorating cakes, recipes etc. Its limited to several very basic decorating techniques. Compared to a book i wohld recommend a book for that money.
This is a very simple book but if you have never touched a candy mold it is perfect for you.
Took class years ago, using this as a refresher before starting a cake. Sometimes a video is faster than a book. Happy with Wilton items. Came fast .Stores don't carry video.
I am trying my best to get into FONDANT and THIS book has motivated me to try harder and harder.  It has already paid for itself and has brought me back into the world of making family cakes as opposed to spending a TON at the Bakery!  THANK YOU for a wonderful book!
Ordered several copies, as we use this book in our 4-H program. It is a great resource. Wouldn't hesitate to order again. Came in timely manner and in great condition.
I purchased this booklet to share with my 10 year old aspiring chef and it fit the bill perfectly. Shows how many decorating projects are done with easy to read and understand directions plus lots of pictures. Recommended resource for beginners of all ages!
it is a nice item i have not seen like this item before i will advise my friend to buy it
This book shipped really fast. I were expecting it to come in a week but it came the next day. The book has a lot of great things to learn and it was well priced. I will be using it a lot.
This has certainly improved my cake decorating knowledge as a pure novice. I will now purchase the other books so I can learn more.
This is a very detailed book for Beginners.Everything is very self teach and just fun!!!!you will definitely love this book if you would like to learn Fondant!!!!!GREAT BUY!
excellent book, shipped on time, packaged nicely, helpful tips in the book, good price. Very good experience, very happy with the product and vendor
I received this mini book free from Flickback in exchange for an unbiased review here on Amazon. A small book packed with entertaining information.  Each page is full color and printed on quality paper.  Everything from the price of store bought items to historical moments of 1953 is included.
It came well packaged and undamaged.  It's a beautiful addition to our coastal home.  I would recommend this map to anyone.
This is a great timeline that is exciting our boys about the new curriculum they will start in a few months.
I bought this chart as a gift for my Father-in-Law for Christmas. He is a high school art teacher, a painter, and a lover of anything to do with history. He enjoys surrounding himself with art, old and new, so I thought that this would be suited for him. Once unrolled, it&#8217;s hard to tear your eyes away. It reminds me of my Intro to Art History textbook from college, and it can easily be regarded as a visual trip to a great art museum. There are well-known works and also some I had never learned about. One of this piece's greatest strengths is the actual timeline. I really enjoy the color-coded periods that run along the bottom and how they coincide with the text in the dates alongside the images. The chronological progression of art is truly what makes this stand apart from anything I have ever seen in stores. It&#8217;s a handy reference and a wonderful conversation starter for an art enthusiast such as my Father-in-Law.
it was a bit smaller than expected but its a nice eye catcher.Would be nice to have it twice as large.
I needed to replace an old switch cover in the home bar/pool room.  This is just the ticket - very nice graphics and looks great.  Another reviewer complained about the white screws.  Not a big deal in my opinion.  You can push the screws through a piece of paper or cardboard and hit 'em with a shot of gloss black paint or just paint the heads with a permenant marker or sharpie.  Problem solved in 1 minute  Also, the seller left a nice note in the package thanking me for the business and to contact her with any issues.  I thought that was a nice touch.  Yeah, maybe no big deal but I find it harder and harder to find people these days who actually seem to appreciate my business and parting with a hard earned dollar.  Wouldn't hesitate to buy from this seller again.
I really liked it but the white screws take away from the look of it. They need to be black.
This is a fun game to get a wine tasting party going. I modified the game a bit since the majority of the group do not know very much about wine. I will definitely be using this again!
This was a nice compliment to our Italian wine tasting. I liked the wine glass markers... no need to purchase the expensive, "jeweled" wine markers
As the host of our last wine tasting party, I thought the game setup was pretty good and interesting.But I had a hard time holding my groups attention toward playing the game. Seemed to be to broad based,too many sections to complete. Or maybe my group just wanted to enjoy the wine and conversation. Seems like a good way to track your wine bottle purchases. I'll try it again.
We used this game for my husband's 40th birthday party.  The bottle covers and the name tags for the wine glass were very nice.  I even just took what came in the box and made color copies to use next time.  Although there are quite a few bottle covers and name tags that you could probably have a few parties with this box.  It also comes in a nice sturdy box.
We enjoyed paying this game with a group of neighbors (40). We really liked the wine glass markers and other materials. The neighbors can't wait to &#34;play&#34; again!
Not just an aesthetically pleasing coffee table decor, but can actualy be fun just by rearranging a couple of cubes around.  Create something profound, or make absolute no sense - there are so much possibilities that you'll surprise yourself!
We've had these sitting on our coffee table for over 20 years.  It's a good way to break the ice and gives you something to do when you are bored with the conversation.
A friend of mine had this and I ended up messing with it half the night at his house.  It's a very intriguing little set of blocks and I like coming up with random songs with my guitar when we're all hanging out.
Whether you've hit a block in your writing or you're just looking for something to fiddle with over your morning cup of coffee, Words Cubed is perfect for any table. I have one at home on my coffee table, and it's great for when dinner guests arrive and are mingling as an ice-breaker, or just something for me to do while I'm watching TV. I love this set of blocks, and I highly recommend it to anyone and everyone.
This book has a shortened down version of the larger book, meaning it has several breeds with the EXACT same wording and the EXACT same illustrations, it is just not as complete as the larger version.  I love the original "Notes From the Grooming Table" book, but save your money on this one unless you really need a copy that is pocket sized with less information.
Just like the full size version of this book, this one is significantly lacking in features and illustrations. Save your money and buy a better publication.
no worth it,so small,lack of breeds,incomplete,garbage can its where it belongs,buy instead the big one ,would be bettersucks!!!!puff
If you don't have room for her classic book, the very large guide to dog grooming styles, then this is a 2nd choice. Not all dogs are included, but enough to get you where you need to go.
I found this video to be the perfect combo of fun, fashion and function.I now have a clean, efficient closet which was no small feat for my hopeless case.  I give this hilarious and inspiring video two thumbs way up.
Classic in the printing industry. Must have the latest edition, given the rapid changes in the industry. Was delivered quickly without problems. A++
I have been a Print Production Supervisor, Production Manager, Q.C. Manager and Print Buyer for over 35 years. I hope to teach College-level Graphic Arts Lithography Production very soon. I attribute much of my skill not only to my years of experience, but also to products like International Paper's 20th Edition Pocket Pal. Since the Twelfth Edition, The Pocket Pal has been a very important part of my career. Information contained in its pages, have always helped me to cross the "t"s and dot the "I"s. Print Production is a very high powered and competitive Industry and since 1980, Pocket Pal has helped me "level the playing field". This 20th Edition is the best yet, not only for printing history and Production basics, but also for keeping up with most of today's updated technology. You will always find one on my desk and I hope they continue the good work.
Even though you can find a lot of this information online, I keep it as a great reference and it has been on my desk since college.
Had a Pocket Pal when I was in college, and since I've started doing exhibit design, I bought the latest edition . . . costs a bit more but, It's like having the Internet in your pocket when it comes to graphics reference in the shop . . . No batteries required!
The Pocket Pal was purchased as a training tool for our shop.I messed up the delivery address, causing the USPS to send the book back.Thanks to the efforts of Rachel at Hyatt's All Thing Creative, the book was re-sent and arrived last week.Great follow-up and service from this Seller. I recommend them highly.
The book is wonderful but it was suppose to come with a CD.  It is hard to complete the projects without the CD.
Tablerunners are one of the items I make for Xmas Craft Sales.  I think these patterns are very pretty and unique.
The idea of the "Sock Wizard" is great, but the actual product could be greatly improved.  I purchased this assuming that I could, not only get me standard sock pattern, but also customize patterns.  This cannot be done.  You get a basic pattern to print with your yarn and needle specs.  Once you have done a few socks, the next step is to add design to your patterns ... You cannot do this with this product.I am not happy with this purchase.  I feel it is quite pricey for what you are getting.  There are many free sites for figuring your basic sock pattern out.  Would not recommend purchasing.  I've used it "one" time to print out my basic sock pattern and haven't used it again since ... boy that was an expensive pair of socks.
Understand that when using this software, patterns are not included.  This is basic sock making.  Nothing fancy, if you want patterns, I suggest, getting Barbara Walker's Treasury books and going wild.  This software lets the knitter plug in their gauge, needle size, etc.  Then, print out the paper that has all the directions for you.  It lets you choose toe up or cuff to toe.  It gives several heel designs as well.  Not sure what kind of toe, this has several toes to choose from.  It will also give the knitter yardage.
By the description I thought I would get much more than I did. The book is only 44 pages long and is stapled together not bound. The book has plenty of pictures of finished products but very little in the way of instruction photos and the instruction photos that were provided didn't clearly show what was being done. This book has enough information to get you frustrated but not enough to actually complete a nice finished sugar piece. The book wasn't worth the price of shipping (which was also too high) let alone the price asked of the book itself. I would not recommend this book to anyone.
This is really just a pamphlet almost. It is just a few pages and nothing remarkable in it. I felt completely ripped off
the steak knife set we ordered was a tremendous purchase.  we feel these knives were of high quality. that is why we made a second purchasa.
Great knives.  They keep a very sharp edge.  They are dishwashable. Nothing fades; nothing tarnishes. And, the most important, they feel "right" in your hand; they have a very solid, very rich feel to them.  If you like steak, you will enjoy them.  To quote Tim Allen, it's a real man's knife.
These are excellent knives. Very sharp with a nice solid feel to them. They are serrated on the ends which some purist may say forces you to tear the steak as opposed to slice the steak, but that's just BS. I much prefer these knives to my Henckels whose quality seems to have slipped. The handles hold up very well even in the dishwasher.
Great knives for the price. High quality that should last years. Would recommend to friends. Would also consider gifting in future.
What else can be said about these knives? Their worth what I paid for them. Certainly not cheap, and certainly not expensive like some fancy branded cutlery.They're great for steaks. My young son has a hard time cutting steaks, but with this knife, he has no problem.As of the time of this review, I've only had them for around two months, so I can't speak about durability or longevity, but it looks like it's one tough knife (or knives). It does look like it will last a long time, so I'm not particularly worried.They feel good in the hands; their serrated edge works wonderfully on steaks and 'chops.I don't feel like I'm in a classy restaurant as they look so... "cowboy" (rather than "black-tie affaired" restaurants). Heck, they're great for steaks and great for cutting, so that's not really a complaint!
Bought these for my son for Christmas. The presentation is beautiful as a gift since it comes in the beautiful box with the Smith and Wollensky history written on it.  I was disappointed that the metal of the knife does not go completely down the entire wooden shaft of the knife. Most better knives do. The metal on this only goes down half way and my son noticed it right away.  For the cost of these knives, the metal knife part should go down all the way on the wooden handle.  With that said, the knives are very sharp and I am sure will cut through the steaks very well.  The pictures on amazon.com do not show the whole knife because they are in the box.  You should improve on the pics for this item.
The steak-knives are nice and sharp, I just wish they were full tang. One of the knives was a bit roughed-up on one side straight out of the box, and cleaning didn't help, hence the four-star rating. (I took a picture of it, but don't know how to paste it in.)
I already know these steak knives, they are 'simply the best'.  I ordered these as a present for a friend.  They are pleased too !
Some friends bought me 8 Smith & Wollensky steakhouse knives for my 30th birthday over 12 years ago.  I didn't think I was going to use them because I had just purchased 12 Wustoff classic steak knives (as well as about a dozen other matching Wustoff knives).  To my surprise, I have been using my S&W knives every day since my 30th birthday and haven't touched the Wustoff steak knives since.  I just really enjoy the heft and serrated edge of the S&W knives -- and they make me feel like I'm at a steakhouse.  I've been putting my knives in the dishwasher for the past 12 years so the handles are faded, but I still think they look great.  In fact, I still put them out for guest even though my Wustoffs (which are basically brand new) clearly look more refined.  I've used my S&W knives so much that the serrated edges are now gone and I'm looking for new steakhouse knives to replace them (which brought me to this site).  I'm just starting my diligence, but it's already looking like I'm going to buy a dozen new S&W knives.  I just love them.
I loved the designs and instructions.  I which they would include information for more sizes for each quilt.  These seemed to be mostly small.
Having a breast cancer website -- we do lots of charity quilts  this quick quilt suggestions helps us tremendously.We will be using the patterns on some of our chemo blankets we give to new breast cancer patients.
If you have the Cricut Cake Machine you must have this DVD. I watched it and then used my machine and the cuts came out great. Now my cakes look like I am a professional who went to school for baking and pastry. I can't wait to do some cupcakes and cookies. This Volume and Volume 1 are a must have.
Last only 1 hour.  Ill find more information on YouTube. Wasn't impressed at all. Cake was already done you don't get to see the steps by steps on how they put the cake together.  Sad.
When I saw this DVD I said to myself:  &#34;If I can make a cake just like that one, this DVD will be worth it's weight in gold&#34;  and now I can!  Carrie and Martha and Becky are fun to watch in this clear and concise instructional DVD on using the Cricut system for making fancy cakes.  I can honestly say that I now am able to duplicate this cake, and can design and make my own advanced creations after viewing this DVD.  The extra bonuses are fabulous, and make the cost of this DVD an extra bargain.  You will love it too!
It is attractive, sturdy, comfortable to sit on for fairly log periods of time either forwards or backward even for a heavy person and makes it possible to just sit and enjoy all the attention your partner will give you.  If you have long legs it might be a bit less comfortable. I am slightly taller than average for a female and so it is a bit of a squat, but otherwise it works wonderfully well. It has gotten quite a bit of use since it came in (discreetly boxed btw). I would definitely recommend this product.
Having recently purchased a PolyScience Sous Vide Professional Thermal Cooker I was anxious to get started.  I ordered and received this cookbook.  How disappointing.  There is no temperature chart.  Only a recipe for flank steak, chicken leg quarters, chicken breast, and Vegetables.  Each is followed with a few different ways to use the protein being cooked.  If you want to cook a steak this is not the book to purchase.  Don't waste your money.
I am just starting and this book was helpful and easy.  Though I bought others to gain more information and alternatives.
I love it.  I love all of the pictures for each recipe.  I showed my brother and he is getting it for his family who have several zoku slush cups.
Found a set of these, in the original box, with instructions at the local thrift...so I picked them up...a steal at $2.50! Gave them a good washing, even though they'd never been used...and followed the instructions that were included. Well, what can I say? Pretty as a picture, smelled wonderful and delicious.  Fantastic kitchen item! Makes making gourmet style baked apples a breeze! The only caveat that I have is...if you're cooking for just 2...make one baked apple. I used a good sized John-o-gold, wonderful flavor and texture, but one apple would definitely fill 2 for dessert.A little bit of spillage in the oven, but that was caught by the pan I had them in, so simple clean up. I would definitely consider paying $12 for them...but glad that I got them for $2.50! Well worth any of the prices....
I bought these decals for my 7 yr olds room. On the photo they look really neat seperated and in 1 complete circle. I had planned on doing both. Forget it! There is no way to get the whole circle off as one and I could not get each individual one to go inside each other once on the wall (I know your saying really how hard can it be?). I figured &#34;well I'll just seperate them all. This looked good after the first 2-3 then it looked in my opinion stupid! The whole circle looked really cool. I was determined!! My daughter was upset, I was aggravated and my husband was tired of hearing me complain so by the end I said forget it and had to give up. I bought 2 sheets so if anyone buys these and figures it out let me know.  I gave this 2 stars just because the designs were cool. And if your goal is to separate them all this is the decal for you.
I bought this for a gift.  Perfect sized mug and beautiful. Love it! If only they made more in this size
This mug is thick and large, I love it! I saw this mug from YouTube celebrity make up artist Kandee I had to get one! It's just like hers, love it!
I bought this tote bag to put my little nephew's birthday gift in. He is a huge star wars fan, so I know he is going to love it. I kinda wish that I bought one for myself....I may NOT be able to part with it. It has a very good picture of the Star Wars characters on the bag and  I only paid $5 for it. I thought it was a good deal.
Your typical reusable grocery store type bag. The art work is nice and the print is very clear. My son loves it.
Bag tore with almost nothing in it - Just caught the corner of a small cracker box and that was that. Pretty disappointed.
This makes a great reusuable gift bag for the Star Wars Fan. Well made and fun design for fans of the original movie.
I ordered this instead of a regular gift bag and was very happy with the size and feel confident that the recipient will reuse this product.
I ordered this bag about a month ago.  I've only used it about 3 or 4 times.  I didn't put anything unusually heavy in the bag and noticed this morning, when I went to use the bag, the stitching is coming loose on one of the seams.  I've got 2 Disney reusable shopping bags that I've been using for several years that are still in great shape.
This tote was a great way to keep all my other Star Wars related gifts together. And the added bonus that the gift recipient can use it .
I got this for my bf and he loves it. The stitches on the sides failed so I had to re-stitch it. That held well but then the plastic lining on the sides ripped. My bf used it daily for several months before I had to replace it. Overall a good product but wish it was better made.
These are really cute, for the pattern. I have bought a few of these to carry birthday presents for my kids friends. They are good for lightweight use, and the Star Wars design is adorable. But as far as grocery store use / everyday use, they are not that strong of bags. TRU sells them around $3-4 each and they are just about as good enough for carrying light stuff and toys, but no heavy use or day to day use here.
Nice quality bag! Vibrant colors. Worth it!
I was a little disappointed that the images of Princess Leia and Luke Skywalker are not the actual actors.  And the fact that there is no carboard or cloth bottom insert.  Otherwise it is well made.
Being a big Star Wars fan (the original and not the special edition version) I couldn't resist getting this tote, especially since plastic bags have been banned and you have to pay 10 cents for each bag needed. I have used this a few times while shopping and it holds quite a lot.
I live in a county that charges you for bags at any store - this is fun and rolls up nice while maintaining the hard bottom while i am shopping! Love it!
I am really pleased with this bag. Kinda made my day. I expected a less impressive print for the price but the image is actually pretty detailed and I think it's awesome. Came in less than a week. Definitely cool. Thx
The bag is very flimsy and thin, it won't last long. The picture quality is so poor I'm actually embarrassed to be giving this to someone as a gift. Not worth the money.
I like the looks of the tote and the price. It will not be getting much use since I'll be using it more for decoration.
I bought this to use as a grocery bag. I like it because it's fairly wide, the straps are strong, and it wipes clean easily. I also really like the graphics. I get compliments on this bag every time I go thru check out.
Maybe my husband will use a reusable bag now for groceries. It is usual quality, just wish it had a sturdy bottom plate.
Great art on the side, and it is a full size tote I can use for larger items, like groceries.
It is ok just like the other one I ordered on Amazon but neither this one or the other one ordered on Amazon came with extra support card board piece on bottom of bag like the one I bought at Hot Topic for same price, but they sold out so ordered couple more from Amazon, o well, a bit disappointing!
Its cloth and really cheesy. I don't like it very much and the shipper is slower than molasses in the middle of winter.
This was a gift for a Star Wars nut....and it went over very well.  Recommended for personal or gift purposes.
Each camper had their own roomy bag to collect their camp stuff in. Perfect size and certainly reusable for all sorts of things and occasions.
the bag is really nice but it ripped on the sides with two uses only.  i have recycled bags before it doesn't ripped right away.
I just needed a separate bag to hold my work apron, a water bottle and a book. And it does that job fabulously! I don't suggest putting your canned goods, or anything heavy in it... it will more than likely tear.
It is perfect! I am using this bag as a gift bag for a guy's baby shower who is a die hard Star Wars fan! He will be able to use it after for carrying toys or whatever! Mini diaper bag even. Very pleased!
Ordered 2 for grocery shopping. Very sturdy and easy to wipe clean. Finally have bags that my husband will use.
My oldest loves this tote and the bright star wars graphics. Fun bag to put star wars Christmas gifts in.
2 uses and it already has a hole along one edge.  Perhaps i put too much weight in it.  I don't know but I would have hopped it lasted longer.
I just wished the bag was heavier. You can't really put heavy items in this. It's a cute bag overall.
You know those reusable grocery bags that cost about a buck in most supermarkets? This is about the same size as those, but it's much flimsier.
Highly recommend for any Star Wars fan.  I used them as gift bags for my sons' birthday presents.  They use the bags often for carrying toys to Grandmom's and clothes for overnights at a friends.
Just awesome.  I get tons of compliments when I use it.It is a little smaller than most shopper totes but the awesome factor makes up for that.
Bought one, used a little while... Corner ripped & everything fell out.  So cheap we got a new one...after 2 days, ripped again in the same spot.  Won't buy this again :(
My son is having his first child and they are decorating everything in a Star Wars theme.  This bag was perfect for my gifts to them for their shower and I love that they will be able to use it over and over again.
seems durable.  it is slender like a gift box shape-i was hoping it would be wider. someone told me it was cheaper at a department store.
I'm a Star Wars fan and I bought this with the intention of using it for groceries but it turned into my new diaper bag. It's huge! I can fit everything i need in it where before I had my diaper bag and another bag and my purse. It has started to come apart on the side but I can sew it or order a new one it's so cheap. I am sure the intended purpose isn't for it to be used as a diaper bag daily but it works and I have gotten compliments on it even! It goes great with my Star Wars Vans too :D
grate product, and fast delivery and just what i was looking for and it looks cool and there is plenty of room for groceries
It's a nice bag but says its 14 by 15 inches. It is actually about 12 1/2 by 13 inches. I was disappointed because I neeeded a 15 inch bag.
I chose this rating because the product met my expectations. I have one just like it and I love Star Wars.I recommended to all my friends
Austin,Texas has banned plastic bags, so I thought this would be perfect to use as a gift bag, I placed the gifts in it formy adult son. However he said he wasn't sure he'd want to use it for groceries, it's just too cool for that!Sturdy and looks eve better than it did on line.
I ordered four of these bags - two for me and two for a friend.  They are fantastic!  Very sturdy, good vivid color, room enough for lots of groceries or whatever you want to use it for.  I usually fold my bags up so I can tuck them away in the car and these were a bit stiff, but it was just a testament to their thickness and sturdiness.  Most checkers and a few shoppers will comment if they are fans of the films.  So glad I bought these and so is my friend!
Very cheap plasticy fabric. The 99 cent ones at the grocery store are better quality. Not worth what I paid for it.
The mug is a great size and leaves a lot of room for cream.  The first mug I ordered came damaged, but it was replaced quickly with a non damaged mug.  It holds enough coffee so I don't have to keep running for a refill!  The picture of the Beatles is nice and clear as well.
I bought for a friend as a gift.  She loved it.  It is a perfect give for a Beatle fan.
who ever packed this product needs to learn how to pack, the mug was in it's proper box, but it was put in a shipping box with no packing material at all, the mug was bouncing around in the shipping box.  The mug was not damaged, but the box it comes in was dented, kind of takes away a little value you know. I'm not shipping it back because don't want the hassle at post office.  Just thought I would let you know,  by the way everything else I have bought from you has been packed very well.  jeff blackstone
It was a gift for our son. Only complaint, the base of mug is slightly defective, It does not sit flat on most surfaces.  Otherwise it was a big hit and he loves it.
This pan was the ideal size that I was looking for. and I loved the accessories -- until they began to change color because they are hard to clean (the small spoons, the wooden spoon).The wok also isn't as non-stick as one would hope.
The bowls and woodenware alone I thought was worth the price, so to get the wok as well I really thought this was a steal. I made sure to take good care of the wok, not to let anything metal be used on it or stored in it but after only a handful of uses the coating began to come off! I had to throw it out because the coating kept peeling up and it was impossible to clean stuff off the bare spots. I totally love the bowls and spoons though, I've dropped them a few times and shoved them in the dishwasher several times and they are no worse for the wear (I recently had a baby and find these convenient for feeding him too!).
This was fine the first couple of weeks, then the inside started coming off (even with gentle use of a wooden spoon) and started rusting. Cheap....
Wish it were larger so didn't have to fold papers to put in the folders. Otherwise, a great idea with great pockets for MD cards.
when i first got it it was so shiny and new.The tassle and beads are so pretty! If you love Icarly you will love this bookmark.
I like it!Just one thing that confuse me - why 4-month of 2011 and not from 2013?My daughters were happy with this calendar!
got it for my friend that keeps loosing her keys because her last name is pepper she thought it was cute
it doesn't work like it is supposed to.  it stinks and does not cut the onions or other veggies that they advertise. would like info on how to return this product.
I was not impressed with this product.  It does chop but also does not keep together after chopping.  Cheaply made!
This comes in so handy when preparing so many of my dishes such as tacos, soups, stew, or anything that you need to have vegetables chopped up for. It takes only a few seconds and everything is chopped. I had seen them and they were more expensive on T.V..
I never encountered a tool that helps cubing potatoes quicker.  It helps to make Sunday morning breakfasts that much nicer!
I like the velcro that wraps around your leg, but wish the pillow was little thicker to lift the leg alittle more
the velcro straps need to be extended much further along for those of us who are not extremely fat....the pillows are excellent for comfort when sleeping, but the velcro barely sticks for me, because I'm not very large and so they hang off and the velcro straps are irritating on my legs...I have to wear longer pajamas and then the velcro pulls on the clothing and ruins it
the pillow was too small to make knees comfortable and the velcro fastner was not quite long enough on the down side of the knee and on the up side the velcro kept scratching me.
They fit pretty good, seems to take pressure off knees where it seems to bother most at night, doctor told me typical of Fibromyalgia.
Although I haven't actually used it yet, I'm sure it is going to do exactly as described.  It is a sturdy, all-in-one gadget I'm sure I will have for many years.
Love the detail in this plan set.  Downloaded the PDF copy from the designers website (zero cost option for those with small budgets).  Like the fact that it has options for different configurations of the attic space.
My mother is almost blind and is able to do these puzzles.  Thank you for having these available for her.
I bought this for my ten year old child who has dysgraphia.  It has been very helpful for his written work and I plan to include this as an accomodation in his IEP.
It's OK except after I turn it on, the monitor screen becomes unreadable.  (The letters are clouded over to make it unreadable, unless I move the corrector to a particular angle.)  This makes it almost useless.  It just does not produce a clear printout of the words when the unit is lying flat on a desk.This is the second unit I owned (lost the first one) and they both had the same problem.  I can get an answer after moving it to different angles, but this is unsatisfactory.
This is great.  Updated the one I had from 1991. Only problem is that the lid isn't very good.  It's keeps coming off.  Needs to be more that plastic hinges.  Other wise I really enjoy it & the games are fun too.
I liked the fact that the Spelling Corrector offers more than one alternative spelling.  I am finding the case a little difficult to open compared to the one I owned previously.
The Franklin Spell Checker was exactly what I was looking for at the best price I could find Thank You.
If you type the wrong word in, it &#34;might&#34; produce the correct word.  It doesn't give any explanation of the meaning or how it can be used. I should have sent it bk., but I factored in the cost of return shipping - wasn't worth the return.
Works well but wish the display was just a bit larger. For the money it does what I want and I would buy it again.
If you have trouble remembering how to spell a word this will help you.  Easy to use
This is not nearly as good as a franklin speller that I purchased years ago.  I am disappointed in this.
I have one of these myself and recently found out my collage age grandson has a problem with spelling.  He said he has no problems with math and all the subjects they thow at him, but please dont ask him to spell.  SO, I got him one of these for Christmas and now he is in 7th Heaven.  Thanks Franklin Webster's.
This item is impossible to find anyplace else so I'm grateful to Amazon. I use it for crossword puzzles and it is very helpful. It's my 3rd speller but it has become really small over the years.
If you are a crossword addict you need this product.  The best on the market.Z
I've given this little pocket machine 5 stars for nostalgic reasons. I am not too sure how well it would hold up to today's standards, with kids having all sorts of snazzy pocket devices that I'm sure have at least a thousand times more memory than this.The Franklin Spelling Corrector is the reason why into my adult years, I have had impeccable spelling. It was instrumental is developing my love for words more than any teacher, professor or book.
The Franklin Word and game It is exactly like the one we had years ago and misplaced. Fills our need completely.,Perfect for our needs.
this is great to have I lost mine and was lost without itI like the size and shapeKids can use for fun spelling  races
I love my spell check. It is easy to use & works very well. I like the auto turn off so you dont run your battery out. The only drawback is that the buttons are very small. I would love to have the same product with bigger buttons. I would defiantly recommend this product.
I bought this gadget as a Christmas gift for my husband and he loves it!! I would highly recommend it to students or anyone who needs assistance with spelling!!!
It was a little too small for my eyes and if it were a  bit larger I would give it 5 stars.  But I am satisfied cause it has helped me spell better.
Hello.................I purchased this as a gift for a woman who needed it very much. The Speller did not include a battery. I am handicap withouta car and the winter has been terrible. I had to give it to incomplete. She does not have a car either to take it for updating.The packaging did not include the little screw driver to open to see what kind of battery it needed so she could tell someoneelse what size, etc. Thus, she was very frustrated with the gift. A man in her doctor's office opened for her to show how, andthe size of battery...and gave her the screw driver telling her where to go to the mall to buy one. She has not been able togo on the bus........so here we are both disappointed. Please, charge more if you have to.......include a BATTERY!!!~~~
Enjoyed this spelling helper. Some people can say the words and can not spell them. This helps a lot with someone I tutor.
Franklin Spelling Corrector: It is quite small - a little larger size would make it key easier. Does not open easily.
This little device works just as advertised, but I've found it to be little help in doing crossword puzzles.  It's great for Scrabble players to use, but has a demo feature that must be turned off each time before entering text.  I haven't wanted to use it for the games that can be played on it.
so it has been about two years and have  not gotten the spelling corrector and iam really mad about that.
This POS didn't work when I received it. About every other letter displayed on the screen. And if you plugged in "butiful" it came up with everything but "beautiful". Most not even close. I got it because my wife is a horrible speller, and needed it for a new job. She still can't spell.Don't waste your money. Teach your wife to spell.
My 10-year old son (with ADHD) is very intelligent.  However, spelling is not his strong suit.  Even as a small child, phonics meant nothing to him, and although we have tried various programs/methods to increase his spelling efficacy, he has not been able to master the basics.  Thankfully, he is able to look at a word, and can usually tell if what he's written &#34;looks right&#34; or not.  His incredible memory has allowed him to see and remember some words.  The spelling corrector has really helped him to begin to master some of the &#34;spelling rules,&#34; while continuing to memorize other words.
I love this product. It's small, lightweight, and does a great job at helping me solve Word Jumble puzzles. Also works to check spelling, as a calculator, and unit converter. And for $13.54 ??? Such a deal.
I bought my husband one of these years ago (which he still uses) and he wanted to give this as a gift to a co worker who was pleasantly surprised since he had seen my husbands.
I did sloppy shopping. This machine is exactly what the name says it is - a speller. I wanted definitions, OH, that would be a dictionary! I ordered a dictionary an I am happy - except the voice is scratchy. Life is not perfect.gg
I have three grandchildren in elementary and middle school and I purchased one for each.  I have one from years ago that I carry in my purse - comes in very handy and useful.
This is mostly my fault.I should have looked closer at the size of the machine.My fingers are just to big for the tiny keyboard.Also i did not need a system that plays games or stores phone numbers.Also it only gives you one example of the correct spelling when others machines i have seen gives you two or three,but when your spelling is as poor as mine anything will help.
I purchased this device for my wife.  She uses if often at home.Because it is so compact, she carries it in her purse.  It is compact, and easy to use. It is well worth the money.
The receiver of this gift said it is great - especially when writing something like a Amazon review - no spell check on this review !
Its a nice little spell checker that gets the job done. Its not the best for somebody with big hands but for the price its not bad at all. I really like it.
The screen is difficult to read due to the background.  It needs to be clear like a calculator screen.  It does find words as described in the product description.
It's to small and hard to read at times.It will work for a while. It does the job for now.
Five stars isn't enough! It should get 6 stars.  I have decided to order college model before the end of the year.  I must confess, having it in my purse and being able to help children with their spelling and putting people who think Exodus is spelled with an "s" is quite amusing!
This is exactly what we wanted but too dim.  It is very hard to read the correct spelling.  Is there a way to brighten the display that we are overlooking???
got this for my daughter to use for school and homework.  She caught on right away, and has put it to good use.
Bought this for my teenager daughter. Her teacher suggested it might be helpful.  Handy little gizmo and easy to use.  Small and easy to carry with her books
It's nice to have a spell tool to refer to when needed at your home,or on the go. I've always liked the Franklin,and yes I'd share my opinion of this product with anyone.
Purchased this for my mother who is 75yr old. She writes letters every day. It is very easy to use. She loves it!
I bought this for my 11 year old son who has do a lot of writing in school and this Spell Corrector has really helped him with his work. And it is small enough that it fits right in his binder. We may get a second one to keep at home.
Perfect for my husband who gets embarrassed when he spells incorrectly. very user friendly, especially for someone who doesn't use a smart phone!
I bought this spell checker for myself.  I am a college intern and needed something handy for my process recordings. The process recordings are done by good old pencil and paper and I have gotten so used to spell check on computers that my spelling has declined!  This little gadget comes in very handy.
I naught this for someone's a gift... But I already have one....and there is nothing better than one of these when you are having trouble with spelling words. Especially when you have to be accurate. Highly recommended.
its a lot smaller than i thought, and the other reviews are right about the buttons: they are pretty small. but i love this product! i use it when i play scrabble to check the spelling and to see if something is a word or not. the size worked great cause i can easily slide it into the drawer on the back of the game drawer.
Not good for large fingers. Demo must be cleared every time you turn it on. Slow if input is incorrect & may require a crazy input to get proper spelling. It does work however. Worth $15 or less.
Too small and hard to operate.  Was going to use it while playing word games but just can't coordinate it and use the computer keyboard too.  I'm not sure it has everything a person would want.  Opt for a larger table top model or use the free dictionary on your computer.
I have not used this device as often as I thought I would.  I work with school age children who struggle with spelling and reading.  Many students prefer to look up words on his/her iPad or iPod.  Although the Franklin spelling corrector is easy to use, inexpensive, and portable, I don't think kids feel it is technological enough as compared to other devices.
I purchased this for my son,and he is taking some collages courses after being out of school for several years. He has nothing but favorable comments and statesthat it works very well and gets answers very quickly. He is completely satisfies with your product  and we will continue to buy products from you. BN
I like it ! It's simple, quick, and covers just about every word in the English language. It's a real bargain for all that it does.
Works well and is easy to use. Never had to read the instructions. Just open the unit and go to work.  Our granddaughter uses it all the time, and she has her own I-Phone!
oI wish it were a litle larger. The  old one I had was a bit larger and easier to get results.
so happy to find this
Don't buy this to store personal data like names and phone numbers.Changing the battery is a pain in the butt,requires a tiny Phillips head screwdriver to remove the flea-size screws. The instructions say you risk losing all your phone list information when you change the battery "so always keep written copies of your phone list information." The reset pinhole doesn't save your data.I misspelled inchoherint in the spell corrector to see the correct spelling of incoherent. One "correct" spelling came back and it was this: "inchworms." INCHWORMS? Other misspelled words produce a list of possible correct spellings, and you can guess which one on the list is the correct spelling.If it were more expensive, I'd send it back.
I'm really obsessive-compulsive about spelling and grammar. Wish I were better at both so I keep making the effort to improve. I still have to use the dictionary at times, but this speller is a real helper. The buttons are small and it seems a bit fragile, don't think it would take a two or three foot drop. The price was just right and it really saves time. Glad I bought it.
We got this for mother-in-law. She uses it mainly for crossword puzzle help, and loves it. It has lots of other features too, including spell correction, games, calculator. Would be good to take when traveling. The size is perfect to fit into a pocket or purse. Just a handy little gadget. It already has battery.
Bought this for a person who could not spell well. He so very pleased. The price is affordable too. Buy it.
It doesn't work . I've typed in so many words & it can't find them , only when I have almost spelled it right. Verydisappointing !!  Sharon Grotts
Great value for the price and getting harder to find.  Easy to use and far simpler to use than a computer, especially if you're using the computer without a word spell program.  It`s also a lot easier to carry on a trip than a  computer or laptop.  Well worth the money for just sitting at your desk working and looking up a word.
This was one of the prizes we ordered for a High School spelling bee, and it has been greatly enjoyed.  In all honesty, adults seem to be just as impressed with it (if not more) than the kids are.Pros:--Good spelling games--Large Print--Easy to useCons:--The only negative, and it is a small one, is that the cover seems a bit flimsyAll in all, this does exactly what it says it does and is easy to use, durable, and extremely helpful!
I WAS TOLD IF I CAN NOT SAY ANYTHING GOOD THEN DO NOT SPEAK. COME ON CHRISTMAS EVE. TO LATE TO RETURN. SO IT WAS A BAD CHRISTMAS DO TO THIS N OTHERS LIKE THIS. I DIDNT EVEN WANT TO GIVE IT A SINGLE STAR.LOOKS LIKE FEELS LIKE WORKED(WORKED) LIKE DOLLAR 1$ STORE ITEM
Excellent product. I only use it for spelling but has other functions as well. Only negative I could see is that the lid is so tight it's hard to open easily.
9 y/o son has a LD, and this spell checker has become indispensable.  A no-frills, easy to use to use gadget.  The higher-end Franklin speller & dictionary combos, even those for elementary kids, lack a reliable phonetic spell check (despite marketing description).  Dictionary skills are important, but looking up a word can turn into a homework exercise in itself, so this device is great for quick self-checks!
This does it's job. I think it is perfect for a dyslexic child. I need to buy more of them. My kids fight over it all the time. They love looking up words!
This is a great tool to help with solving crossword puzzles.  I have used it for seven or eight years.  I recommend it highly.
I ordered this corrector as a gift for a friend because she liked the one I had. Unfortunately she could not read it unless it was held directly under light. There were little black squares marking the letter positions which did not disappear when used. I sent it back for a replacement. The replacement came promptly but unfortunately it was the same.  She wouldn't let me send it back because she figures that they would all be the same. I have had mine for a long time and do not have this problem. They must be manufactured differently now. I would not recommend this to anyone.
Works good, kids think it's fun. Hopefully it frees up some of my time so I don't have to help spell words as much.
I got electronic dictionaries that my sons love to use.  What a great deal!  And the seller was very helpful in making sure we got the delivery.
Definetly a good buy for the money, and easy to use.The kids are making good use of it. As a matter of fact, I am enjoying the use of it also.
From the very young to the Mature in Age this item comes in very handy. It does a variety of things, is small and can slip easily into a purse or pocket or school bag.
I purchased this speller for use in my special education classroom. The students love using it. It's easy to operate and is a great alternative to dictionaries for students with moderate to severe learning disabilities.
This is my second spelling corrector, the first being lost in a move.  It works well and gives a good range of word choices.  The only caution I would give is that you have to be sure to push the keys all the way down when entering a word.  If not, you find your entry missing a letter or two.  I use is often for crossword puzzled.
This is very appropriate for grade school aged kids and maybe 6-8th graders. Other versions were too mature for my daughter who is entering 6th grade. She was able to eaily figure it out and began using it right away. It's a great device and would highly recommend it. However...within 36 hours the lid came off. It does snap back on, but so weaklly that it's constantly coming off. It doesn't impair the function of the unit so we're dealing with it and I wouldn't let that stop you from ordering this product. A more expensive device will not use the simplistic wording in the definitions that this one does. It's great for kids up to 12-13 years old.
The Franklin spelling corrector has helped my daughter a lot. It works realy good. I would tell my friends to get the spelling corrector.
like it. would recomend to outher people,it's easy on and has alot of words to show,when you search for words.
My daughter is in the 4th grade. Her spelling teacher suggested the Franklin Spelling Corrector.She has been using it for 1 month, and it has significantly helped to improve her spelling.
Very helpful.
and it seems to do the job for the most part.  You are supposed to be able to spell the word phonetically and it will show you the correct spelling.  However, if your &#34;phonetic&#34; spelling isn't close to the actual spelling, then it won't help much.  Example:  Actual - phonetically it could be spelled axshuel, which will give you everything that starts with &#34;ax&#34; but nothing close to actual.  If you are already pretty close to the scorrect spelling and just want to double check it, then this will help you.
My new &#34;Spelling Ace&#34; is far and away more thanI expected. It fits in my shirt pocket, it's got a bunch more words than my old one.And hopefully the cover stays on longer than my old one. I'm really quite pleased.Mac
I recently purchased the Franklin Spelling Corrector. I am dyslexic and have trouble with my spelling, I spell phonetically. I have found that the Franklin Spelling Corrector can correct over 90% of my misspelled words. It's eases to use, it fits into a pocket easily, and inexpensive the only drawback is that it can be a little slow. I would highly recommend this device.
Receiving the Franklin speller it is exactly what I needed to replace, since my old one got lost. The service by the seller was great and I received it in the time they said. The product itself is working just as great as the old one.
This was bought for my 3rd grader to use in class to check on some of the more tricky spellings--and it gets used a lot! It is not too big, not too small and the buttons are just right for small hands. It's quick to check things and it also stores all her friends' phone numbers, etc. The calculator is very useful too. Fun and easy to use, there are more and more of them appearing in the classroom now.
Easy to use! Fast shipping, great price. Great for dyslexics and spelling challenged alike. Makes my work easier. Love It.
Works great!  Really helpful and easy to use. Helps to really solve the crossword puzzels quickly,Highly recomend,  makes it easy to figure out whether a word needs an A or an O
The previous spell check was about the same size. Once I turned on the previous spell check I could type in the word and enter it.  This Franklin spell check needs to be turned on and then the extra step of pressing clear prior to typing in the word to be checked.  I'll certainly get used to it, but I preferred the ease of turning on the old one and then typing the word immediately..
The spelling corrector works great. I have still not heard from anybody from AMAZON about the package that it came in was loaded with bugs, SILVERFISH BUGS!!!! I guess thats not important. I hope you post this review??????????
I got this for my sister for Christmas and see loves it. The screen is very nice and readable. She takes it everywhere. Its very light and you can take it anywhere
I ordered this to use as part of the Barton Reading & Spelling System, and I've been quite pleased with the success it's given my students.  They are able to accurately check the spellings for tough words, which ensures accurate practice, which of course leads to success.  Not only does this include the spelling corrector, but it also provides alerts and definitions for homonyms, as well as including a basic calculator.
I bought this for my husband. He was a boss having to fill out reports the old fashion way with pen and paper. He used it to make sure he was spelling correct. he works construction and isnt the best at spelling. He loves it
We purchased four of these for grandchildren ages 7 and 9.  They were just recently given as birthday gifts, so have not been used yet other than just "trying them out".  Based on previous reviews, they appeared to be just the "ticket" for them.  Upon opening the gifts, the children were thrilled with the ease and the smaller size of it.
It doesn't work.....I haven't had time to go out and get a new battery but.......it turned on briefly and then nothing!
I used to date this girl who loved Scrabble.  So, by association, I had to as well!  We used to play a lot - even with her Grandmother.  What they did, however, was "cheat".  We had one of these - this same Franklin Spelling Corrector you see here (an older model but same nonetheless) and you each of us was allowed to use it to come up with all kinds of crazy words.  I thought this was a dumb way to play Scrabble, at first, but then I came to love it.  If you're all "cheating", then it becomes a different game - the strategy changes.  We had a lot of fun.  Too bad I had to dump her for being utterly insane! (I'm sure she was bipolar-scitzophrenic or some variant thereof).  I kept the Franklin Spelling Corrector!  Still have it to this day!
This is the second of these units that I have owned.  The first one is riding in a rental suv somewhere.  This speller comes through when the more expensive models will not.  It is simple and straight forward to use and is small enough to fit where other spellers will not.  I know it has other features and they work fine but I use it mainly as a speller.
My 10yr old was required to use at school, and it works great, is compact enough to fit in her pencil pouch and even has games on it!
The letters are smaller than I thought they would be.  I was a little disappointed.  Its informative, but thats it.
Fast shipper and good communication.  The Franklin spelling corrector is great for someone who second guesses his or her spelling and has great games too.  Great product and seller.  Thank you.
I teach elementary school to children from all over the world.  Writing skills are the last part of language to develop, and I always keep a supply of these for my young students to borrow.  They simply enter in a word how it sounds to them, and a correction list comes up.  For my intermediate students, it is a fantastic tool.  It saves them time and makes writing much more pleasant.  I would say that 85%of the time, they find the word they need.  I also bought one for my mom, who is just a bad speller.  She loves it and has used hers to help with letter writing for years.  This is a great product.
I'm a lousy speller and this thing is such a help. I already have one and use it often. This one is for my craft room where I write a lot of cards.
bought this as a gift for someone really love it would buy again is a great gift idea for the crossword lovers out there
Keeps going to demo every time you use it. I am amazed at how many times it tells me that there are no mactchs for the word I am looking for- and many times it shows me words that aren't even close to what I need.
This product is user friendly and easy to use. Letter keys are a little on the small size but okay.
This item did not work right out of the box.  I plan to return it.
i love it. It definitely gets the job done. I would suggest it to anyone who is a horrible speller like myself.
I use one of these very often. I broke the last one I had after about fifteen years. I feel lost without it so here I go again. Yes it is just a spell checker, but hey out there, people see what I write, and when I misspell stuff I look stupid. One of my relatives that looked over applications for the gas company in the city where I live once told me if he saw a misspelled word on an application he threw it in the trash and I never forgot that. I don't always spell well but this item is a tool that helps me look stupid less often. It was about as expensive to buy at Amazon and have them ship it to me as it would have been for me to spend time and money to shop for it here. Thanks Amazon, once again, for the convenience of shopping for what I need at home.
I am pleased with the Franklin Spelling Corrector.  Many years ago I bought the "grandfather" of this item and I was thrilled with it for years and years. It was a larger unit, approximately 4X6 inches and the buttons were large, easy to see and handle. I tried to have it repaired to no avail and then I found that Franklin has a new edition of this spell checker.  It does the job nicely, but, it is smaller and the buttons are smaller. That is the only reason I didn't give it a rating of 5 stars. I would, and have recommended it to my friends. Thanks for fulfilling my needs. Ping J Hart
Love the Franklin Spelling Corrector - makes writing reports faster since you don't have to use a &#34;dictionary&#34; - if anyone remembers what a dictionary book is.
we have one child who struggles with spelling. I wish I would have looked for this sooner. She no longer has to ask me how to spell words while doing her schoolwork.
I just love it.  I am a poor speller and this is by my side at all times. I use it all the time.
This is a good spell corrector and it also does other things like it is a phone book and it can play games. This is good purchase for anyone who needs it.
It works for my daughter, accurately finding words that she has no clue how to spell (e.g., "becuz" immediately found "because").  The one that arrived was black; she and I would have preferred the blue that was pictured.
I am very pleased with this item, however, I wish the keys were a bit larger as the signs (etc.) are very hard for me to see. One who has better eyesight might not have as much trouble. I find the case is a bit stiff opening although this may get better with use.Other then that I would recommend this spell corrector. I use it very often, even when I just want to check my own spelling. The games are a nice touch too.
We got this as a stocking stuffer.  Works good for elementary aged kids.  Easy to use and battery life average.  Don't expect to much, but for what it is, the Franklin Spelling Corrector works well.
Works as intended. Is a bit smaller than expected...about the size of a thicker iPhone. Need good eyesight to use it well.
Works well i like little bigger buttons a little small i have another 1, nice if it had larger keys other than that its fine
GREAT. IT SURE HELPS A LOT, I DON'T KNOW WHAT I WOOD DOO WITH OUT IT. THATS ABOUT  IT. SIGNING OFF NOW
I bought this for my mom, but she stopped using it after week because it didn't really help her. Its very small and takes forever to arrive
My mom loved it. I don't need to say any more so I'm not going to do so. That's it.
I loved my older one but this review is a question for anyone owning this new model... Can you tell me if this model contains the definition of the words??.. Multiple definitions, like my old one did? Not one review talks about that. Please comment....  Thank you
I bought two of these for my kids ages 10 and 12 this Christmas. They both love it! They've reported that it has been extremely helpful at school for writing assignments and projects. I see them using it at home a lot, too. It's easy to use...and my kids can't resist showing me all the different functions it has...All in all, a very useful purchase that also delights.
I purchased this for my wife who does a large number of crosswords every day, to replace another similar item.She tells me this new one is "totally wonderful" I was also very pleased with the time it took for the item to be received which was sooner than expected.
going to be a Christmas gift.  too soon to evaluate...have not tried it yet but think I will love it.
IT IS MUCH SMALLER THEN I ANTISIPATED AND A BIT FLIMSY.  I USE IT FOR HELP SOLVING THE DAILY NEWSPAPER JUMBLE  AS I AM A VERY BAD SPELLER.  IT IS VERY  HANDY HOWEVER,  FOR STORING TELEPHONE NUMBERS AND IT WILL VERY EASILY FIT IN A POCKET.
NOT THAT GOOD, IT ISN'T AS GOOD AS THE ONE I HAD BEFORE.
excellent product for word correction and also other things u can do with this spelling corrector.Received it fast and I'm happy with it.
I've used this model of the spelling corrector for many years. It's small (wallet-size) universal minicomputer, and it has much more than a spell checker - a thesaurus, various word games (Hangman etc.), calculator, phone book, and many more features. Besides, the batteries last for 3 to 5 years! I had my previous device for about 12 years, before I replaced it with a new one (the same model). You'll have a lot of fun with it!Exact model is NCS-101.
Marveling over this just arrived Spell Checker !! Three words already in less than twenty minutes !! Stylus or finger nails for this very light cell phone size cutie !! Quarter inch read out is way easy for the eye !! And to use too !! Starting, hopefully, into a happy future together !! Thank You !!!!
I am not happy with this corrector.  It is not what we expected. It does not bring up words that i am looking for.
My daughter wanted this to improve her writing skills in the third grade.  Because she can look up words she may not know how to spell on her own she is using more complex words in her papers now.  Her teacher encourages students to get one of these so they expand the use of their vocabulary.  It is remarkably cheap for the features.  My daughter also figured out how to play the games that come with it too.  Go figure.
I write a lot of notes to friends ,and family , but have always been a bad speller. This was a perfect gift to myself. Well worth the money.
Spelling corrector plus...This product is way too small. It fits in the palm of your hand. You must use a pencel eraser on the small keys. It's also hard to open and hard to read. Best advise is SKIP IT.
Works great and sometimes I just want a quick spelling check _ Everyone says that I spell poorley and this is a quick portable fix.
My daughter's writing teacher made this mandatory and it is a great help with her spelling.
I bought the Franklin spell corrector becasue I'm a little uncertain when it comes to spelling some words.  This does exactly what I need it to do. It gives me a quick and easy way to find out if I have spelled a word correctly.
It is very easy to use according to my grandson, now the challenge is getting him to remember to use it.I would recommend this to others.
This spelling corrector is poor.  It is very small, and most of the words that I entered were not included is it's memory.
The clarity of the screen is very poor. I can barely see the words. Poor quality. I would not buy this brand again.
i like it. It is not as easy to use as the older version I had for years, but it does the job.There is no reason to misspell anything with computer spellers and a Franklin.
Bought two, one for me and one for my sister.  The company got them here fast and we got back to solving jumbles immediately. I  love it!
I use these in class with 10 and 11 year olds. They like the size. Reminds them of their cell phones. The case is too hard to open. The case must be unscrewed to remove and replace the circle type battery. But they are really small and thin. I like that. Easy to use. Students love them. Always asking to use them.
Perfect!
a good multi-function product. it replaced a franklin spelling corrector i had  since 1989.i don't like the plastic case. it is very difficult to open. i broke a fingernail trying to open it.i purchased the new corrector because the characters were more readable than the older model's characters.
This was a gift for my daughter.  Not only is it easy to use it has nice features to make it fun as she learns.
My ten year old son was begging for one of these.  I didn't want to buy it.I came accross this one and got it anyway because the price is reasonable.  He has prgrammed phone numbers into it, it has a calculator and has spelling games too.  It is worth every penny.  I am now getting one for my middle son too.  LOVE IT!
This spell check is junk, too small, half the time it doesnt even work correctly! I would never buy again.
I'm disappointed because the child I bought this for doesn't use it much.  I wanted something that speaks a word and the child tries to spell it and then it gives them the right answer if they get it wrong.  It's not very engaging.  The descriptions of the products don't say enough to tell what you are exactly getting.
I ordered this for an elderly friend because it is described as having large print.  The print is not any larger than any others she has!
I bought this for my daughter in 3rd grade.  She enjoys using this spelling corrector when she is writing. She also really enjoyed the games that are available.  I loved the price for this handy, portable, easy to use spelling tool.
I use this product daily at work.  My job requires puting information about clients in a computer without spell check.  In order to remain professional sounding I use this product.  There is nothing worse than bad spelling when typing documentation.
I bought this for my 7 year old son and he loves it so much. This spelling corrector also function as a calculator, game and many more. My son uses it everyday and still enjoying it.
THIS IS A VERY GOOD ITEM AND WE NOW HAVE THREE OF THEM. THEY ARE VERY HELPFUL.
I was attempting to replace my &#34;old&#34; model of Franklin &#34;Spelling Corrector&#34; since I used it with students so often it was looking worn.  This was the closest I could get to the former model by the description. However, after I started using it I realized that this &#34;spelling corrector&#34;, while it does have games, doesn't offer word meanings and a nice thesaurus like the former model.  Many times I had used the former model just to locate a synonym or antonym.  Now this model will not help me in that way.  It is thinner, smaller, and generally styled better; however, I really miss the other features for grammar assistance.  If you are only looking for spelling help, this is a great addition to a student's backpack or tools; but if you are looking for the other former features Franklin had, it's not on this model.
this item arrived  in a bubble plastic container, since I only have only one working arm it took me thirty minuets to hack it open and then after removing the battery protector. IT DIDN'T WORK!!!! Called the company and the immediately was told they would credit my card and to just throw it away. No complaints on the company.
I have dyslexia. I need spellers where ever I am 24/7. Had one as a kit and it was a huge.  This one is tiny and works so well. Must have for your dyslexic family and friends
I love to do crossword puzzles and this is a fun product to help me find or figure out those impossible clues. Yeah I know you can cheat and check out online answers but I prefer to challenge my grey matter.  I had one of these for years before it finally died (even with replacing battery it stopped working properly/easily). Hope it lasts again!
I finally got my speller. I will say you get just what  you pay for. It is too small for me. I wished I had just paid more for a better one. After I waited 13 days..
Bought it for my son who has a problem with spelling.  It is very useful when writing his book reports and essays.  Normally when checking homework I have to constantly correct his words.  This tool enables him to correct his own errors and since he has to look it up he retains the information better.  The letters are large and its in a nice enclosed casing.
I have a Franklin Speller that may be 40 years old and still works, but I ordered a new one hoping there would be improvements.  It is not as flexible as my old one, in that in the game I use it for, you cannot specify the minimum number of letters.  The original is metal; this is plastic.  The price of progress....
I am very pleased with my purchase. There is nothing i dislike about this product. I recamend the Franklin Spelling Corrector to everyone.
It's a must for report writting. It has ten thousand words in it's data base. It's small and compact. Good price too.
Outstanding
The spell corrector does the job at a low cost, and does it far better than more expensive Franklin's.I don't see where age has anything to do with who uses this spell corrector.IT IS GOOD FOR ALL AGES!The only draw back is that you have to unscrew the back cover and pry itoff to replace the battery.
I have only had it about a month and it does what is advertised. I do wonder if I should have gotten one with the dictionary feature, but this use has only come up a couple times. It gives you enough choices that you should find the word you need.
It works fine. The cover fell off after a few months. But it still works fine and was a good buy.
We had an earier version that lasted for years . My wife did not want to replace it but death is final.She loves the new one with all the enhancements plus we didnt lose any screen size though the new one is more compact. Occupies grandkids forever!
My Two Kids 9 & 7 Are Very Happy With This Product.
This has been a helpful tool for my 6th grader who is a TERRIBLE speller!
Keyboard tabs are small. A person with large hands have to use a small object to activate. This is the problem.
My Sister lives in another state and doesn't have a computer and was tired of guessing how words were correctly spelled, so I found this spelling corrector and she LOVES it!  It not only helps her spell but has a calculator and games, I am thrilled when I heard how happy she was with this gift, I would definitely recommend it to anyone and am getting one for myself for when I am out of town and don't have my 'wordcheck'.  Thanks for the quick and safe delivery, it arrived in perfect shape!
My son has Dyxslexia and needing a spelling corrector for school.  This looks like a calculator so the other kids don't notice it.  It works great and was only $15 through this website.  At Best Buys they wanted $89 and CVS wanted $39.  It came on time and is great conditionion and is the perfect size for my son or an adult.
I like this item I've always had one but I wasn't able to buy it the stores anymore so I ordered it on line. I really like the bigger one too but it was more money so I bought the smaller one. It works good too.Gladys Winkworth
I purchsed this for my grandson who is in the 5th grade.  He found it to be very helpful when doing his reports.  I feel it was a good choice and will be used often.
The picture of the product made I look like it was a lot bigger. My fingers are to large for the letters,, and the screen is so small I have to use a magnafing glass.The only reason I rated it 1 Star is that's as low as it goes. If I had seen this thing in real time I NEVER would havegiven more the $1.25 for it.
This is great,  I'm 67 and can't remember crapp  and now !!!!!!!!!! great I think that everyone need one when they have trouble with the most simplest words
It came in with scratches on the plastic cover, not really a big problem, but it came without instructions, and for me that's a BIG problem. How do you sell an item like this and don't even state NO instruction included ??????
I am dyslexic and spelling is difficult for me.  Of the meny things I have overcome spelling remaines a stumbling block.  The Franklin Spelling Corrector is easy for me to use and works to help me with my writing.  The result is a better product in a shorter time.  I am very satisfied with my purchase.  Thank you Amazon!
It&#34;s okay, but I wish it had more of a vocabulary.  But I guess that's what you pay the big bucks for.
I had one like this years ago,and lost it this one is better. As I age I need this more.
every age needs one always in a hurry doing stuff  the kids asking you how to spell this word. and also helps the parents
Great product my step daughter loves it. This will come in very handy. Hope to pass it down to the other kidsThank You
I have had this little gadget for almost 20 years and LOVE it! I use it mainly for crossword puzzles but have played hangman, word builder, word jumble with it. I also put phone numbers in it. It started going blotto on me, about a year ago, so I managed to pry the back off and replace the battery. It's still going strong. This is a must have if you do a lot of crossword puzzles!!
I selected this item for a family member who always comes to me for the correct spelling of varied words. Now my phone rings at the same pace as it did before purchasing the product because it does not have most words in it. They even showed me how this item does not work. I typed a number of words in with one letter off from the correct spelling deliberately to see if the product is acting as has been reported to me, and guess what, that is exactly it, none of the words listed as possibles for what I wanted were even close to the word needed. This item was a waste of money and hopefully it is not too late to return it.
First off, be advised that this item is NOT a dictionary, it is only a spelling corrector.  If you manage to get one that works, it will tell you whether or not you spelled _a_ word correctly, and if not, give you a list of other choices, but it will not tell you the definition of the words so you can make sure you spelled the RIGHT word correctly.  Thus, it will not help you with write/right, pore/pour, they're/their, etc., the kinds of words that people in need of spelling help are most likely to have trouble with.Also, the unit I got was defective. After struggling for several minutes to get it to initially power on, it worked as advertised for about 3 minutes, and then began resetting itself after every 10-15 keystrokes, abruptly powering off and back on, and randomly reverting to demo mode.Needless to say, I am sending it back and purchasing something else.
Father said that the button were too small for his fingers and the screen was too darkHis vision is fine so that is not the problemHe said that it gave too many choices to choose from?I gave it to my sister
This one seems to be made better than my Seiko spell check. I like the cover on it as well.  SW
I thought they would be easy hats but they are rather hard if you are not advanced. Still looking. thanks
A great collection of bird postcards made by Cavallini Papers one of my favorite paper companies.  The birds are of varied breeds.
My brother-in-law was pleased to receive the Cavallini Postcard Set of Birds from me as a Christmas gift.  The included tin is slim and elegant in style.  The cards themselves are individual works of art, life-like in color as well as beautifully drawn.  Hopefully, I will receive one or more of them in the mail showing his artistic script and witty prose.
It's very hard to find postcards these days unless your traveling through airports a lot. I was happy to find this collection of cards that have beautiful images on them and are reasonably priced.There's plenty of room on the back of these standard cards for writing. the cards are on wonderful paper which gives them a very solid feel.I recommend these as a small gift, or to encourage you to send more notes to friends.
The main reason I purchased the Birds Carte and the Flora & Fauna postcards is because I have four grandchildren that are away at college, and I like to send frequent notes.  The postcards are pretty and are made from heavy-weight paper, but I wish the colors were a little brighter.  Also, I would love it if a tin of 'dogs and cats' was offered.
Arrived on time and in great condition. This postcard set is BEAUTIFUL! It's exactly what I was looking for. I hate cheap looking postcards, gift cards, stationary, etc. These do NOT look cheap. Beautiful artwork. Elegant. Expensive looking. I purchased this item for myself but it would be a great gift. I mailed out one of these postcards a few days ago and the recipient commented on how lovely it was.
the workmanship of the butterflies in beautiful but the magnets need to be larger and more secure to improve quality
I really enjoy Cavallini products and the images on these magnets are very pretty. However, the magnets are so weak that they will not hold paper or pictures on a magnetic board, rendering them useless for my office.
Really lovely magnets, but not strong enough to hold up any kids' art on the fridge. More decorative than practical.
Great magnets! They are good quality and look fantastic. I wish this artist Made more of these! The birds face in different directions are colorful and go great on my fridge.
Love the colors, the paper stock, and the beautiful details of this vintage print.  XOXO
I have been coveting this exact map on urban outfitters site but didn't wanna pay the price they are charging. Was happy to find it on amazon for much cheaper. Is just as beautiful as I hoped it would be. Is a matte finish, which is great as the map is supposed to be 'vintage' looking. I love it!!
I like the quality of the map, but it did arrive a bit wrinkled.  The only way I can imagine this happened is by whomever put it in the poster tube.  Unfortunate, but still useable
We hung it up before our trip to Paris to get a feel for where things were and now that we're back, we point to places we were and talk about them. Much more appropriate to hang than a modern map.
